hur Gardiner Butler in 1879. It is found in the Neotropics, including the Brazilian state of Amazonas. 
This article on a moth of the subfamily Eulepidotinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Who Fears Death is a science fantasy novel by Nigerian-American writer Nnedi Okorafor, published in 2010 by DAW, an imprint of Penguin Books. It was awarded the 2011 World Fantasy Award for Best Novel, as well as the 2010 Carl Brandon Kindred Award "for an outstanding work of speculative fiction dealing with race and ethnicity." Okorafor wrote a prequel,  the novel The Book of Phoenix, published by DAW in 2015. 
The novel takes place in a post-apocalyptic future version of Sudan, where the light-skinned Nuru oppress the dark-skinned Okeke. The protagonist, Onyesonwu (Igbo for "who fears death"), is an Ewu, i.e. the child of an Okeke woman raped by a Nuru man. On reaching maturity, she goes on a quest to defeat her sorcerous father Daib using her magical powers. 
Besides winning the 2011 World Fantasy Award for Best Novel and the 2010 Carl Brandon Kindred Award, Who Fears Death was nominated for the 2011 Nebula Award for Best Novel and the 2011 Locus Award for Best Fantasy Novel. It also won the Best Foreign Novel award at the French Awards "Les Imaginales". 
In July 2017, Okorafor announced the novel was the basis for an HBO television series in "early development", with George R. R. Martin serving as an executive producer; Selwyn Seyfu Hinds has been selected as scriptwriter. 
Asitha Rathnaweera was a Sri Lankan cricketer. He was a right-handed batsman and right-arm bowler who played for Panadura Sports Club. 
Rathnaweera made two first-class appearances for the team, during the 1994-95 season, taking a single catch on his debut, but failing to score a single run from the tailend. 
He scored just a single run in his second, and final, first-class appearance, and took a single catch - that of veteran Test player Aravinda de Silva. 
This biographical article related to Sri Lankan cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He made his Russian Professional Football League debut for FC Afips Afipsky on 16 April 2017 in a game against FC Kuban-2 Krasnodar. 
This biographical article related to a Russian association football defender born in 1997 is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Lifschitz began her modelling career when she was 16. She worked on campaigns for Adidas, and became the second transgender model to work on a Victoria's Secret campaign, following Valentina Sampaio. 
She began acting in 2015. Show writer David Hayter told a fan that Lifschitz was pleased with the Warrior Nun script specifically because it doesn't mention that she is transgender, which is very unusual for transgender roles. 
Lifschitz was born in Corrientes, Argentina but grew up in Denmark. Her mother is Danish and her father is Argentinian, and she holds a Danish citizenship. 
Wormleighton is a village in Warwickshire, England. The population taken at the 2011 census was 183. 
The village was abandoned after the English Civil War when the Spencer family home Wormleighton Manor was burned down in 1645. The village, however, was refounded in the 19th century. Sites of interest also include a 12th-century church. 
The first mention of a post office in the village is in September 1853, when a type of postmark known as an undated circle was issued. The post office closed in 1971. 
The historic family of Wormleighton is based in the North West of England. During World War II, Captain Ronald fought with distinction and was awarded the Victoria Cross in 1944. 
The Spencer family fortune derived from Sir John Spencer of Wormleighton, Warwickshire, who bought Althorp in 1508 with the huge profits from his sheep-rearing business. 
In 1498 an inquest jury recorded that 60 villagers had been evicted from the Wormleighton Estate "weeping, to wander in idleness ... perished of hunger". 
Altix is a line of server computers and supercomputers produced by Silicon Graphics (and successor company Silicon Graphics International), based on Intel processors. It succeeded the MIPS/IRIX-based Origin 3000 servers. 
The line was first announced on January 7, 2003, with the Altix 3000 series, based on Intel Itanium 2 processors and SGI's NUMAlink processor interconnect. At product introduction, the system supported up to 64 processors running Linux as a single system image and shipped with a Linux distribution called SGI Advanced Linux Environment, which was compatible with Red Hat Advanced Server. 
By August 2003, many SGI Altix customers were running Linux on 128- and even 256-processor SGI Altix systems. SGI officially announced 256-processor support within a single system image of Linux on March 10, 2004 using a 2.4-based Linux kernel. The SGI Advanced Linux Environment was eventually dropped after support using a standard, unmodified SUSE Linux Enterprise Server (SLES) distribution for SGI Altix was provided with SLES 8 and SLES 9. 
Later, SGI Altix 512-processor systems were officially supported using an unmodified, standard Linux distribution with the launch of SLES 9 SP1. Besides full support of SGI Altix on SUSE Linux Enterprise Server, a standard and unmodified Red Hat Enterprise Linux was also fully supported starting with SGI Altix 3700 Bx2 with RHEL 4 and RHEL 5 with system processor limits defined by Red Hat for those releases. 
The Altix brand was used for systems based on multi-core Intel Xeon processors. These include the Altix XE rackmount servers, Altix ICE blade servers and Altix UV supercomputers. 
NASA's Columbia supercomputer, installed in 2004 and decommissioned in 2013, was a 10240-microprocessor cluster of twenty Altix 3000 systems, each with 512 microprocessors, interconnected with InfiniBand. 
The Altix 3000 was the first generation of Altix systems. It was succeeded by the Altix 4000 in 2004, and the last model was discontinued on December 31, 2006. 
The Altix 330 is an entry-level server. Unlike the high-end models, the Altix 330 is not "brick" based, but is instead based on 1U-high compute modules mounted in a rack and connected with NUMAlink. A single system may contain 1 to 16 Itanium 2 processors and 2 to 128 GB of memory. The Altix 1330 is a cluster of Altix 330 systems. The systems are networked with Gigabit Ethernet or 4X InfiniBand. 
The Altix 3300 is a mid-range model supporting 4 to 12 processors and 2 to 48 GB of memory. It is packaged in a short (17U) rack. 
The Altix 3700 is a high-end model supporting 16 to 512 processors and 8 GB to 2 TB of memory. It requires one or multiple tall (39U) rack(s). A variant of the Altix 3000 with graphics capability is known as the Prism. 
The 3700 is based on the third generation NUMAflex distributed shared memory architecture and it uses the NUMAlink 4 interconnection fabric. The Altix 3000 supports a single system image of 64 processors. If there are more than 64 processors in a system, then the system must be partitioned. 
The Altix 3700 Bx2 is a high-end model supporting 16 to 2,048 Itanium 2 processors and 12 GB to 24 TB of memory. It requires one or multiple tall (40U) rack(s). 
The Altix 4000 is Silicon Graphics' next Itanium-based product line. It has two models, the Altix 450, a mid-range server, and the Altix 4700, a high-end server. 
An Altix 4700 system contains up to 2048 dual-core Itanium 2 and Itanium ("Montvale" revision) microprocessor sockets, connected by the NUMAlink 4 interconnect in a fat tree network topology. The microprocessors are accompanied by up to 128 TB of memory (192TB with single microprocessor socket blades and 16GB DIMMs). 
Each node is contained within a blade that plugs into an enclosure, the individual rack unit (IRU). The IRU is a 10U enclosure that contains the necessary components to support the blades such as the power supplies, two router boards (one for every five blades) and a L1 controller. Each IRU can support ten single-wide blades or two double-wide blades and eight single-width blades. The IRUs are mounted in 42U-high rack, and each rack supports up to four IRUs. 
Multiple servers can be combined on the same Numalink fabric up to the theoretical maximum of 8,192 nodes (16,384 OS CPUs). 
All Altix XE systems support Novell SUSE Linux Enterprise Server, Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and Microsoft Windows. VMware support was added across the Altix XE product line. 
The Altix ICE 8200LX blade enclosure features two 4x DDR IB switch blade and one high-performing plane, while the Altix ICE 8200EX features four 4x DDR IB switch blades, and two high-performing planes. Both configurations support either hypercube or fat tree topology, and 16 compute blades within an IRU. 
The IP-83 and IP-85 compute blades support Intel Xeon 5200 or 5400 Series processors, and the IP-95 compute blade support Intel Xeon 5500 Series processors. 
In November 2011 the ICE 8400 is based on either Intel Xeon 5500 or 5600 processors or the AMD Opteron 6100 series processors. 
The Altix UV supercomputer architecture was announced in November 2009. Codenamed Ultraviolet during development, the Altix UV combines a development of the NUMAlink interconnect used in the Altix 4000 (NUMAlink 5) with quad-, six- or eight-core "Nehalem-EX" Intel Xeon 7500 processors. Altix UV systems run either SuSE Linux Enterprise Server or Red Hat Enterprise Linux, and scale from 32 to 2,048 cores with support for up to 16 Terabytes (TB) of shared memory in a single system image. 
In 2010 and 2011, SGI retired the Altix name for new servers produced by the company. Altix UV and Altix ICE have been shortened to "SGI UV" and "SGI ICE," while the Altix XE line is named "Rackable." 
Oxynoemacheilus galilaeus also known as the Galilean Stone Loach is a species of stone loach in the family Nemacheilidae native to Israel and Syria. 
Timothy Bain (born 13 June 1978) is a British-Australian writer. He is known for writing comedy, children's and animated series for television and as the creator and co-executive producer of ABC Kids' action-comedy series Kangaroo Beach. 
Bain has also written for comedy series including Aardman Animations Epic Adventures of Morph, The Rubbish World of Dave Spud, Rove and The Wedge. His children's series credits include PJ Masks, Bluey, Bob the Builder, Fireman Sam, Go Jetters, Counterfeit Cat, Boyster, Tooned 50, Digby Dragon, Dennis the Menace and Gnasher, Bottersnikes and Gumbles, The New Adventures of Figaro Pho, Kuu Kuu Harajuku, Winston Steinburger and Sir Dudley Ding-Dong and Get Ace. 
Bain won Best Children's Episode at the British Writers Guild Awards 2018 and Best Animation at the Australian Writers Guild Awards 2017 for his Counterfeit Cat script "Room of Panic". 
Bain has written several high school musical-comedies, You're History!, Lucky, RetroActive and High School Spoof-ical. They are published by Maverick Musicals and have been performed across Australia, New Zealand, United Kingdom, the United States, Japan and South Africa. 
Bain's short animated films Arctic Adventure (2000) and Kidd Kelly (2003) featured the voices of Eric Bana, Sigrid Thornton, John Clarke, Angus Sampson, Dave Hughes, Kim Gyngell and Judith Lucy. They have screened at festivals including the St Kilda Film Festival, Melbourne International Comedy Festival, Melbourne International Animation Festival and the Massachusetts Children's Film Festival. 
He competed for the Netherlands at the 2010 Winter Olympics in the men's 500 m, 1000 m, and 1500m.  At the January 2014 European Short Track Speed Skating Championships, he was disqualified from the 5000m relay final after making an obscene hand gesture at first-place finisher Victor Ahn of Russia. At the 2014 Sochi Olympics, he won a bronze medal in the 1000 meter race. This was the first medal for the Netherlands at the Olympics in short track. 
This biographical article about a speed skater from the Netherlands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In March 2021, AGC and WGTS announced a deal with American University-owned WAMU to acquire the NPR station's Ocean City, Maryland-based repeater, WRAU (88.3 MHz) for $650,000. WGTS raised some $700,000 from listeners and supporters to fund the sale, giving the station a 50,000-watt repeater service for contemporary Christian programming on the Delmarva Peninsula. The station handover happened on June 24, 2021, and its call sign was changed to WGBZ. 
This United States railway company-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He learnt music from Tiruppambaram Somasundaram Pillai, T. M. Thiagarajan and later from Semmangudi Srinivasa Iyer. He was also a highly acclaimed teacher. 
He was born in Churubusco, Indiana, where he attended Smith Township public schools in Whitley County, Indiana. In 1901, he graduated from Tri-State College in nearby Angola, Indiana. 
By 1907, Gandy had moved to Rapid City, South Dakota. While in South Dakota, he entered the newspaper business and worked as publisher of the Wasta, South Dakota Gazette from 1910 until 1918. He also owned a working cattle ranch from 1910 until 1945. 
In 1911, Gandy was appointed to South Dakota's State Senate. Two years later, he was appointed by Woodrow Wilson as the receiver of public moneys of the United States land office in Rapid City, a position he held until he was elected to the U.S. House of Representatives. He served as South Dakota's Third District representative from March 4, 1915 to March 3, 1921. He lost his bid for re-election to a fourth term. 
After politics, Gandy took up agricultural pursuits and returned to his Wasta ranch. In 1923, Gandy moved to Washington, DC after he was hired as a lobbyist as the executive secretary of the National Coal Association (NCA), a position he held until 1930. Between 1930 and 1937, Gandy worked for NCA member of the Pittston Company. 
He left Pittson to become chairman of the Bituminous Coal Producers Board in Cincinnati, Ohio between 1937 and 1940. He worked his remaining years until retirement in executive advisory roles for the Elk River Coal & Lumber Co. and Buffalo Creek & Gauley Railroad Co. in Widen, West Virginia. 
Gandy died on August 15, 1957 while retired in Los Gatos, California. He was interred in Mountain View Cemetery in Rapid City, South Dakota. 
Morton was named to the Order of Canada in 1968. In 1969, she was named an honorary Doctor of Laws by the University of Alberta. 
The album reached no. 4 on the Billboard 200, and performed better overseas than the preceding album (it was the group's highest-charting studio album in the United Kingdom, where it peaked at No. 12). The accompanying "You Make Me Real" / "Roadhouse Blues" single peaked at No. 50 in May 1970 on the Billboard 100 chart. The cover photo was taken by Henry Diltz. 
On March 1, 1969, Jim Morrison performed while intoxicated at the Dinner Key Auditorium in Coconut Grove, Florida, in front of a crowd of nearly 12,000; he was charged for his performance and behaviour with indecent exposure, on April 4. The incident negatively reflected on the band's publicity, sparking a "March for Decency" at the Miami Orange Bowl. 
In November,  a drunken Morrison caused such a disturbance on a flight to Phoenix, Arizona to see a Rolling Stones concert that he was charged with a new skyjacking law that carried up to a $10,000 fine and a ten-year prison sentence. 
During this period, the de facto blacklisting continued to persist in more socially conservative markets, particularly the Deep South; consequently, the band's 1970 American tour itinerary was largely confined to the Northeast, West Coast and more progressive Midwestern cities amid ongoing (albeit more sporadic) cancellations, including planned concerts in Salt Lake City and at the Jesuit-operated Fairfield University. 
Details are taken from the 2007 Rhino Records CD 40th Anniversary Edition liner notes with Bruce Botnick's and David Fricke's accompanying essays and may differ from other sources. 
* Sales figures based on certification alone.^ Shipments figures based on certification alone. Sales+streaming figures based on certification alone. 
Bonds has mostly appeared as a guest actor on television shows; however, he was also featured in the Spike Lee film Get on the Bus, in Tales from the Hood and in the Rick Famuyiwa film The Wood. He has a production company called Take Off Productions with fellow actor Francis Capra. 
Bonds was born in Los Angeles, California. In 2001, he was convicted of manslaughter in the death of his aunt's boyfriend, and in 2011, he finished serving a 10-year sentence at California Rehabilitation Center Norco, California. 
This article about a United States film actor born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Brazilian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tapas Bapi Das (born 22 September 1958) is an Indian singer-songwriter, guitarist and music connoisseur. He was one of the founder members of the Bengali rock band Moheener Ghoraguli established in 1975 in Kolkata. Being one of his kind, he can rightfully be called 'Moheener Adi Ghora' ('Moheen's earliest horse'). 
In 2015, Bapi being the mastermind and mentor behind the generation next has formed a Bengali band called Moheen Ekhon O Bondhura On 6 October, he released an EP album titled Mohin Ekhon O Bondhura with Lagnajita Chakraborty, Malabika Brahma and Titas Bhramar Sen. The album consists of five songs and a tribute album to Moheener Ghoraguli. 
In 1896, Vernor and his son James Vernor, II closed the drugstore and together opened a soda fountain on Woodward Avenue south of Jefferson Avenue near the riverfront ferry docks, and organized a manufacturing plant.  By 1915, they expanded operations to include a bottling company, which widely manufactured Vernor's Ginger Ale. 
Vernor was one of the original members of the Michigan Board of Pharmacy, formed in 1887, and held License No. 1 throughout his career.  Vernor also served on the Detroit City Council for 25 years. 
Vernor died in Grosse Ile, Michigan October 29, 1927, at age 84 from pneumonia and influenza.  He is buried at Woodmere Cemetery in the southwest section of Detroit, Michigan. 
The union was named after the village of Prithimpassa, home of the Prithimpassa Nawab family. In 1499, a Persian nobleman from Isfahan known as Prince Sakhi Salamat settled in Prithimpassa, Kulaura. Being a wealthy nobleman; his son, Ismail Khan Lodhi, was granted a jagir by the Mughals and given the status of Nawab in addition to other prestigious titles. 
In 1756, the Nawab of Longla Moulvi Muhammad Rabi Khan Danishmand established the famous Rabir Bazar (Rabi's Market). Begum Talib-un-Nisa Khatun of Chhoto Saheb Bari (Prithimpasha village) established the Rabir Bazar Jame Masjid. 
In the anti-British Sepoy Mutiny of 1857, 300 sepoys who revolted against the British, looted the Chittagong Treasury and took shelter with Nawab Gaus Ali Khan of Prithimpassa. The treasury remained under rebel control for several days. Abdul Ghafur, grandfather of Ali Haydar ibn Ali Gawhar, of Kanihati was present during the mutiny. 
In 1950, the Shah of Iran, Mohammad Reza Pahlavi, visited Prithimpassa and stayed for four days at the palace and went wildlife hunting in the Estate forests alongside Khwaja Nazimuddin and Ayub Khan. 
Prithimpassa constitutes the no. 11 union council of Moulvibazar Sadar Upazila. It contains villages and mouzas. 
Prithimpassa has a significant number of British and American immigrants contributing to its economy. It has three state-owned bazaars; Robir Bazar, Chhoidol Bazar and Brindaranir Dighir Par Bazar, and it also has four non-governmental bazaars; Rajnagar Chaumuhani Bazar, Nandigram Bazar, Pursai Bazar and Jhilerpar Bazar. The Prithimpassa family estate is a historical site which attracts tourism in the Union. 
The native population converse in their native Sylheti dialect but can also converse in Standard Bengali. Languages such as Arabic and English are also taught in schools. The Union contains 14 eidgahs; Shikoriya, Gonokiya, Dhamuli, East Gajbhag, Karaigram, Alinagar, Shomman Shahi, Kanaitikor, Yusuf Sadar, Rajnagar, Rabir Bazar, Sultanpur Shahi, Bhatgaon and Pursai Eidgah. There are many mosques, most notable the historic Rabir Bazar Jame Masjid. 
This article about a Norwegian engineer, inventor or industrial designer is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Tapirus rioplatensis is an extinct species of tapir that lived in South American swamps and forests during the Pleistocene and was probably the ancestor of all South American tapirs alive today. 
This prehistoric odd-toed ungulate-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Somi (born Laura Kabasomi Kakoma on June 6, 1981) is a Grammy-nominated American-born singer, songwriter, playwright, and actor of Rwandan and Ugandan descent. 
In 2007, she licensed her independently recorded album Red Soil in My Eyes to the Harmonia Mundi/World Village label for her first international distribution deal. The record received wide critical acclaim with the hit single "Ingele" that maintained a Top 10 position on U.S. World Music Charts for several months. 
In July 2020, Somi released 'Holy Room - Live at Alte Oper' on her own label Salon Africana.  The live album, which also features Frankfurt Radio Big Band, was nominated for a 2021 Grammy Award for Best Jazz Vocal Album and won the 2021 NAACP Image Award for Outstanding Jazz Album,  Vocal. 
Somi is a TED Senior Fellow, a United States Artists Fellow, a Soros Equality Fellow, and a Sundance Theatre Fellow.  
Uspenka is located 34 km north of Arkhangelskoye (the district's administrative centre) by road. Troitskoye is the nearest rural locality. 
Tang China defeated the Eastern Turkic Khaganate, which became a vassal state in 630. During this period, some Turkic nobles were members of the Chinese army. Ashina Jiesheshuai was among these nobles. 
Jiesheshuai's rebellion was unsuccessful. However, in 681, Qutlugh revolted against Tang and established the Second Turkic Khaganate in 682. 
Xylokorys is a genus of marrellomorph known from two specimens from the Silurian Herefordshire lagerstatte; it filter-fed on mud particles on the sea floor.  It is the only marrellomorph known from the Silurian period. 
At the request of American scientists, the Soviet Meteorite Committee sent the meteorite samples to California University, Cambridge Astrophysical Observatory and the Institute for Nuclear Researches of Chicago University, as well as to CERN. One of the samples was preserved in Fersman Mineralogical Museum. 
The Great Illusion is a book by Norman Angell, first published in the United Kingdom in 1909 under the title Europe's Optical Illusion and republished in 1910 and subsequently in various enlarged and revised editions under the title The Great Illusion. It is an influential book in the field of international relations. 
Further, the nature of modern capitalism was such that nationalist sentiment did not motivate capitalists, because "the capitalist has no country, and he knows, if he be of the modern type, that arms and conquests and jugglery with frontiers serve no ends of his, and may very well defeat them." 
Angell said that arms build-up, for example the naval race between England and Germany that was happening as he wrote the book in the 1900s, was not going to secure peace. Instead, it would lead to increased insecurity and thus ratchet up the likelihood of war. The only viable route to peace would be respect for international law, implemented in a world court, in which issues would be dealt with rationally and peacefully. 
A new edition of The Great Illusion was published in 1933; it added "the theme of collective defence."  Angell was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize in 1933. 
In North America, Seven Seas Entertainment announced that they had licensed the manga for English release in February 2021, and the first volume will be released in both print and digital formats starting in August 2021. 
Pietrangeli represented Italy in the Davis Cup between 1954 and 1972. He played in a record 164 Davis Cup rubbers, winning a record 120. He was a player on the Italian teams which reached the Davis Cup final in 1960 and 1961. Both finals were played on grass courts in Australia, and the Italians were not able to overcome the strong Australian team which included Laver, Roy Emerson and Neale Fraser. 
After retiring as a player, Pietrangeli became Italy's Davis Cup team captain and guided them to winning their first-ever Davis Cup in 1976. 
Pietrangeli was inducted in the International Tennis Hall of Fame in 1986. On his 73rd birthday, the old tennis stadium in Foro Italico of Rome was named in his honour; he is among the very few tennis players to have received such an honour while still living (others include Laver and Margaret Court). He also played a supporting role in the movie "There Was a Castle with Forty Dogs" in 1990. 
In 138 BCE Rhodogune married Seleucid King Demetrius II Nicator (ruled 146-139 BCE, 129-126 BCE). They were kept by her brother in Hyrcania on the shores of the Caspian Sea, during which time they had several children. During their marriage, Demetrius was temporarily a hostage in the Parthian court after an ill-fated campaign in Babylonia. 
She was presumably abandoned in 129 BCE when Demetrius, after numerous failed attempts to escape from Parthia, was dispatched back to Antioch during the invasion of Parthia by Demetrius's brother, Antiochus VII Sidetes. 
This biography of an Iranian ruler or member of a royal family is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Heritage 20 is an American trailerable sailboat that was designed by Andras Davidhazy as a cruiser and first built in 1967. 
The design was built by Howie Craft Plastics in the city of Lake Oswego, Oregon, United States, between 1967 and 1971, but it is now out of production. The company was mostly a one-man operation, run by the founder, Howard Renner. The boats were built one at a time, with only 12 examples completed. 
In 2017, musician and producer Fernando Perdomo collaborated with former Pink Floyd backing vocalist and Blue Pearl lead singer, Durga McBroom, recording the song for the multi-artist compilation album, Songs, Bond Songs: The Music of 007. 
Fenno's paradox is the belief that people generally disapprove of the United States Congress as a whole, but support the congressmen from their own congressional districts.  It is named after political scientist Richard Fenno, who discussed this in his 1978 book Home Style: House Members in Their Districts. Fenno discovered that congressmen would often run against Congress. 
"Fenno's paradox" has also been applied to areas other than politics including public schools.  For example, U.S. citizens largely disapprove of the public school system, but tend to like the particular local schools their children attend.[citation needed] 
This article related to the politics of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In France, the French constitution of 4 October 1958 was revised many times in its early years. Changes in this fundamental law have become more frequent since the 1990s. This has had two major causes: the desire to modernize public institutions on one hand, and adapting to the European Union and to international law on the other. 
Constitutional revisions are initiated by the President of France on a proposal by the French Prime Minister and members of the French Parliament. 
The project or the proposed revision should be ... passed by both houses with identical terms. The review is final after being approved by referendum. 
However, the proposed revision is not submitted to referendum if the President of the Republic decides to submit it to Parliament convened in Congress; in this case, the proposed revision is approved only if it receives three-fifths majority of the votes cast. 
No revision procedure may be commenced or continued which jeopardizes the integrity of the territory. 
Since the beginning of the French Fifth Republic, revisions have been adopted without using section 89.  
Unless otherwise stated, the provisions of the constitutional laws come into force on the date of enactment. 
However, some recent constitutional laws have provided a delayed effective date. The material content of the Constitution, in these cases, changes on different dates from those of other enactments of constitutional laws. 
The same constitutional amendment provides in Article 47 that certain amendments of the articles of the Constitution relating to the European Union come into force at the time Lisbon Treaty becomes effective.[LC 2] This occurred on 1 December 2009 and the new content of these articles came into force on that date. 
The Constitutional Law of 1 March 2005 had planned similar provisions concerning entry into force of the Treaty establishing a Constitution for Europe,[LC 3] which have become obsolete due to the termination of the process of ratification of this Treaty. 
However, the prestige of De Gaulle, the fact that the "yes" won with over 62% of the vote, and the fact that the Constitutional Council refuses to review the constitutionality of laws passed by referendum (as they are adopted by the people), allowed the implementation of this reform. 
In practice, this reform has not only changed the method of electing the President, it has also significantly increased its powers by giving it a popular legitimacy not shared by the Prime Minister. For example, the President could, except in periods of cohabitation, ask the prime minister to resign, which is not provided in the texts. We can therefore speak of a second birth of the 5th Republic. 
This amendment was intended to  make the Constitution compatible with the Treaty on European Union . 
A five-year presidential term of office was presented for the first time on 10 September 1973 by Georges Pompidou. The text was passed in identical terms by the National Assembly and the Senate, but was not submitted to Congress for final approval. The President did not continue the action, as he could not muster the required three-fifths majority in Congress and because of resistance to his project. 
The Constitution includes in its preamble, since 1 March 2005, an environmental charter of 10 articles, at the request of President of the Republic Jacques Chirac. 
For the subsequent ratification of the Treaty of Lisbon, a revision of Title XV of the Constitution was passed by Congress on February 4, 2008, by 560 votes against 181. The Constitutional Law was issued on the same day.[LC 26] 
The amendments to the Constitution endorse the transfer of sovereignty listed in the Treaty of Lisbon by direct reference to the text. Thirty areas covered so far by the unanimity rule as the common agricultural policy or criminal justice, now will require a vote of a supermajority. 
In terms of institutional functioning, changes reflected in constitutional terms relating to the powers granted to national parliaments. 
As of the entry into force of the Lisbon Treaty, Title XV of the Constitution will be amended according to Article 2 of the Constitution Act. 
Article 3 of the Constitution Act revokes the provisions of Article 3 of the Constitutional Law No. 2005-204 of 1 March 2005 which amended Title XV of the Constitution "from the entry into force of this Treaty": these constitutional provisions are not in force and are now devoid of purpose. 
In 1969, Charles de Gaulle had a bill on the creation of the regions and on the renovation of the Senate.[PLC 1] Adopted by both houses, the referendum of April 27, 1969 rejected (52.4% no, Charles de Gaulle, taking note of the refusal of the French people, immediately resigned). Regionalization was finally put into place via legislation, notably in 1972 and a 2003 constitutional revision which constitutionalized the region.[LC 20] 
In 1998, Jacques Chirac undertook to reform the Supreme Judicial Council. Filed on 15 April 1998, the bill was adopted by both houses on 18 November 1998.  The bill was not presented to Congress. However, the composition of the said Council would be reformed via the constitutional amendment of July 23, 2008. 
The Government wanted Congress to meet in July, but due to time and an insufficient majority, only one bill was discussed in Parliament (the one on the High Judicial Council) where the Senate had cleared the bill of its content. Following this, the Government was forced to postpone revisions. 
Several committees have been formally constituted to formulate proposals to overhaul governmental institutions: 
The microscale interactions between the phytoplankton and bacteria are complex.  The phytoplankton-bacteria interactions have the potential to be parasitism, competition or mutualism. 
However, bacterial-phytoplankton interactions in the phycosphere could be parasitic.  In the same low nutrient oligotrophic regions of the ocean, phytoplankton that are nutrient stressed may not be able to produce this protective mucus layer or its associated antibiotics.  The bacteria, who are also food stressed, could kill the phytoplankton and use it as a food substrate. 
Also, bacteria metabolize the organic matter through aerobic respiration, which depletes oxygen from the water and can lower the pH of the water column.  If enough organic matter is produce, the bacteria could potentially harm the phytoplankton by causing the water to become more acidic.  (See also eutrophication). 
In reality, the actual bacterial diversity of the phycosphere is extremely diverse and is dependent environmental factors, such as turbulence in the water (so the bacteria can attach to the mucus or the phytoplankton cell) or the concentrations of nutrients.  Also, the bacteria tend to be highly specialized when associated with this region.  Nevertheless, here are some examples of bacterium genera associated with the phycosphere. 
She was elected as member to Mumbai Municipal Corporation during 1968-1973. She had represented Mumbai North Central (Lok Sabha constituency) in 7th Lok Sabha in 1980-84 as Janata Party candidate. 
Numerous video games were released in 2011. Many awards went to games such as Batman: Arkham City, Portal 2, The Elder Scrolls V: Skyrim, The Legend of Zelda: Skyward Sword and Uncharted 3: Drake's Deception. 2011 also marked the worldwide release of the Nintendo 3DS. 
In addition, 2011 saw the introduction of several new properties, including Bastion, Dark Souls, Dead Island, Homefront, L.A. Noire, Minecraft, and Rage. 
Clearwater is an unincorporated community in Saline Township in Sainte Genevieve County, Missouri, United States. It is located approximately fifteen miles southwest of Sainte Genevieve on Missouri Supplemental Route W. 
Clearwater was named by the town's first postmaster, J. C. Nations, for Clearwater, Florida, where his cousin lived. The town on the west coast of Florida, near Tampa, is now known as Clearwater Harbor. 
This Sainte Genevieve County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Huveane, also known as Huve or Huwe, is a trickster god and creator god in Pedi and Venda mythologies. In some versions of the myths, Huveane is also depicted as the first human on earth. 
In another myth, involving the discovery of sexual intercourse, Huveane was said to have fled earth due to the cacophony that arises from the discovery. Huveane escaped to the skies, which symbolized heaven, by creating steps to walk upon. He also removed the steps as he climbed upward, ensuring that humans cannot follow him. 
Huveane's reputation as a trickster god may have arisen from several myths where he played pranks on his family and the people of his village. In one myth, he stole his father's food and left cow manure instead on the empty plates. When his father asked what happened to the food, he pretended that the food had been changed into cow manure by some unknown magic. 
The Service Update Management Assistant (SUMA) automates the update process for the AIX operating system by the retrieval of maintenance updates from IBM. 
Without extensive configuration it is capable of automatically downloading, when available, entire maintenance levels and the latest security updates. It is also capable of comparisons against currently installed software, fix repositories and maintenance levels. 
In July 1943, a plane carrying Sikorski plunged into the sea immediately after takeoff from Gibraltar, killing all on board except the pilot. The exact circumstances of Sikorski's death have been disputed and have given rise to a number of different theories surrounding the crash and his death. Sikorski had been the most prestigious leader of the Polish exiles, and his death was a severe setback for the Polish cause. 
His government was recognized by the western Allies. Nonetheless Sikorski's government struggled to get its point of view heard by France and the United Kingdom. The western Allies refused to recognize the Soviet Union as an aggressor, despite the Soviet invasion of Poland on 17 September 1939. Furthermore, he struggled to secure resources needed to recreate the Polish Army in exile. 
When Sikorski refused to accept the Soviet explanation and requested an investigation by the International Red Cross on 16 April, the Soviets accused the government-in-exile of cooperating with Nazi Germany and broke off diplomatic relations on 25 April. 
In 2008 Sikorski was exhumed and his remains were examined by Polish scientists, who in 2009 concluded that he died due to injuries consistent with an air crash, and that there was no evidence that Sikorski was murdered, ruling out theories that he was shot or strangled before the incident; however they did not rule out the possibility of sabotage, which is still being investigated by the Polish Institute of National Remembrance. As of 2012[update], the investigation continues. 
General Sikorski was also an active writer on the subjects of military tactics and describing his personal war experiences. His works include: 
a ^  For a detailed analysis of the size of Polish forces, in comparison to other allies, see note a in the Polish contribution to World War II article. 
Acacia aciphylla is a shrub belonging to the genus Acacia and the subgenus Juliflorae. It is native to the Mid West region of Western Australia. 
The plant will grown in sandy, loamy and lateritic soils and on granite outcrops and rocky ridges in mixed shrub-land communities. It has a broken distribution between Kalbarri, Mullewa and Morawa. 
Upstream advisory support goes hand-in-hand with targeted capacity strengthening strategies - with a focus on reinforcing the institutional processes, organizational structures and professional skills and competencies needed to carry out the core Education for All (EFA) tasks that will lead to agreed quality and equity targets. 
Early results point to better understanding among federal ministry staff on strategic planning processes and the generation of solid baseline information regarding key capacity gaps at national and Woreda levels. Guidelines and tools for capacity building are in preparation, along with a detailed nationwide situation analysis on current education system performance levels, measuring progress in relation to the launch of the current Education Sector Plan. 
Activities are also advanced in Ethiopia towards reinforcing the capacities of teacher education institutions (TEIs) in four regions: Oromiya, Amhara, SNNPR, and Tigray. The design of a Teacher Information Management System (TMIS) is considered a critical pillar of teacher education support systems in the country - as it will facilitate teacher-training performance monitoring and the development of quality assurance systems. 
The film takes place in Cuba after the revolution, in a fishing village by the sea. The United States is still trying to return the old regime and send sabotage groups there. The film tells about a group of guys in whose eyes this is happening. 
The COVID-19 vaccination campaign in Greece began on 27 December 2020. As of the 24th of October 2021, 6,593,449 people have received their first dose (61.7% of total population), and 6,341,166 people have been fully vaccinated (59.3% of total population). 
"Sometimes I Can't Relate" is an original song about horse and human friendship from the English movie Unbridled starring Oscar nominee Eric Roberts in the lead role. The song is composed by Jibin George Sebastian and sung by Addie Nicole. 
This song utilized 10 studios from 5 countries to complete its production. The song is mastered by Sherman de Vries 
The song was featured in various top news outlets including BBC Radio, Malayala Manorama, Huffington Post, Medium , Media One TV, Hit 96.7 , 94.3 Club FM , All India Radioetc.  
The 337 Squadron (Norwegian: 337-skvadronen) is a maritime helicopter unit of the Royal Norwegian Air Force (RNoAF). Based at Bardufoss Air Station, the squadron operates eight NHIndustries NH90. The helicopters are used by the Norwegian Coast Guard and serve on the Nordkapp-class, the Barentshav-class and on NoCGV Svalbard. 
With the delivery of the Mk 52 Vampires from 1950, the quantity exceeded that of which the 336 Squadron could operate. This also involved a split in roles. The existing Mk 3 Vampires would remain with the 336 Squadron and be used for interception and air defence; the new Mk 52s and the 337 Squadron were given the task of bombing ground targets. Both would be based at Gardermoen Air Station. 
By early 1950 the number of Vampires in the 336 Squadron was sufficiently large that they allowed some Vampires to be transferred to the new squadron. The 337 Squadron was therefore established on 22 May 1950. It was largely made up of newly trained soldiers and was to begin with characterized with a lack of experience in management and operations. Within a year it had twelve aircraft. Training was conducted at the Marka field outside Lista Air Station. 
The 337 Squadron gradually received more missions in Northern Norway. With the delivery of new Republic F-84 Thunderjets to the 336 Squadron, the remaining Mk 3 Vampires were transferred to the 337 Squadron in 1952. From 1 November the squadron was given responsibility for air defence in Northern Norway. A detachment was stationed Bardufoss Air Station. It had at any given time about six to eight Vampires. The detachment suffered six write-offs and fatal accidents. 
Four aircraft and equipment were destroyed in a hangar fire on 10 March 1956. The new 337 Squadron was declared operative in April. Norway initially took delivery of 60 F-86Ks during 1955 & 1956, of which half were allocated to the 337 Squadron and the other half to the 339 Squadron. Additionally four aircraft, of which two were allocated to 337, were delivered in June 1957 from Fiat licence-built production. 
The squadron was reactivated on 1 January 1980. Bardufoss Air Station was a natural choice for the base of the helicopters. It was the only airbase in Northern Norway to have an existing squadron of helicopters and it was the only airbase to have sufficient space to house a new squadron. The base was prepared through the construction of a new main hangar and several auxiliary buildings. However, only a year after the squadron moved in were the buildings completed. 
The Lynxes were originally planned retired about 2005. However, delays with the delivery of the successors forced the Air Force to retain their Lynxes for a further nine years. Several of the helicopters exceeded their designed lifetime of 7,000 flight-hours by 2,000 hours. In the end the lack of spare parts was the main hindrance towards keeping the fleet airborne. The last departure from a Coast Guard vessel took place on 7 December 2014, after which the type was officially retired. 
The contract stipulated that delivery of the NH90 would commence in 2005. However, delays in production caused the first unit to not be delivered before 2011. Norway is the first country to take into use the navalized NATO Frigate Helicopter (NFH) variant. The 337 Squadron aims to have the NH90 operational by 1 May 2015. Only nine units were delivered of the initially ordered 14 pieces and non of them are in use as planned in early 2019. 
The helicopters can be used on board seven coast guard vessels, the three Nordkapp-class ships, the three Barentshav-class ships and Svalbard.  They are used to extend the mobility and efficiency of the vessel's operation. At any given time at least two Coast Guard vessels have a Lynx on board, which remain on two-week cycles. They are predominantly used to patrol the coast off Troms, Finnmark and the Barents Sea, including the seas off Svalbard. 
The Coast Guard's main task is to assert and uphold Norwegian sovereignty over its inland waters, territorial waters and exclusive economic zone (EEZ). Its structure is centred around a peace-time role, and is part of the Royal Norwegian Navy. The helicopters thereby assist in roles relating inspection and assistance of the fishing fleet, removing foreign objects at sea, and search and rescue missions. 
In 2001, MIPRO developed and patented an Automatic Channel Targeting (ACT) technology. "ACT" provides automatic synchronization of receiver and transmitter frequencies, commonly known as "sync". The ACT function is an intelligent wireless system channel set-up feature. 
MIPRO MA-909 wireless system was nominated for Outstanding Technical Achievement in Wireless Technology in the 2006 TEC Awards. 
MIPRO ACT-82 wireless system was nominated for Outstanding Technical Achievement in Wireless Technology in the 2007 TEC Awards. 
MIPRO ACT-51 wireless system was nominated for Outstanding Technical Achievement in Wireless Technology in the 2008 TEC Awards. 
MIPRO ACT-727 wireless system was nominated for Outstanding Technical Achievement in Wireless Technology in the 2009 TEC Awards. 
MIPRO was established in 1995 by founder K.C. Chang, who had in 1970 designed the first FM wireless microphone in Taiwan and obtained the first patent for a condenser microphone capsule in Taiwan. 
In 2001 MIPRO introduced a technology they termed ACT (Automatic Channel Targeting). "ACT" synchronizes the receiver and transmitter frequencies. This was followed in 2006 by MIPRO introducing the first encrypted digital wireless microphone system and later, digital wireless tour guide & language interpretation Systems in Taiwan. 
The brand name "MIPRO" stands for "MI"crophone "PRO"fessionals. It is headquartered in Chiayi, Taiwan, with 200 employees and sales offices in China, Hong Kong, Germany, Korea and Austria.  MIPRO designs and manufactures professional digital and analog wireless microphones, wireless portable PA systems, wireless in-ear monitoring, tour-guide and portable wireless ENG receivers and other wireless audio systems. 
MIPRO developed and patented an Automatic Channel Targeting technology (ACT) in 2001. The "ACT" synchronizes (syncs) the receiver and transmitter frequencies automatically with a touch of a button. The ACT function has become the industry-standard for multi-channel wireless systems set-up. 
Margaret J. Schoeninger is an American anthropologist. She is Professor Emerita of Anthropology at The University of California San Diego, and until recently she was a Co-Director for the Center for Academic Research and Training in Anthropology, or CARTA. Her research is primarily focused on the evolution of the human diet and what this information can tell us about other aspects of human evolution. 
In 1970, Schoeninger received her B.A. degree in Anthropology from the University of Florida, and her M.A. degree in Anthropology from the University of Cincinnati in 1973. She then received her Ph.D. in Anthropology from the University of Michigan in 1980. 
His recent film scores include the POV/PBS documentary, Farmingville (2004); A Class Apart (2009), for the PBS series American Experience; the HBO documentary Monica & David (2009); and the feature film Graceland (2012), which he scored with his son, Adam Schoenberg, premiering at the Tribeca Film Festival. 
In concert, Schoenberg is best known for his piano improvisations. A 2010 review in Time Out New York described Schoenberg as "a pianist with a staunch commitment to pure improvisation," performing "heartfelt solo pieces that range from the bluesy to the rhapsodic." 
After years of physical therapy, Schoenberg returned to the stage to record his third album, Steven Schoenberg Live: An Improvisational Journey (Quabbin 1003). The concert was recorded at Sweeney Hall, Smith College, Northampton, Massachusetts, and released in 2009. It was reviewed in Jazz Weekly, All About Jazz, and Stereophile, where the magazine's music editor wrote: 
Schoenberg's latest album, 2014's Christmas Reimagined, features his improvisational style around classic holiday songs and carols. Recorded in Los Angeles at Sonic Veil studios, it is Schoenberg's first album not to appear on Quabbin Records. A review in All About Jazz calls the album, "a collection of refined miniatures played with grace and humor." 
The Women's 20 Kilometres Walk event at the 2015 Southeast Asian Games was held at East Coast Park, Singapore on 6 June 2015. 
Prior to this competition, the existing world, Asian, and Southeast Asian Games records were as follows. 
George Lewis Igaba-Ishimwe Maniraguha (born 16 June 2000) is a professional footballer who plays as a forward for Premier League club Arsenal. 
Lewis went on trial with English Premier League side Arsenal in March 2020, having previously trained with local side Solihull United, as well as Bournemouth and Ipswich Town. 
Lewis joined Arsenal in August 2020, signing a professional contract after being released by Fram Larvik. He reportedly signed a two year deal with the North London club. The move was seen as a surprise, as Lewis had only played in the Norwegian second and third divisions, and has no youth international caps. 
In 2007, Toebbe had her first solo exhibition at ThreeWalls, Chicago titled Stained Glass. Toebbe painted stylized depictions from memory of the Catholic churches she attended in her formative years in Cincinnati. 
In 2010, Toebbe presented a solo exhibition, Housekeeping, at Steven Zevitas Gallery in Boston. The exhibition was reviewed in Artforum and The Boston Globe. 
In 2011, Toebbe exhibited her work in the 12 x 12 program at the Museum of Contemporary Art (Chicago), in which, for one month, an artist is granted free rein of a 576-square-foot white cube on the main floor of the museum.  Toebbe presented three large-scale (100" x 75") collages. All three collages from the exhibition were acquired by the Saatchi Collection in London. 
In 2014, Toebbe produced recollections of the childhood bedroom and Veracruz home of her children's babysitter for a solo exhibition titled Shared at Steven Zevitas Gallery in Boston. The title Shared played on the theme of working class families, like Toebbe's, who lived in small homes where children shared bedrooms. 
In 2017, Toebbe had a third solo exhibition, Room Air Conditioner, at Monya Rowe Gallery. The gallery had relocated to St. Augustine, FL. In November Toebbe participated in a two-person exhibition with the painter Sarah McEneaney at Zevitas Marcus Gallery in Los Angeles. 
In 2019, Toebbe had a solo exhibition, Friends and Rentals, at Tibor de Nagy Gallery in New York City. Toebbe worked from photos she saved from Facebook posts to construct interiors she had never visited. Included were two paintings about properties she had rented with her family on vacation. Toebbe also mounted a solo exhibition, Swing State, at Sarah Lawrence College in Bronxville, NY. The work in the exhibition acted as a portrait of the artist as a middle aged woman and a Midwesterner. 
The immediate catalyst was newspaper reports of four white women raped in separate incidents, allegedly by African American men. A grand jury later indicted two African Americans for raping Ethel Lawrence and her aunt. An underlying cause was the growing racial tension in a rapidly-changing city and economy, competition for jobs, housing, and political power. 
With this influx and the subsequent increase in the demand for resources, race relations in Atlanta became increasingly strained in the crowded city. Whites expanded Jim Crow segregation in residential neighborhoods and on public transportation. 
"Historians and contemporary commentators cite the stage production of The Clansman [by Thomas Dixon, Jr.] in Atlanta as a contributing factor to that city's race riot of 1906, in which white mobs rampaged through African-American communities." In Savannah, where it opened next, police and military were on high alert, and present on every streetcar going toward the theater. Authorities in Macon, where the play was next to open, asked for it not to be permitted, and it was not. 
The events were quickly publicized the next day, Sunday, as violence continued against black people, and the massacre was covered internationally. Le Petit journal of Paris reported, "Black men and women were thrown from trolley-cars, assaulted with clubs and pelted with stones." By the next day, the New York Times reported that at least 25 to 30 black men and women were killed, with 90 injured. One white man was reported killed, and about 10 injured. 
An unknown and disputed number of black people were killed on the street and in their shops, and many were injured. In the center of the city, the militia was seen by 1 am. But most were not armed and organized until 6 am when more were posted in the business district. Sporadic violence had continued in the late night in distant quarters of the city as small gangs operated. On Sunday hundreds of black people left the city by train and other means, seeking safety at a distance. 
On Sunday a group of African Americans met in the Brownsville community south of downtown and near Clark University to discuss actions; they had armed themselves for defense. Fulton County police learned of the meeting and raided it; an officer was killed in an ensuing shootout. Three militia companies were sent to Brownsville, where they arrested and disarmed about 250 blacks, including university professors. 
The New York Times reported that when Mayor James G. Woodward was asked as to the measures taken to prevent a race riot, he replied: 
The best way to prevent a race riot depends entirely upon the cause. If your inquiry has anything to do with the present situation in Atlanta then I would say the only remedy is to remove the cause. As long as the black brutes assault our white women, just so long will they be unceremoniously dealt with.
An unknown and disputed number of African Americans were killed in the conflict. At least two dozen African Americans were believed to have been killed. It was confirmed that there were two white deaths, one a woman who died of a heart attack after seeing mobs outside her house. 
On the following Monday and Tuesday, leading citizens of the white community, including the mayor, met to discuss the events and prevent any additional violence. The group included leaders of the black elite, helping establish a tradition of communication between these groups. But for decades the massacre was ignored or suppressed in the white community, and left out of official histories of the city. 
The New York Times noted on September 30 that a letter writer to the Charleston News and Courier wrote in response to the riots: 
Separation of the races is the only radical solution of the negro problem in this country. There is nothing new about it. It was the Almighty who established the bounds of the habitation of the races. The negroes were brought here by compulsion; they should be induced to leave here by persuasion.
The New York Times analyzed the populations of the ten states in the South with the most African Americans, two of which were majority black, with two others nearly equal in populations, and African Americans totaling about 70% of the total white population. It noted practically the difficulties if so many workers would be lost, in addition to their businesses. 
After the Great War (World War I), Atlanta worked to promote racial reconciliation and understanding by creating the Commission on Interracial Cooperation in 1919; it later evolved into the Southern Regional Council. But most institutions of the city remained closed to African Americans. For instance, no African-American policemen were hired until 1948, after World War II. 
The massacre was not covered in local histories and was ignored for decades. In 2006, on its 100th anniversary, the city and citizen groups marked the event with discussions, forums and related events such as "walking tours, public art, memorial services, numerous articles and three new books." The next year, it was made part of the state's social studies curriculum for public schools. 
Iqra Rasool (born 15 August 2000) is an Indian cricketer and also known as 'Baramulla's supergirl'. She hails from Dangiwacha, Rafiabad located in North Kashmir and represented Jammu and Kashmir at the U-19 and U-23 level. 
Rasool has represented her state four times at the national level at Amritsar, Haryana, Goa, Himachal and Jammu.[citation needed] In 2015, she played a tournament in Telangana and took three wickets in the finals while playing in the under-17 team. 
In May 2017, she moved to West Bengal and joined Aditya School of Sports to play for Bengal. Further, she wants to play for India women's national cricket team after getting a No Objection Certificate (NOC) from Jammu Kashmir Cricket Association. Coached by Abdul Monayem, she currently represents Bengal at the domestic level. As of August 2017, Iqra is training at the indoor facilities of the Eden Gardens under Cricket Association of Bengal (CAB). 
As a tie-up deal between Michael Clarke Cricket Academy and newly opened Aditya School of Sports, cricketer Michael Clarke announced that there will be young talented cricketers travelling to Sydney on a 12-day programme. This team also includes Iqra Rasool. 
On October 31, 1992, the Governments of the Republic of Kazakhstan and the Republic of Turkey signed the Agreement on the reorganization of the university into Khoja Akhmet Yassawi International Kazakh-Turkish University. 
The song begins in the key of D major with the final chorus in E major. The video was directed by Shane Drake. 
The song was certified Platinum by the Recording Industry Association of America on November 11, 2014.  As of February, 2014, the song has sold 915,000 copies. 
Note: GP = games played, W = wins, L = losses, OTL = overtime losses, Pts = points, GF = goals for, GA = goals against, PIM = penalties in minutes 
The Giants would go on to defeat the Cardinals in the NLCS, then win the 2014 World Series, defeating the American League champion Kansas City Royals. 
The Dodgers and Cardinals met in the postseason for the fifth time, with the Cardinals having won three of the first four matchups, including the previous year's NLCS which the Cardinals won 4 games to 2. 
Alysh is an upright wrestling style. Competitors wear trousers, jackets and belts, and must hold on to their opponents' belts at all times. Their objective is to throw their opponents onto the mat. Throws are given scores between 1 and 6, based on what part of the opponent lands on the mat. The first player to win 6 points wins the match. Since 2008, Alysh is recognized by FILA, the world governing body for wrestling (the United World Wrestling (UWW) predecessor,) as "wrestling alysh". 
The development of the involvement of sports clubs with illegal drug traffic in South Kyrgyzstan is largely associated with IFWA and its former president Bayaman Erkinbayev. Erkinbaev also became a member of parliament in Kyrgyzstan in 2005. He was assassinated in September of the same year. 
Kent had an elder sister, Minna Algate, who died aged 106. Kent died in Plymouth in August 2012 at the age of 103. 
Under the late Joseon dynasty, Sunheung was a district capital overseeing the plains and hinterland around Mount Taebaek. Its mountains were the site of Korea's first foreign mining concern, a silver mine whose permit was revoked by the royal court in Seoul after a few months of operation in the early 1850s. 
Coverdale first joined Hawthorn in 1959 and played VFL reserves football before returning to his home town of Bairnsdale due to work commitments. He also had the misfortune of being injured in two separate car accidents during his early career. Nevertheless he won the La Trobe Valley Football League's "Best and Fairest" award in 1961, following a strong season with Bairnsdale. 
He was cleared to Hawthorn for the 1963 season and would kick 21 goals from his 20 senior games that year. A centre half forward, he appeared for Hawthorn in the 1963 VFL Grand Final, which they lost. After playing two more seasons he left Melbourne and rejoined Bairnsdale, which he would captain. 
Out of the Ruins is a choral work by Michael Nyman for an eponymous BBC documentary by Agnieszka Piotrowska in commemorating the first anniversary of the 1988 Spitak earthquake in Armenia 7 December 1988, which aired on the BBC's 40 Minutes.  The texts are from Grigor Narekatsi's Book of Lamentations.  It was conducted by Khoren Meykhnanejian. 
The Mayor of Middlesbrough is the executive mayor of the borough of Middlesbrough in North Yorkshire, England. The incumbent since 2019 is Andy Preston. 
Born in the town of Drayton, Purcell assisted his father, a farm-hand, in raising and farming dairy cattle.  In 1897, he purchased land of his own near Westbrook and began dairy farming. 
Purcell was a founding member of The Downs Co-operative Dairy Company Ltd, the Queensland Butter Board, and was a member of the Queensland Dairy Products Stabilisation Board, serving as its chairman from 1930 to 1950, and also served as Vice-President of the Queensland Council of Agriculture.  He also served as Chairman of the Clifton Shire Council from 1911 to 1912. 
Succinipatopsis is an extinct onychophoran genus known from Eocene-aged Baltic amber.  The only known species described is S. balticus. 
Isais is a monotypic moth genus in the family Lasiocampidae first described by Erich Martin Hering in 1937. Its single species, Isais leipoxaides, described by the same author in the same year, is found in what is now the Democratic Republic of the Congo. 
This article on a moth of the family Lasiocampidae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Sir Adam Roberts KCMG FBA (born 29 August 1940) is Emeritus Professor of International Relations at the University of Oxford, a senior research fellow in Oxford University's Department of Politics and International Relations, and an emeritus fellow of Balliol College, Oxford. 
He has published articles in numerous journals, including American Journal of International Law, British Yearbook of International Law, International Affairs, International Security, Review of International Studies, Survival and The Times Literary Supplement. His publications include: 
The men's discus throw at the 2018 European Athletics Championships took place at the Olympic Stadium on 7 and 8 August. 
He was called to the bar by Middle Temple in 1972 and became a bencher there in 2000. He was made a QC in 1991, a circuit judge in 2004, a senior circuit judge and Honorary Recorder of Manchester in 2008, a deputy judge of the High Court from 2004 to 2013, and an announcement of his appointment as a judge of the High Court of Justice allocated to the Queen's Bench Division was made in 2013. Illness prevented him taking up his appointment until October 2014. 
A planning law specialist at the Bar, he was heavily involved in the long-running Manchester Runway litigation. During his tenure as Recorder of Manchester he presided over many criminal cases, including sentencing in cases arising from Manchester riots, in respect of which he purported to set local sentencing guidelines which were later overturned by the Court of Appeal. 
This United Kingdom law-related biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ollukara is a residential area in the City of Thrissur in Kerala state of India. Ollukkara is the Ward 15 of Thrissur Municipal Corporation. It is located close to Mannuthy. It is the first village in Kerala to attain legal literacy. 
The Indigenous people of the area believe the lagoon is the resting place of Garriya, the Rainbow Serpent, an important figure in dreamtime legend. The lagoon was particularly significant to the Bigambul and Kamilaroi people, who held the third stage of their joint male initiation ceremonies at this site. 
Today Boobera Lagoon is recognised as a culturally significant site and motorised water sport is prohibited on the Lagoon. 
Renovate America developed the HERO Program in 2010 through a partnership with the Western Riverside Council of Governments (WRCOG), a public agency representing 18 communities within Riverside County. Western Riverside County became the first region to offer the HERO Program to its constituents. The HERO Program is now accessible to over 85% of Californians. 
As of July 2014, the HERO program has created 2,400 new jobs in the construction sector and has $250 million in funded projects on 12,500 homes in California. 
This article about a location in Hama Governorate, Syria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Royal Military School of Music (RMSM) trains musicians for the British Army's fourteen regular bands, as part of the Royal Corps of Army Music. Until August 2021, the school was based at Kneller Hall in Twickenham, however it moved to HMS Nelson in Portsmouth following closure of Kneller. 
The RMSM spent a century and a half at Kneller Hall, which was the country house of the court painter Sir Godfrey Kneller and was rebuilt after a fire in 1848. 
The school is open to men and women whose commitment to the army is for a minimum of four years. The Royal Corps of Army Music, the largest employer of musicians in the United Kingdom, promotes itself to potential recruits as an opportunity to earn a salary as a musician. The school's curriculum is not limited to martial music, but includes jazz, swing, middle-of-the-road, popular, baroque, mainstream symphonic and operatic music. 
In August 2021 the Headquarters of the Royal Corps of Army Music moved to Gibraltar Barracks in Minley and shortly later the school itself moved to Portsmouth. 
The Museum of Army Music, which was at Kneller Hall for several decades, had a collection of instruments, music, banners, medals, model bands, documents, prints, manuscripts, paintings and uniforms illustrating the history of military music. It is presently, Oct 2021, in storage pending a new location.   
The club was founded in 1979. The men's football team currently plays in the 6. Divisjon, the seventh tier of Norwegian football. It had a single-season stint in the 3. Divisjon in 2010. Professional footballer Are Tronseth started his career there. 
With all other disciplines having been cancelled, the 1975 Summer Universiade only featured athletics events and was referred to as the World University Championships in athletics. The competition was held in Rome between 18 and 21 September. 
Babelomurex lischkeanus, otherwise known as the Australian coral shell is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Muricidae, the murex snails or rock snails. 
The sea snail is most commonly seen with a pure white shell, that is somewhat jagged. The shell is approximately 50mm in length at adult size. 
The seas snail is found along the Eastern coast of Australia, from Tasmania to the Southern parts of Queensland. 
St. Joseph's Parish Shrine, Pavaratty is a Christian church located in Thrissur, Kerala, India. Located in a small town named Pavaratty, the church is popularly known as Pavaratty Palli. It is a parish of Syro-malabar traditions under the auspices of the Roman Catholic Arch-diocese of Thrissur. The fireworks connected to the grand annual feast on the third Sunday after Easter is famous. 
The Indian Postal Department issues a special pictorial cancellation stamp to post offices connected to popular tourist destinations and pilgrimages in India. The postal department has provided pictorial cancellation at Pavaratty post office from 13 May 1996. Pavaratti Church is the third Christian church in Kerala to receive this honor (Malayattoor Church and Bharananganam Church are the other two churches). 
The Pavaratty area was once under the Chittattukara Parish. Since the Chittattukara church is little far from Pavaratty, people of Pavaratty requested to extend the commencement of Tirukarma ceremonies a little. But the church officials ignored the requests, so the believers from Pavaratty decided to build a church of their own, which later became St. Joseph's Church. 
The annual grand feast of the shrine falls on the third Sunday after Easter. It is one of the most significant church festivals of Kerala. In 2019, it was the 143rd annual festival. In 2020, the festival was cancelled due to corona prevention protocols. The fireworks connected to the annual festival celebration is also famous. 
205 is a lucky number, and a Wolstenholme number. On an infinite chessboard, a knight can reach exactly 205 squares within four moves. There are 205 different ways of forming a connected graph by adding six edges to a set of five labeled vertices. 
Vettiyattil Krishnan Sreeraman (born 6 February 1953) is an Indian film actor, writer, TV anchor and social worker. 
South Gloucestershire and Stroud College, also known as SGS College, is a college of further education and higher education based in South Gloucestershire and Stroud, England. It was established in February 2012 following the merger of Filton College and Stroud College. The college is made up of six campuses located in and around Bristol, North Bristol, South Gloucestershire and Stroud. 
South Gloucestershire and Stroud College was formed when Filton College and Stroud College merged in early 2012. 
Stroud College started in the School of Art in 1860.  This was later renamed The Technical College, and was located in various buildings in  Stroud. Only in the 1950s, after the town council was gifted Stratford Park, did the college relocate to the present campus on Stratford Road.  The Art Department remained for many years in the Art School in Stroud. The Gloucestershire College of Art was created from the merger of the Stroud School of Art and the Cheltenham College of Art in 1959. 
SGS provides a number of qualifications including GCSE and A-level, as well as a number of vocational courses leading to BTEC First and National Diplomas and other similar qualifications, and some higher education courses leading HND, foundation degrees and full BA/BSc (Hons) degrees through partnership with the university of Gloucestershire It also runs EFL programmes for non-native speakers of English. 
The college offers a range of BA/BSc top ups, foundation degree and HNC courses in conjunction with the University of Gloucestershire. 
The college is a Centre of Vocational Excellence in gas engineering in partnership with Centrica and is a partner in a CoVE in aeronautical engineering led by City of Bristol College. 
South Gloucestershire and Stroud College (SGS) has six campuses, Filton, WISE, Queens Road, Clifton, Stroud and Berkeley Green. 
It has a workshop area known as Bristol Construction Academy which takes place in "R-Block". It does a variety of trades, including plumbing, brick laying, gas and engineering. 
The Academy of sport has partnerships with Bristol Flyers basketball team, Bristol Rovers, Bristol Rugby and Gloucestershire County Cricket Club, and the women's football team, Bristol Academy W.F.C., plays at the highest level in England, the FA WSL. Stoke Gifford Stadium is the arena that hosts the association football, american football and athletics which was opened in 2011. 
BIPA's state-of-the-art facilities include 9 rehearsal studios, TV studio, Mac suits, Workshop, Costume/Prop store, Learning Research Centre, Gym, Cafe and The Olympus Theatre and Studio 22 theatre which is host to over 40 productions a year. 
The Stroud campus is located in Stratford Road, Stroud. The campus has a remote education centre located in Dursley, Gloucestershire, and a co-operative sixth form site at Downfield Sixth Form with Marling School, Stroud High School and Archway School. The Stroud campus has a learning resource centre, construction workshops, learn IT centre, Envy hair and beauty salon, refectory, conference facilities as well as sports and leisure facilities. 
The SGS Queens Road Campus is located in the right wing of the Royal West of England Academy in Queens Road, Clifton, Bristol. The academy was Bristol's first art gallery and constructed in 1857. The campus' only department is the Bristol School of Art. 
SGS Berkeley Green opened in September 2017. The site is a 50-acre technology park, centred on the former Berkeley Nuclear Laboratories just south of the Berkeley Nuclear Power Station. Its main building, the John Huggett Engineering Hall, was converted from the laboratories former engineering hall building. 
The Sweden national under-20 football team is the football team representing Sweden in FIFA U-20 World Cup and is controlled by the Swedish Football Association. Sweden made their first and so far only FIFA U-20 World Cup appearance in 1991 and was knocked out in the group stage. 
The qualification to the FIFA U-20 World Cup for the European teams is the European Under-19 Championship. Therefore, the Swedish Under-20 team doesn't formally play any qualification matches. In 1991 the team was managed by Ulf Lyfors. 
This Sainte Genevieve County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
St. Clair is an unincorporated community and census-designated place (CDP) in Blair County, Pennsylvania, United States. It was first listed as a CDP prior to the 2020 census. 
In 2009, he was voted to LSU's All-Century team. He finished his college career at LSU's 14th all-time leading scorer and still ranks among the top 10 on the school's all-time free-throw percentage leaders. 
After college, Redden was selected by the Denver Nuggets in the third round (64th pick) of the 1986 NBA Draft.  He was waived by the Nuggets on October 12, 1986.  He played for the West Palm Beach, Florida Stingrays of the United States Basketball League during the summer of 1986. In 1987, he signed a two-year contingency contract with the San Antonio Spurs, though never played in a regular season NBA game.  He later played professionally in Europe. 
In 1988, at the age of 24, Redden died of ideopathic cardiomyopathy (heart failure) in Baton Rouge, Louisiana.  He is buried in Resthaven Gardens of Memory in Baton Rouge, Louisiana, near former LSU star Pete Maravich, a member of the NBA Hall of Fame. 
A native of Monroe, Louisiana, Redden was a two-time All-State player at Ouachita Parish High School (Monroe, Louisiana).  His high school jersey number (44) has been retired. 
Sergejs Ivanovich Naumovs (born 4 April 1969 in Riga, Soviet Union) is a former Latvian professional ice hockey goaltender. 
This biographical article relating to ice hockey in Latvia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Computed Tomography Enterography (CT Enterography, CTE) is a medical imaging technique which uses computed tomography scanner and contrast media to examine the small bowel. It was first introduced by  Raptopoulos et al in 1997. CT Enterography can be used to assess a variety of problems involving the small bowel, however it is mainly used to diagnosis and assess severity of Crohn's disease. 
CT enterography should not be confused with CT enteroclysis. In CT enterography contrast media is given orally, and in CT enteroclysis contrast media is administered through a fluoroscopy -guided positioned nasojejunal tube. 
While CTE's main use is in the diagnosis and follow up in Crohn's disease, many of the findings on Crohn's disease found on CTE can be caused by a wide variety of other conditions. Spasm and collapse of the small intestine, which can happen in Crohn's disease, can obscure imaging of that portion of the bowel even with CTE. 
CTE is preferred for the examination of Crohn's disease due to its increased spatial resolution and better ability to examine the wall of the small intestine than traditional CT studies of the abdomen and pelvis. Findings on CTE that indicate acitive inflammation in the small bowel, possibly caused by Crohn's disease, include: 
CTE is also used in examining if bowel inflammation improves after therapy and if the disease is progressing in a concerning way. 
Rexiella differs from Cladia by the presence of thick pseudopodetia with black to white, tightly packed, and loosely woven medulla. The genus produces the secondary compounds usnic acid and divaricatic acid. Rexiella sullivanii is found in Australia, New Zealand, and South America. 
According to Carey, love is the album's main theme, and the songs combine introspective and personal themes with celebration and fun. The album contains a mixture of R&B beats, and the songs incorporate elements of other genres, such as gospel and soul. Compared to Glitter, which featured a variety of sampled melodies from the 1980s, Charmbracelet has a softer hip hop and R&B sound to it. Cam'ron, Jay-Z and Freeway also appear on the album. 
"I had worked myself very very hard for many many years and I never took a break, and last year, I had just become very very exhausted and ended up just not really in a good place physically and emotionally. I learned a little more about how to work hard but also how to be healthy and take care of myself, and now, in general, in my life, I'm in a really good, happy place." 
"Charm bracelets have always had a personal and sentimental significance for me. Charms are like pieces of yourself that you pass on to other people, items that tell your story and that can be shared, like a song. The bracelet represents the foundation of this album, a body of work that encompasses many feelings." 
"Her carefully assembled new album resembles a computer preset in its soulless precision. But there's a reason. This tin Charmbracelet is a throwback to the soft and fuzzy Mariah the masses succumbed to in the 1990s before she began competing with DMX for street credibility. To bring in the customers, Carey delivers her parts here in the familiar high-pitched coo, sort of Minnie Riperton without soul, backed by just-press-play synth-strings and soft, sparkly keyboards." 
"Sunflowers for Alfred Roy", one of the album's most personal songs, is named after Carey's father; she makes direct reference to him and a moment they shared at his death bed. The song is backed with a simple piano accompaniment, and Carey recounts a visit with her father in his hospital room: "Strange to feel that proud, strong man / Grip tightly to my hand." 
At the 17th Japan Gold Disc Award in 2003, the album was nominated in the category of Rock and Pop Album of the Year (International). 
EA 205, letter number one of one, from the small town of Tubu (Biblical Tob). (Not a linear, line-by-line translation.) 
HMS Thunderer was a two-deck 84-gun second rate ship of the line, a modified version of the Canopus/Formidable-class launched on 22 September 1831 at Woolwich Dockyard. 
She was hulked in 1863 as a target ship at Portsmouth. Thunderer was renamed twice in quick succession: first in 1869 to Comet after (C / 1868 L1 Winnecke), and again in 1870 to Nettle. HMS Nettle was sold in December 1901 to Messrs. King & co, of Garston, to be broken up. 
This article about a ship of the line of the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Savlon is a brand of antibacterial personal care products with the active ingredients of  cetrimide and chlorhexidine gluconate. Commonly sold as a cream, the product range also includes antiseptic sprays, sticking plasters and other antiseptic products. 
The product name is derived from the original Imperial Chemical Industries (ICI) manufacturing site name of the Avlon Works at Avonmouth near Bristol, UK on the Severn Estuary. 
In 1992, Johnson & Johnson acquired the Savlon OTC brands from ICI. Since then, Johnson & Johnson manufactures and distributes Savlon products throughout Sub-Saharan Africa. In 2015, Johnson & Johnson sold Indian rights to the Savlon and Shower To Shower brands to ITC Limited. 
Also in 1992, ICI sold its Bangladesh rights to Savlon to ICI Bangladesh Manufacturers Limited, now ACI Limited. 
In June 2019, STADA Group of Germany acquired UK rights to Savlon from GlaxoSmithKline Consumer Products for its UK subsidiary Thornton & Ross. 
The active ingredients in Savlon products are two antiseptics, cetrimide and chlorhexidine gluconate. These agents were discovered and first developed by Imperial Chemical Industries (ICI). 
The Emiliano Tria Tirona Memorial National High School is a secondary public high school located in Gahak, Kawit, Cavite in the Philippines. 
Eventually, the Kawit High School, with a faculty of 29 teachers and student population of 1, 200 was temporarily opened in June 1947 at the convent of the Kawit Parish Church (now Saint Mary Magdalene Parish). 
In 1948, the kawit Junior High School became a fully-fledged high school and was renamed Kawit High School. It turned our its first graduates in 1949. 
On April 5, 1950, the classes of Kawit High School were transferred to its new site at Gahak, Kawit, Cavite. It was renamed to Emiliano Tria Tirona Memorial National High School, in honor to its benefactor. 
In 1962, the school was converted into a national high school through the efforts of the late Congressman Justiniano Montano and school principal, Mr. Guillermo Florencio. 
Acetylcholinesterase inhibitors are classified as reversible, irreversible, or quasi-irreversible (also called pseudo-irreversible). 
Organophosphates like TEPP and sarin inhibit cholinesterases, enzymes that hydrolyze the neurotransmitter acetylcholine. 
The active centre of cholinesterases feature two important sites, namely the anionic site and the esteratic site. After the binding of acetylcholine to the anionic site of the cholinesterase, the acetyl group of acetylcholine can bind to the esteratic site. Important amino acid residues in the esteratic site are a glutamate, a histidine, and a serine. These residues mediate the hydrolysis of the acetylcholine.  
At the esteratic site the acetylcholine is cleaved, which results in a free choline moiety and an acetylated cholinesterase. This acetylated state requires hydrolysis to regenerate itself. 
The irreversible phosphorylation of the cholinesterase occurs in two steps. In the first step the cholinesterase gets reversibly phosphorylated. This reaction is very fast. Then the second step takes place. The cholinesterase forms a very stable complex with TEPP, in which TEPP is covalently bound to the cholinesterase. This is a slow reaction. But after this step the cholinesterase is irreversibly inhibited. 
The time dependent irreversible inhibition of the cholinesterase can be described by the following equation. 
The reaction mechanism and the formula above are both also compatible for other organophosphates. The process occurs in the same way. 
The clinical guidelines for medication management in people with dementia recommend trialing an AChE inhibitor for people with early to mid stage dementia. These guidelines, known as the Medication Appropriateness Tool for Comorbid Health conditions in Dementia (MATCH-D), suggest that these medicines are at least considered. 
Administration of reversible cholinoesterase inhibitors is contraindicated with those that have urinary retention due to urethral obstruction. 
Compounds which function as reversible competitive or noncompetitive inhibitors of cholinesterase are those most likely to have therapeutic uses. These include: 
Compounds which function as quasi-irreversible inhibitors of cholinesterase are those most likely to have use as chemical weapons or pesticides. 
Northern Colorado is the name for a region in the state of Colorado and a proposed state in the northeastern portion of Colorado. 
North Colorado or Northern Colorado is a proposed new U.S. state which would consist of several counties in the northeast portion of Colorado  and possible counties from Nebraska and Kansas. 
Along with Weld County, several other counties were invited to or interested in being involved with this proposal: Morgan, Logan, Sedgwick, Phillips, Washington, Yuma, and Kit Carson. Also interested in joining the new state are parts of Nebraska. Colorado's Eastern Plain counties all may possibly be involved in the split, but Larimer County Commissioners indicated that their county would not likely approve of a split. 
 Mithlesh Tiwari is an Indian politician. He was elected to the Bihar Legislative Assembly from Baikunthpur constituency of Bihar in the 2015 Bihar Legislative Assembly election as a member of the Bharatiya Janata Party. 
This article about a Bharatiya Janata Party politician from Bihar is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
It aims to bring together Korean traditional culture and foreign culture in Itaewon through parades, food exhibitions, concerts, and more. The parades have up to 800 participants, and concerts often include K-pop artists of the Hallyu Wave. 
The festival will be held with vehicles in Itaewon-ro and Bokwang-ro under complete control. It will continue its major programs such as the opening ceremony, the Delive Good Concert, the World Traditional Culture Contest (World Culture Grand Prize), the global parade, cooking Itaewon, DJ party, and the closing ceremony (K Beauty Contest), etc. 
The global parade is the 'face' of the Itaewon festival. A large parade of 1,000 members from 32 teams, including UNESCO International Martial Arts Demonstration Team and World Folk Costume Team, will march 1.4km from Hangangjin Station to Noksapyeong Station, and the Chilseok-dong Gossam (Important Intangible Cultural Heritage No. 33) will mark the finale. 
You can taste the world's food yourself. You can taste traditional food from various countries, including European food and Asian food. 
That Good Night is a play by NJ Crisp, written with the intention of it being performed by Donald Sinden and his son Marc Sinden playing the central characters of the father and son. However Marc, who in 1991 had starred in Crisps' psychological thriller Dangerous Obsession, decided to produce it instead and so it became his first play as a Theatrical Producer. 
"Do not go gentle into that good night, Old age should burn and rave at close of day; Rage, rage against the dying of the light." 
It opened at the Yvonne Arnaud Theatre, Guildford on 2 April 1996 with the following cast (in order of appearance): 
Directed by Edward Hall (his first commercial tour), set designed by Michael Pavalka and lighting by Robert Bryan, critics at the time regarded the play as Crisps' finest work and both the production and performances received ecstatic reviews: 
The tour of the play coincided with Sinden's other son, actor Jeremy Sinden, becoming ill and dying of cancer on the 29 May 1996. The proposed West End transfer was cancelled. 
The film version, which Marc Sinden and Jo Gilbert are co-producing, was shot in Portugal starring Sir John Hurt and Charles Dance and was released in 2017. 
Gabriel Luis "Luigi" Romualdez Quisumbing[citation needed] (born July 12, 1979[citation needed]) is a Filipino politician, who served as Mayor of Mandaue from 2016 to 2019 and was the representative of the 6th district of Cebu from 2010 to 2016. 
Representative Quisumbing is a relative of the Lopez-Romualdez family. He is the grandson of Norberto B. Quisumbing Jr., who started the large Norkis Trading Corp. and that of the Norkis Group of Companies. 
Following the steps that most of his kinsmen took, Congressman Luigi joined the political arena in 2007 as a Provincial Board Member in the Province of Cebu, representing the 6th District. He later on moved to become the House Representative for the same district in 2010. He has since been re-elected to the same Congressional position in 2013, serving his second term. He is a former member of One Cebu Party and was later sworn in to be a member of the ruling Liberal Party (LP) in 2012. 
He was the candidate of the Liberal Party for the mayoralty position of Mandaue City in the 2016 election, together with Atty. Carlo Fortuna as his Vice Mayor. Rep. Quisumbing endorsed incumbent Mandaue City Mayor Jonas Cortes to run as House Representative for the 6th district of Cebu. Quisumbing, Fortuna, Cortes and their whole slate took oath as the representatives of the Liberal Party in Mandaue and the 6th District respectively on October 12, 2015. 
In 2012, first-termer Rep. Quisumbing laid bare his plans and goals for the 6th District of Cebu during a newspaper interview. His 4-point agenda became the guiding principles of his vision for the District: 
Aside from legislative work, Rep. Quisumbing finds time to be with his constituents, either for people-centered consultations or extending aid during dire situations[citation needed]. However, Congressman Luigi is best known among his constituents[who?] as a caring big brother, especially to kids, whom he admittedly finds the best inspiration for his job as a House Representative. 
 Having been elected as Mayor of Mandaue City for July 2016 to June 2019, Quisumbing committed himself to realize the platform of governance he announced during the campaign period of 2016.[citation needed] 
 Quisumbing has formed his transition team that will identify the people to fill-up key positions in the City Hall for the next three years under his leadership.[citation needed] 
Anem or Anim was a Levitical city in Israel allocated to the Gershonites, according to the Hebrew Bible, from the land of the tribe of Issachar (1 Chronicles 6:73) (6:58 in some Bibles). In the parallel location in the Book of Joshua, the name En-gannim or Engannim appears, and the two names may refer to the same town. 
The Andalusian independentist conspiracy in 1641 was an alleged conspiracy of Andalusian nobility for Andalusia to secede from Spain. The conspiracy was brought to an end in summer 1641 after the plans of rebellion were discovered. 
After more than three-and-a-half centuries, aspects of the episode remain unclear, and controversy about the conspiracy remains. 
Because the conspiracy was cut short, the true motives and ideas of the Andalusian nobles remain less than clear. The traditional interpretation is that nobles seeking power for themselves united in a secessionist movement similar to the successful movement in Portugal and the temporarily successful one in Catalonia. 
Although the issue of the Portuguese Restoration War is separate from that of Andalusian independentism, it is impossible to understand either without considering the other. 
The first Portuguese uprising began on 21 August 1637, suppressed in early 1638 by Margaret of Savoy, Vicereine of Portugal, Duchess of Mantua, daughter of Charles Emmanuel I, Duke of Savoy and niece of Philip II of Spain. 
Suspicions began to form that the duke was intending an uprising of his own to separate Andalusia from Spain. According to the conventional view of the conspiracy the idea first came from the Marquis of Ayamonte, who was connected with the Duke through a series of contacts. The plan counted on the support of Portugal and the collaboration of the French and Dutch fleets. 
Continuing to follow this same version of the events, the plotting led to many comings and goings over the Portuguese frontier, and grave rumors about Ayamonte began to circulate. In the summer of 1641, a special envoy from Madrid, Antonio de Isasi, intercepted a letter from Ayamonte to Medina Sidonia and sent it to court; the letter revealed the plot. 
Advised of the arrival of this royal emissary and to avoid the scandal of imprisonment, Medina Sidonia left swiftly for Madrid, where he visited the Count-Duke and confessed his conspiracy, apparently taken in by the attitude of Olivares, who made him believe he would use all his influence to defend his life, his home, and his credit. 
After the interview, the Count-Duke showed Medina Sidonia's confession of culpability to the king, from which the chief notary of the kingdom selected written testimony. In it, he incriminated the Marquis of Ayamonte of having induced him into this course of action, while denying any intention of declaring himself king of Andalusia. 
The conspiracy, which we can consider as a plot among the nobility, could not count on the popular masses, and their contacts seem to have been limited largely to the nobility, although at least one source[by whom?] says they were expecting support from the people of Seville and Jerez de la Frontera. 
Even in the delicate situation after the independence of the Netherlands and the restoration of independence of Portugal, the Catalan Revolt and the economic crisis (caused by military expenses, failures within the royal administration, and even traitorous activity within that last[citation needed]), Olivares' astuteness was such that the conspirators could not avoid leaks. The Count-Duke ended the matter by calling the two leaders to Madrid. 
After attending The Leys School in Cambridge, Calder graduated from the London Hospital Medical College in 1991 and passed FRCS in 1995. He was awarded the Laming Evans Research Fellowship from the Royal College of Surgeons in England and awarded a Doctorate of Medicine from London University in 2001 and FRCS(Tr & Orth) the same year. He worked in Australia for a year and subsequently in the USA following the award of a travelling Fellowship. 
Calder saw active military service in Northern Ireland, the Balkans and Middle East. He continued an interest in humanitarian aid through the Leonard Cheshire Centre for Conflict Relief and he worked in Sri Lanka following the tsunami in 2004 and subsequently assisted medical aid workers in the Pakistan earthquake of 2005. He was made a Fellow of the Faculty of Sports and Exercise Medicine, Royal College of Surgeons in Edinburgh in 2007. 
In 2017, Calder was awarded a PhD by the University of Amsterdam. His thesis was titled "Advances in the Management of Ankle Injuries in Athletes". 
In the same year, he was conferred the Fellowship of Faculty of Sports and Exercise Medicine (FFSEM) by the Royal College of Physicians of Ireland and the Royal College of Surgeons in Ireland, in recognition of support for Irish athletes and research into sporting injuries; and the Fellowship of the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Glasgow. 
Calder was appointed Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) in the 2021 New Year Honours for services to sport and exercise. 
Actinotus suffocatus, the crimson flannelflower, is a small, perennial herb endemic to the Australian State of Tasmania. It is primarily found in high-elevation habitats in wet situations, except in the far south-west of the island, where it occurs down to sea level in continually moist habitats. 
Actinotus suffocatus was described originally as Hemiphues suffocata by Joseph Dalton Hooker from plants gathered by R.C.Gunn at Fatigue Hill (nowadays Calders Lookout), near Mount Arrowsmith, in central western Tasmania, and later transferred by Leonard Rodway to the genus Actinotus. 
Actinotus suffocatus is a small, rhizomatous, mat-forming perennial herb with leaves in a basal rosette and a cup-shaped inflorescence of sessile flowers on a short, erect scape.  
Hammer was born in Indianapolis, Indiana. He began performing in Michigan at age 15 before studying at Michigan State University and the Manhattan School of Music. Hammer had familiarized himself with early jazz styles (his father had performed with territory bands during the 1930s), and while living in New York, he performed with musicians such as Red Allen and Bud Freeman.  During the early 1960s, he studied with composer Henry Brant (alongside Tom McIntosh and Julian Priester). 
After moving to Los Angeles in 1983, Hammer had an engagement with Slide Hampton he worked as instructor for jazz improvisation at El Camino Community College and played in the Jimmy Cleveland Octet. He also worked with Barbara McNair, the Tommy Newsom Quartet, and the MDA Labor Day Telethon. In 2004, he recorded with Floyd Standifer's quintet. He also arranged dance charts for the Nicholas Brothers, Skip Cunningham, Chester Whitmore, Jacqueline Douget, Deborah Lysholm, and Tim J Hickey. 
This article about a biographical documentary film is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Philippine House Committee on the Welfare of Children, or House Welfare of Children Committee is a standing committee of the Philippine House of Representatives. 
The College has around 370 students, of whom around 70% are Czech, and 30% from foreign countries, such as those in Eastern Asia, Russia and Eastern Europe.[citation needed] 
The College is governed by a volunteer Board of Governors drawn from the Czech Republic and the UK and is a public benefit organisation. 
The College provides numerous in-school and extra-curricular activities including rock-climbing, chess and poetry slams and many opportunities to become involved in charity fundraising and voluntary activities. 
"The Five" is the fourth episode of The Vampire Diaries's fourth season, premiering November 1, 2012 on The CW. 
When the episode aired on November 1, 2012, the episode was viewed by 3.27 million American viewers and garnered a 1.5 rating in the 18-49 demographic up 15% from the previous week. 
The island gains its name from its terrain which contains many bays, and inlets. It has a central portion in a circular shape, with one spit extending to the west,  and another to the east, in twisted fashion. It is shaped like and S on its side. 
Abaamang is a town in central Equatorial Guinea. It is located in Wele-Nzas several kilometres north of Nsemensoc. 
The sculpture was created by the Florentine sculptor Bruno Innocenti. The entire Statue was completed in 1965. 
The first published work of Upendra Bhanja is "Rasapanchaka". The first dictionary "Gita Abidhan" was written by Upendra Bhanja in Odia literature. Kabi Samrat was not the first title of Upendra Bhanja. He was rather entitled as "Bira Bara" as admitted by Upendra Bhanja in his kavyas such as Baidehisha Bilasa, Subhadra Parinaya, etc.   
The first Ph.D thesis on Bhanja was submitted by Dr. Satyanarayan Acharya, the First Researcher on Upendra Bhanja, in the year 1978 under UGC sponsorship. Consequently, in the year 1988 Dr. Abhimanyu Baral submitted the thesis "Odia reetikabya paramparare Baidehisha Bilasa" to Utkal University, Bhubaneswar. 
The greatness of Upendra Bhanja was in his "Alankara" use such as: Anuprasa, Jamak, etc. The style of presenting facts with comparable factors (upama) is very distinguishable in his 
Upendra Bhanja was also criticised for his obscure words. Once a modern poet Guru Prasad (See Odia literature) wrote "Upendra Bhanja means a woman and a Dictionary". Though he was criticised by the modernists, he can be comparable with Kalidas in using simile (Upama) in his kabyas. But above all, the role of Upendra Bhanja can not be denied during the Riti Yuga period of Odia Literature. 
In most object-oriented languages, such as Java or C#, references may be null. These references need to be checked to ensure they are not null before invoking any methods, because methods typically cannot be invoked on null references. 
The Objective-C language takes another approach to this problem and does nothing when sending a message to nil; if a return value is expected, nil (for objects), 0 (for numeric values), NO (for BOOL values), or a struct (for struct types) with all its members initialised to null/0/NO/zero-initialised struct is returned. 
Instead of using a null reference to convey absence of an object (for instance, a non-existent customer), one uses an object which implements the expected  interface, but whose method body is empty. The advantage of this approach over a working default implementation is that a null object is very predictable and has no side effects: it does nothing. 
For example, a function may retrieve a list of files in a folder and perform some action on each. In the case of an empty folder, one response may be to throw an exception or return a null reference rather than a list. Thus, the code which expects a list must verify that it in fact has one before continuing, which can complicate the design. 
By returning a null object (i.e., an empty list) instead, there is no need to verify that the return value is in fact a list. The calling function may simply iterate the list as normal, effectively doing nothing. It is, however, still possible to check whether the return value is a null object (an empty list) and react differently if desired. 
The null object pattern can also be used to act as a stub for testing, if a certain feature such as a database is not available for testing. 
Since the child nodes may not exist, one must modify the procedure by adding non-existence or null checks: 
This, however, makes the procedure more complicated by mixing boundary checks with normal logic, and it becomes harder to read. Using the null object pattern, one can create a special version of the procedure but only for null nodes: 
It is not a pattern from Design Patterns, but is mentioned in Martin Fowler's Refactoring and Joshua Kerievsky's Refactoring To Patterns as the Insert Null Object refactoring. 
Chapter 17 of Robert Cecil Martin's Agile Software Development: Principles, Patterns and Practices is dedicated to the pattern. 
From C# 6.0 it is possible to use the "?." operator (aka null-conditional operator), which will simply evaluate to null if its left operand is null. 
A language with statically typed references to objects illustrates how the null object becomes a more complicated pattern: 
Here, the idea is that there are situations where a pointer or reference to an Animal object is required, but there is no appropriate object available. A null reference is impossible in standard-conforming C++. A null Animal* pointer is possible, and could be useful as a place-holder, but may not be used for direct dispatch: a->MakeSound() is undefined behavior if a is a null pointer. 
The null object pattern solves this problem by providing a special NullAnimal class which can be instantiated bound to an Animal pointer or reference. 
The special null class must be created for each class hierarchy that is to have a null object, since a NullAnimal is of no use when what is needed is a null object with regard to some Widget base class that is not related to the Animal hierarchy. 
Note that NOT having a null class at all is an important feature, in contrast to languages where "anything is a reference" (e.g., Java and C#). In C++, the design of a function or method may explicitly state whether null is allowed or not. 
C# is a language in which the null object pattern can be properly implemented. This example shows animal objects that display sounds and a NullAnimal instance used in place of the C# null keyword. The null object provides consistent behaviour and prevents a runtime null reference exception that would occur if the C# null keyword were used instead. 
Following the Smalltalk principle, everything is an object, the absence of an object is itself modeled by an object, called nil. In the GNU Smalltalk for example, the class of  nil is UndefinedObject, a direct descendant of Object. 
In Lisp, functions can gracefully accept the special object nil, which reduces the amount of special case testing in application code. For instance, although nil is an atom and does not have any fields, the functions car and cdr accept nil and just return it, which is very useful and results in shorter code. 
Since nil is the empty list in Lisp, the situation described in the introduction above doesn't exist. Code which returns nil is returning what is in fact the empty list (and not anything resembling a  null reference to a list type), so the caller does not need to test the value to see whether or not it has a list. 
The null object pattern is also supported in multiple value processing. If the program attempts to extract a value from an expression which returns no values, the behavior is that the null object nil is substituted. Thus (list (values)) returns (nil) (a one-element list containing nil). The (values) expression returns no values at all, but since the function call to list needs to reduce its argument expression to a value, the null object is automatically substituted. 
In Common Lisp, the object nil is the one and only instance of the special class null. What this means is that a method can be specialized to the null class, thereby implementing the null design pattern. Which is to say, it is essentially built into the object system: 
The class null is a subclass of the symbol class, because nil is a symbol. Since nil also represents the empty list, null is a subclass of the list class, too. Methods parameters specialized to symbol or list will thus take a nil argument. Of course, a null specialization can still be defined which is a more specific match for nil. 
Unlike Common Lisp, and many dialects of Lisp, the Scheme dialect does not have a nil value which works this way; the functions car and cdr may not be applied to an empty list; Scheme application code therefore has to use the empty? or pair? predicate functions to sidestep this situation, even in situations where very similar Lisp would not need to distinguish the empty and non-empty cases thanks to the behavior of nil. 
In duck-typed languages like Ruby, language inheritance is not necessary to provide expected behavior.  
Attempts to directly monkey-patch NilClass instead of providing explicit implementations give more unexpected side effects than benefits. 
In duck-typed languages like JavaScript, language inheritance is not necessary to provide expected behavior. 
The null object pattern solves this problem by providing a special NullAnimal class which can be instantiated as an object of type Animal. As with C++ and related languages, that special null class must be created for each class hierarchy that needs a null object, since a NullAnimal is of no use when what is needed is a null object that does not implement the Animal interface. 
The following null object pattern implementation demonstrates the concrete class providing its corresponding null object in a static field Empty. This approach is frequently used in the .NET Framework (String.Empty, EventArgs.Empty, Guid.Empty, etc.). 
This pattern should be used carefully as it can make errors/bugs appear as normal program execution. 
As of 2001[update] census, Valajanagaram had a total population of 6,013 with 3,063 males and 2,950 females.  
This article related to a location in Ariyalur district, Tamil Nadu, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
National ad sales for the syndicated blocks were handled by Tribune Entertainment with barter basis available. Ads could have stitched together other programs throughout the three blocks. 
-Shows marked with a * do not fulfill E/I requirements. -The programming premiere and end dates are based on weekday broadcasts. 
All schedules correspond to markets which opted to carry DIC/Cookie Jar programming on weekdays. Except where affiliates opt to carry programming on weekends instead due to scheduling conflicts including paid programming, religious programming, and local morning newscasts. The block offered three separate exclusive programming feeds. This lineup only shows content that fulfill E/I requirements. 
1This programming feed is exclusive to The WB 100+ and that feed was intended for areas where they didn't opt to carry DIC Kids Network programming C programs, and it also ran under the Kids' WB brand in those markets. The feed was dropped in late 2005. 
Note: Most stations transitioned from DIC Kids Network programming C to programming B while other stations dropped programming altogether possibly due to the 2006 United States broadcast television realignment. 
The following is a list of stations, which carried DIC/Cookie Jar Kids Network programming between 2003 and 2009. 
Caragher received an athletic scholarship to the University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA) in 1985.  At UCLA, Caragher redshirted his freshman year, then was backup quarterback from 1986 to 1989, including two seasons behind Troy Aikman. Caragher was part of the UCLA teams that won the 1986 Freedom Bowl, 1987 Aloha Bowl, and 1989 Cotton Bowl Classic. 
From 2003 to 2006, Caragher was running backs coach at Kentucky and was recruiting coordinator from 2005 to 2006. Kentucky's 8-5 2006 season was the school's best record since 1984, and Kentucky's 2006 Music City Bowl victory marked its first bowl game since 1999 and first bowl win since 1984. 
Succeeding Jim Harbaugh, Caragher became head coach at Football Championship Subdivision school University of San Diego in 2007. Under Caragher, San Diego won three Pioneer Football League (PFL) titles: in 2007, 2011, and 2012. The Pioneer Football League named Caragher Coach of the Year following a 9-2 season in 2011, the team's third season with such a record under Caragher. At San Diego, Caragher coached quarterback Josh Johnson, who was selected in the fifth round of the 2008 NFL Draft. 
In the spring of 2020, Caragher returned to the University of San Diego as assistant athletics director for development, a role in which he assisted the university in athletic fundraising. 
Malka Older is an American author, academic, and humanitarian aid worker. She was named the 2015 Senior Fellow for Technology and Risk at the Carnegie Council for Ethics in International Affairs, and has more than eight years' experience in humanitarian aid and development. 
Her first novel, Infomocracy (2016), is the first in the series The Centenal Cycle, which also included Null States (2017) and State Tectonics (2018), which won a Prometheus Award in 2019. 
He has been known through the Hiroshi Ishiguro-inspired and Kokoro-built robot Geminoid-DK, built to resemble himself. The Geminoid-DK project landed him on the Time top 100 list of the most influential people in 2012. 
Nothing is known of Pritchett's life; he has appropriately been described as "elusive." He may have lived to 1879. Pritchett spent more than three decades living and working in Venice, producing admirable views of the city; he was one of a group of English artists who produced notable records of the scenes of northern Italy, a group that included John Wharlton Bunney, James Holland, the brothers-in-law Luke Fildes and Henry Woods, and, in a later generation, William Logsdail. 
Henry Alpheus Peirce Carter was probably the ablest diplomat ever to serve the Hawaiian kingdom. ...  He was a man of great energy, of positive views and facility in the expression of them, with a self-confident and forceful manner that sometimes antagonized those who disagreed with him. From 1875 until his death he spent most of his time abroad, as a diplomatic representative of the Hawaiian kingdom in the United States and Europe, where he became a familiar and much respected figure. 
There are over 9,000 Grade I listed buildings in England. This page is a list of these buildings in the district of North East Lincolnshire in Lincolnshire. 
Tarka the Otter: His Joyful Water-Life and Death in the Country of the Two Rivers is a novel by Henry Williamson, first published in 1927 by G.P. Putnam's Sons with an introduction by the Hon. Sir John Fortescue. It won the Hawthornden Prize in 1928, and has never been out of print since its first publication. 
Locations featured in the book include Braunton Burrows, the clay pits at Marland, Morte Point, Hoar Oak Water and the Chains. The book begins and ends in the vicinity of Torrington. 
The original edition featured illustrations by Charles Tunnicliffe. The book was extremely well-received on publication, attracting praise from Thomas Hardy and T. E. Lawrence, amongst others. Although not written for children, the book soon became popular with young readers. 
At the time the book was published, otters were generally regarded as vermin, but Tarka (and more specifically its later film adaptation) is credited with inspiring a transformation in public attitudes to otters. The book remains well-known, and is often used to promote the area of North Devon where it is set. The Tarka Line railway line to Barnstaple, and Tarka Trail long distance footpath and cycle path, are named after the book. 
Others to whom the book was significant included the nature writers Kenneth Allsop and Denys Watkins-Pitchford, who described it as "the greatest animal story ever written". 
The book has led to Britain's Tarka Trail and to the establishment of the Tarka Country Tourism Authority in North Devon. 
In 1978 Sir David Attenborough narrated an audiobook version of the story, released as a double audio cassette. 
The novel has been adapted into a film: Tarka the Otter. In 1974, Williamson began working on a script for a film treatment of the novel, but it was not regarded as suitable to film. Having previously rejected two separate offers from Walt Disney, Henry finally accepted an offer to make the film from English wildlife documentary film-maker David Cobham, whom he trusted. 
The movie, narrated by Peter Ustinov, was released in 1979, with a screenplay by Gerald Durrell. One of Williamson's sons, Richard, and his daughter-in-law appear in the film. It was voted the 98th greatest family film in a Channel 4 poll. The soundtrack for the film was composed by David Fanshawe and performed by Tommy Reilly. 
Professor Muhammad Umaru Ndagi (born in 1964) is a Professor of Arabic Linguistics in the Department of Linguistics and African Languages, University of Abuja, Abuja, Nigeria. 
In May 2017, Ndagi represented Nigeria at a regional workshop on text development for teaching Arabic to non-speakers in West and Central Africa, which was organized by the Islamic Educational Scientific and Cultural Organization (ISESCO) in Ndjamena, Republic of Chad. 
This article about a place in Salta Province, Argentina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article on an Eastern Orthodox church building in Serbia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a location in the Autonomous Province of Vojvodina is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rangers Women's Football Club is a women's football team that plays in the Scottish Women's Premier League, the top division of women's football in Scotland. The team is affiliated with Rangers F.C. in Glasgow, uses the club's training facilities, and wears the club's colours. 
Rangers L.F.C. was founded in 2008, as Rangers followed the example of Celtic, Hibernian and Aberdeen in developing a women's section. The formation of the team involved a partnership with Paisley City Ladies. Former Rangers youth academy coach Drew Todd was brought in to coach the team. Scotland women's national football team player Jayne Sommerville was signed as the new team's first captain. 
In May 2011, Alana Marshall became the first female Rangers player to be called up by the senior Scotland team. 
In February 2012, The Herald newspaper reported that the financial crisis engulfing Rangers also threatened the existence of the club's women's section. The team continued to operate, and ended the 2014 SWPL season with a second place finish, the club's best result so far. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
Walters is a city in Faribault County, Minnesota, United States. The population was 73 at the 2010 census. 
A post office called Walters was established in 1901, and remained in operation until it was discontinued in 1996. The city was named for a railroad official. 
County Highways 30 and 31 are two of the main routes in the community.  Minnesota State Highway 22 is nearby. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 73 people, 31 households, and 20 families living in the city. The population density was 365.0 inhabitants per square mile (140.9/km2). There were 36 housing units at an average density of 180.0 per square mile (69.5/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 98.6% White and 1.4% from other races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.4% of the population. 
There were 31 households, of which 22.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 54.8% were married couples living together, 3.2% had a female householder with no husband present, 6.5% had a male householder with no wife present, and 35.5% were non-families. 25.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 12.9% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.35 and the average family size was 2.75. 
The median age in the city was 43.8 years. 19.2% of residents were under the age of 18; 9.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 24.7% were from 25 to 44; 24.7% were from 45 to 64; and 21.9% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 54.8% male and 45.2% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 88 people, 34 households, and 24 families living in the city. The population density was 440.2 people per square mile (169.9/km2). There were 38 housing units at an average density of 190.1 per square mile (73.4/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 96.59% White, 1.14% Native American, and 2.27% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 6.82% of the population. 
There were 34 households, out of which 38.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0% were married couples living together, 14.7% had a female householder with no husband present, and 26.5% were non-families. 20.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 14.7% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.59 and the average family size was 2.88. 
In the city, the population was spread out, with 33.0% under the age of 18, 3.4% from 18 to 24, 21.6% from 25 to 44, 25.0% from 45 to 64, and 17.0% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 36 years. For every 100 females, there were 91.3 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 78.8 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $28,750, and the median income for a family was $26,563. Males had a median income of $21,250 versus $20,000 for females. The per capita income for the city was $10,472. There were 17.4% of families and 22.9% of the population living below the poverty line, including 50.0% of under eighteens and none of those over 64. 
Chino Creek is a major stream of the Pomona Valley, in the western Inland Empire region of Southern California. It is a tributary of the Santa Ana River. 
Chino Creek rises from underground in a storm water channel flowing southwards from a subdivision in southern Pomona, eastern Los Angeles County. 
Crossings of the creek are listed going downstream. Tributary entry points are also included to clarify locations. 
This is a list of townships in the Canadian province of Ontario. Townships are listed by census division. 
The section of York County north of Metro Toronto eventually became the Regional Municipality of York, and York County was dissolved. 
The event winners were distributed fairly evenly between the teams, with Morocco and Tunisia each taking thirteen gold medals and Algeria having the remaining ten. Tunisia topped the table by merit of having more silver medals. Track events were only officially timed to the tenth of a second. 
Yahoo! Toolbar is a browser plugin. It is available for Internet Explorer, Firefox and Google Chrome browsers. 
Originally aimed at being a bookmark and pop-up blocker, it evolved to provide app-like experience within the Toolbar. It has apps for leading sites like Facebook, Yahoo! Mail, Weather and News. It also allows users to bookmark sites and manage them. It continues to support features like button shortcuts to top internet sites like Amazon, Twitter, etc. It also allows access to several functions, including Yahoo! Search 
Several additional features are available on the Internet Explorer version, as well as incorporating Firefox-style tabbed browsing to IE version 6.0 (versions 7.0 and later allow tabbed browsing). 
The Yahoo! Toolbar has a well known and dark history of being bundled with other software.  The toolbar often installs itself without the user's knowledge or consent.  Yahoo! is known for paying developers to place the toolbar into programs in such a way that inexperienced users may unwillingly install it.  Installation of the toolbar can result in changes to the browser homepage, default search engine, and web-tracking preferences. 
Noah Gordon (born November 11, 1926) is an American novelist. He was born in Worcester, Massachusetts. 
Gordon was the son of a pawnbroker in Worcester, Massachusetts. He served in the US Army at the end of World War II. He reported for the Worcester Telegram until he was hired by the Boston Herald in 1959. 
Some of the topics covered within his novels include medical history and medical ethics. More recently he has begun to focus more on themes relating to the Inquisition and Jewish cultural history. 
Gordon's debut novel, The Rabbi spent 26 weeks on The New York Times Best Seller list in 1965. When publishing The Physician, the book was picked up by Random House - Germany, which promoted the book in Europe, where Gordon became a very popular in Spain and Italy. His novel The Last Jew won "Que Leer Prize" (Spain) and "Boccaccio Literary Prize" (Italy). 
Though Gordon's reception internationally has been quite strong, as of 2015, the Boston Globe described Gordon as relatively unknown in the United States. New York Times writer Carey Goldberg described a similar tension between Gordon's widespread popularity in Germany and relative lack of awareness in the United States in 1996. The reasons for  the European success of his novel The Physician were discussed in the Forward  
Ghulam Muhammad Maneka (died 2012) was a Pakistani politician who was Member of National Assembly of Pakistan and former federal minister during Benazir Bhutto cabinet. 
This is a list of electoral results for the Division of Griffith in Australian federal elections from the division's creation in 1934 until the present. 
The Abbottabad cricket team was a Pakistani first-class cricket team from Abbottabad, also known as the Falcons. Its home ground was the Abbottabad Cricket Stadium. 
It played in the Quaid-i-Azam Trophy competition since its debut as a first-class team in the 2005-06 season. 
This permutation can be applied to any sequence in linear time while performing only simple index calculations. It has applications in the generation of low-discrepancy sequences and in the evaluation of fast Fourier transforms. 
Consider the sequence of eight letters abcdefgh. Their indexes are the binary numbers 000, 001, 010, 011, 100, 101, 110, and 111, which when reversed become 000, 100, 010, 110, 001, 101, 011, and 111. Thus, the letter a in position 000 is mapped to the same position (000), the letter b in position 001 is mapped to the fifth position (the one numbered 100), etc., giving the new sequence aecgbfdh. Repeating the same permutation on this new sequence returns to the starting sequence. 
(sequence A030109 in the OEIS) Each permutation in this sequence can be generated by concatenating two sequences of numbers: the previous permutation, doubled, and the same sequence with each value increased by one. Thus, for example doubling the length-4 permutation 0 2 1 3 gives 0 4 2 6, adding one gives 1 5 3 7, and concatenating these two sequences gives the length-8 permutation 0 4 2 6 1 5 3 7. 
Permutations that generalize the bit-reversal permutation by reversing contiguous blocks of bits within the binary representations of their indices can be used to interleave two equal-length sequences of data in-place. 
There are two extensions of the bit-reversal permutation to sequences of arbitrary length.  These extensions coincide with bit-reversal for sequences whose length is a power of 2, and their purpose is to separate adjacent items in a sequence for the efficient operation of the Kaczmarz algorithm.  The first of these extensions, called Efficient Ordering, operates on composite numbers, and it is based on decomposing the number into its prime components.  
The Van der Corput sequence, a low-discrepancy sequence of numbers in the unit interval, is formed by reinterpreting the indexes of the bit-reversal permutation as the fixed-point binary representations of dyadic rational numbers. 
Mainly because of the importance of fast Fourier transform algorithms, numerous efficient algorithms for applying a bit-reversal permutation to a sequence have been devised. 
Another consideration that is even more important for the performance of these algorithms is the effect of the memory hierarchy on running time. Because of this effect, more sophisticated algorithms that consider the block structure of memory can be faster than this naive scan. An alternative to these techniques is special computer hardware that allows memory to be accessed both in normal and in bit-reversed order. 
Carpathonesticus simoni  is an araneomorph spider species of the family Nesticidae. It occurs in Romania, where it can be found in caves. It was transferred from the genus Nesticus to Carpathonesticus in 1980 by Lehtinen and Saaristo. 
St. Aidan's C.B.S. is an Irish Christian Brothers secondary school under the trusteeship of the Edmund Rice Schools Trust located on Collins Avenue, Dublin. It is beside Dublin City University. Most St. Aidan's students have progressed from the local primary schools such as Larkhill Boys National School; Our Lady of Victories, Ballymun; St. Patrick's National School, Drumcondra; and St. Fiachra's School, Beaumont. 
The school was opened in 1964 in two classrooms of Larkhill Boys National School under the invitation of Fr. Brady, parish priest of Whitehall. Br. Paul Hayes was the school's first principal. In 1965 the expansion of the school began.[citation needed] 
Around this time Albert College was moving to the Lyons Estate in Celbridge, leaving a site available for another school, of which St. Aidan's was quick to avail. The government were providing 90% capitation grants to schools to build and expand in addition to Donogh O'Malley providing free education for all, leading to increased numbers. Phase One of the new school was completed in January 1968 and phase 2 was completed by September of that same year.[citation needed] 
On 26 November 1998, the Taoiseach Bertie Ahern and the British Prime Minister Tony Blair visited St. Aidan's as part of the launch of the North-South schools link, which included schools in Limavady, Omagh and Cork. 
The school also has a library fully stocked with books of a variety of types and classifications. These range from classic and modern literature to books which aid students in studying their special topic for Leaving Certificate history. The library is also used for special themed readings in which students are invited to recite or read a favourite work or something of their own composition. 
There are two computer rooms in the school. They are used for many things including Transition Year projects such as the English Speaking Exam which requires a speech and a PowerPoint presentation; career guidance projects like curricula vitae and CAO applications as well as history research for special topics 
St. Aidan's offers Junior Certificate and Leaving Certificate courses and the Transition Year Programme. In addition to the mandatory English, Irish and Maths, for Junior Certificate, St. Aidan's offers Business Studies, History, Geography, Science, C.S.P.E., S.P.H.E., French, and Religious Education. There is also the choice of practical subjects: Woodwork, Technology, Technical Graphics, Music and Art. 
For the Leaving Certificate, students must continue to study English, Irish, Maths and Religion with most opting to study French. Students may also choose to study Biology, Chemistry, Physics, Business, Accounting, Economics, History, Geography, Construction Studies, Technology, Art, Music as well as the LCVP Programme. In 2009 93% of Leaving Certificate students went on to study at third level. This is the best performance of any non fee-paying boys secondary school in North Dublin. 
Public speaking mainly takes place in each of the junior years, there is a competition within each; every class selects its best speaker by way of a semi final. The final then has a representative from each class. Students, in general, choose their own topic on which to speak. 
In 2006 and 2007 St. Aidan's Students Andrew Jordan, Kevin Reilly, Eoin McCormac and Aaron Kennedy won the Irish Robocup competition. In 2006 this allowed them to proceed to the international competition in Germany and in 2007 Atlanta in the United States. The RoboCup was held in Bremen in Germany in 2006 and Atlanta in 2007. 
They students came back all the richer for the experience and deemed it a success. A trip was organised for a new group of students in 2011; the pupils involved raised 16,000 euro. 
This Programme has since become bi-annual, with the last Immersion Programme to Tanzania taking place at the end of October 2019 to November 7, 2019, with a layover in Amsterdam. 
In March 2017, 4th and 5th year students from the school partook in the European Parliament's Euroscola programme. This came following a national art contest won by Rodrigo Soberon Pena under the theme of European cities outside Ireland during 1916. 
Sebastian Schindzielorz (born 21 January 1979) is a Polish-born German former footballer who has previously played for VfL Wolfsburg. 
In May 2002, Schindzielorz  was called up to the senior Germany squad for a match against Wales, however he remained on the bench and was ultimately never capped at that level. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder born in the 1970s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Swan Valley Massacre was an incident in 1908 in which four Pend d'Oreilles Indians, members of an eight-person hunting party, were killed by a state game warden and his deputy in the Swan Valley in northwestern Montana. The state of Montana did not honor off-reservation hunting permits, although the hunting right was established by federal treaty. The game warden confronted the Pend d'Oreilles party and a gunfight ensued.  
In October, after the hunting party had camped for several weeks, Charles Peyton, a state game warden, together with a few deputized residents of the valley, entered the encampment three times to investigate the party. He demanded hunting licenses and harassed the band.  Peyton returned the next day with guns drawn, and demanded that the Pend d'Oreille leave by the next morning. To avoid confrontation, the band decided to move and began to pack up the camp. 
The next day, before the party could pack and mount their horses to leave (they had been delayed by two of their horses wandering away and having to retrieve them), Peyton arrived with his deputy, 32-year-old Herman Rudolph. 
Clarice gave birth to her son, naming him John Peter Paul.  He grew up telling the story of his mother and their hunting party for years. The tribe cut back on hunting parties outside the reservation for fear of similar attacks.  
Gleneve Taletia Grange (born 6 July 1995) is a Jamaican athlete specialising in the shot put. She represented her country at the 2017 World Championships without qualifying for the final. 
Her personal bests in the event are 17.29 metres outdoors (Atlanta 2017) and 16.54 metres indoors (South Bend 2017). 
This biographical article relating to Jamaican athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
First Jersey Credit Union was a federally insured, state chartered credit union operating from two branches in Passaic County, New Jersey. It was involuntarily liquidated by the New Jersey Department of Banking and Insurance and the National Credit Union Association on February 28th, 2018 and USAlliance Federal Credit Union absorbed the majority of FJCU's assets. 
First Jersey was originally chartered in 1929. The credit union converted from a multi-SEG credit union to a community credit union on 18 April 2005. They were a credit union involved with financing taxi medallions. 
James Southerland III (born April 28, 1990) is an American professional basketball player for the Yokohama B-Corsairs of the Japanese B.League. He played college basketball for Syracuse. 
After going undrafted in the 2013 NBA draft, Southerland joined the Philadelphia 76ers for the Orlando Summer League and the Golden State Warriors for the Las Vegas Summer League. 
On September 5, 2013, he signed with the Charlotte Bobcats. On December 11, 2013, he was waived by the Bobcats after playing in just one game. On December 19, 2013, he was acquired by the Los Angeles D-Fenders. 
On February 13, 2018, Southerland was traded by the Santa Cruz Warriors along with the returning player rights to Scott Wood to the South Bay Lakers in exchange for their original first round pick in the 2018 NBA G League Draft. 
James Southerland played for Boeheim's Army in the 2018 edition of The Basketball Tournament. In 4 games, he averaged 2.8 points, .5 assists, and 3.8 rebounds per game. Boeheim's Army reached the Northeast Regional Championship before falling to the Golden Eagles. 
Phytoecia pseudolateralis is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Stephan von Breuning in 1954. It is known from the Democratic Republic of the Congo. 
Keep It Hid is the debut solo album by the American blues-rock musician Dan Auerbach of the Black Keys, released in 2009 on Nonesuch Records. The second track "I Want Some More" was featured in Season 2, Episode 2 of Peaky Blinders. The final track "Goin' Home" was included in the soundtrack of the 2009 film Up in the Air. 
This article presents a timeline of the name Judea through an incomplete list of notable historical references to the name through the various time periods of the region. 
The name occurs multiple times as a geographic region in the Hebrew Bible, in both Hebrew and Aramaic: 
During the time of the New Testament, the region was a Roman province. The name Judea occurs 44 times in the New Testament. 
This biographical article related to Zimbabwean cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jason Mittell is a professor of American studies and film and media culture at Middlebury College whose research interests include the history of television, media, culture, and new media. He is author of three books, Genre and Television (2004), Television and American Culture (2009), and Complex TV: The Poetics of Contemporary Television Storytelling (NYU Press, 2015), and co-editor of How To Watch Television (NYU Press, 2013). 
Mittell taught Communication at Georgia State University from 2000 to 2002. Currently, he is a professor at Middlebury College, where he teaches a number of courses related to television, culture, and media, such as Television and American Culture, Theories of Popular Culture, Media Technology and Cultural Change, American Media Industries, Animated Film & TV, Narration Across Media, Media and Childhood in American Culture, and Urban American and Serial Television: Watching The Wire. 
His research interests include pop culture topics such as television history and criticism, media and cultural history, genre theory, narratology, animation and children's media, cultural historiography, and new media studies and technological convergence. He is currently writing a book on contemporary American television narrative. Mittell also writes a blog entitled JustTV. 
Being based in Bordwellian historical poetics, this books aims to "identify and describe the formal properties that create such textured narratives." To film scholar Sarah Kozloff, this means that Mittell's work shares some similarities with Seymour Chatman's work on film narration. 
Operation Nuke is the title of the second book in the Cyborg series of science fiction/secret agent novels by Martin Caidin which was first published in 1973, just prior to Cyborg being adapted as the television series The Six Million Dollar Man. The first paperback edition of the novel was published as a tie-in with the series. 
Steve Austin, an astronaut-turned-cyborg working for a secret branch of American intelligence, is set in pursuit of a criminal syndicate using nuclear blackmail to hold the world to ransom. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
An imposing two-storeyed masonry building, the Westpac Bank was erected in 1935 as the Bank of New South Wales. This building was the third premises built by the bank in Townsville. 
The Bank purchased an allotment on the corner of the Strand and Wickham Street in 1867 and premises and a manager's residence were erected two years later. Anticipating the future growth of Townsville in Flinders Street East, the Bank purchased two allotments on the corner of Flinders and Wickham Streets in 1875. Two-storeyed premises were erected in 1887. 
Renovations were carried out in 1961, 1966, 1968 and 1971. The exterior has been subject to minor alterations while the interior on the ground floor has been refurbished. 
Entrances to the upper floors are located on both Flinders and Stokes Streets. The Flinders street entrance, located in the banded section of wall on the southern end of the colonnade, leads to an entry vestibule and dogleg staircase. The stair, which extends to the third level, has terrazzo treads and risers, a timber handrail and a decorative iron balustrade. 
The third storey, originally a residence, is a tenanted office and training rooms for the bank. It is positioned close to the Flinders Street facade occupying about a third of the area of the floor below. The remainder consists of a large flat roof deck surrounded by the building parapet. The third storey is located behind the parapet and is not very visible from the street. A water tank sits above the roof of the third storey. 
Westpac Bank was listed on the Queensland Heritage Register on 13 May 2004 having satisfied the following criteria. 
The Westpac Bank, the third location of the Bank of New South Wales in Townsville and one of the largest banking buildings in north Queensland at the time of its construction, demonstrates the evolution of commerce in north Queensland and its contribution to the development of Townsville as a regional centre. 
The place is important in demonstrating the principal characteristics of a particular class of cultural places. 
In the choice of a classical style of architecture, central location and arrangement of spaces - a spacious banking chamber combined with shops, tenantable offices and residential accommodation on the roof level - the Westpac Bank is important in illustrating the principal characteristics of an interwar bank in a regional centre. 
A fine example of the commercial architecture of Francis Richard Hall, the Westpac Bank, with its well-ordered and classically proportioned facades, contributes to the Flinders Street streetscape. 
The place has a special association with the life or work of a particular person, group or organisation of importance in Queensland's history. 
The place has a strong association with the work of the Bank of New South Wales in fostering the development of Townsville in the 19th and early 20th centuries as North Queensland's principal regional commercial centre. 
 This Wikipedia article was originally based on "The Queensland heritage register" published by the State of Queensland under CC-BY 3.0 AU licence (accessed on 7 July 2014, archived on 8 October 2014). The geo-coordinates were originally computed from the "Queensland heritage register boundaries" published by the State of Queensland under CC-BY 3.0 AU licence (accessed on 5 September 2014, archived on 15 October 2014). 
The Samsung Galaxy A40 is a mid-range Android smartphone developed and manufactured by Samsung Electronics. Running on the Samsung's Android 11-based One UI 3 software, the device was announced on March 19, 2019. It was released a month later in Europe on April 10, 2019. 
The Samsung Galaxy A40 is a more compact variant of the Samsung Galaxy A30, being sold only in markets where the Galaxy A30 is not available.[citation needed] 
The Samsung Galaxy A40 has a 5.9-inch Super AMOLED 'Infinity-U' display with an 85.5% screen-to-body ratio. It has dimensions of 144.4 mm by 69.2 mm by 7.9 mm and comes equipped with an Exynos 7904 chipset, 3100 mAh battery and a microSIM and dual nano SIM slot which supports VoLTE. The device is only available with 64GB of storage and 4GB of RAM and is expandable to up to 512GB of external storage via the microSD card slot. 
The A40 is equipped with a dual rear camera arrangement with a 16 megapixel, f/1.7 aperture sensor as the main camera and an 'ultra-wide' 5 megapixels camera lens with an f/2.2 aperture as the second camera. The front camera is 25 megapixels. 
The A40 has a rear-mounted LED flash as well as video recording. Maximum video recording resolution is 2336x1080 pixels (Full mode). 
The 1999 Malaysian Grand Prix (formally the I Petronas Malaysian Grand Prix) was a Formula One race held on 17 October 1999 at the new Sepang International Circuit near Sepang, Malaysia. It was the fifteenth race of the 1999 Formula One World Championship. 
LongIsland.com was originally owned and operated by Invision.com, Inc. an IT firm that subsequently merged with IT firm mindShift in September 2007. In 2010, Massachusetts based Mindshift sold the domain during an online auction for $370,000.00. John Colascione owner of Long Island Exchange Inc. and Ralph Cristello owner of Internet Point Inc, were rival bidders, with Cristello ultimately winning the auction. In 2015 the two competitors merged into Long Island Media Inc. 
The Long Island Pizza Festival & Bake-Off is an annual charity event coordinated and hosted by LongIsland.com. The Festival has been featured on FoodNetwork TV's "All American Festivals," written up in The New York Times, spotlighted on local TV stations including News 12 and Long Island News Tonight. 
His new methods of discovering cosmic objects and measuring their mass by using gravitational lenses gained him international recognition, and he is acknowledged for coining the term microlensing. He was also an early proponent of the idea that gamma-ray bursts are at cosmological distances. 
His research concentrated on stellar evolution, gravitational lensing and gravitational microlensing, variable stars, gamma-ray bursts, and galactic structure. 
In 1999, he became the first astronomer to receive all three major awards of the Royal Astronomical Society, by winning the Gold Medal, having won the Eddington Medal in 1987 and the George Darwin Lectureship in 1995. 
In January 2006 he was awarded Henry Norris Russell Lectureship of the American Astronomical Society, "for his highly original contributions to a wide variety of fields including advanced stellar evolution, the nature of gamma ray bursts,  accretion in binary systems, gravitational lensing, and cosmology. His research has been distinguished by its creativity and breadth, as well as the stimulus it has provided to highly productive observational investigations". 
Sports-based youth development or SBYD is a theory and practice model for direct youth service. Grounded in youth development, sports psychology, and youth sports practice, SBYD aims to use the sport experience to contribute to positive youth development. Sports-based youth development is similar to sport for social development. 
SBYD is based on the idea that sport programs should be intentionally designed to ensure youth have a positive, not negative, experience.  SBYD programs are defined as sports programs with the following features: 
Others have applied best practices in youth development to the sport context and defined the factors most likely to facilitate psychosocial development as when youth are: 
Hoops 4 Hope is a non-profit organization in South Africa that uses basketball to help children from underserved areas become proactive leaders in their individual lives and in their communities. It has been in existence for over 15 years. Hoops 4 Hope in conjunction with its sister organization Soccer 4 Hope has given 10,000 children the opportunity to participate in sports. 
Up2Us, doing business as Up2Us Sports, is a sport-based youth development non-profit organization founded in 2010 dedicated to supporting young people through sport. Through their national coach program, Up2Us identifies, trains and supports coaches, many of whom serve as AmeriCorps members, to work with young people in underserved communities around the country. Their training teaches strategies for coaches to work with young people who have dealt with trauma. 
PLUS is a global campaign to raise awareness of the potential of sport as a natural, accessible, and inexpensive platform to transform people's lives for the better. Since 1984, PLUS has partnered with local communities, schools and organizations to train leaders how to better use sports to teach self-advocacy, leadership, literacy, and health. PLUS envisions a world where all sport-based organizations teach what children need to live safe, happy lives. 
Peace Players International has been working for almost a decade "to unite, educate and inspire young people in divided communities through basketball." There are 52,000 children involved in South Africa, Northern Ireland, Israel and the West Bank, and Cyprus. 
SquashBusters is a New England-based organization that provides middle and high school students with academic tutoring and squash instruction. The program, which has existed since 1996, has served over 800 students. SquashBusters is a founding member of the National Urban Squash and Education Alliance, a nationwide association of urban squash programs. 
Street Soccer USA is a non-profit organization under the umbrella of HELP USA that promotes the growth and development of a national network of grassroots soccer programs to achieve social change. SSUSA aims to get homeless men, women, and youth off the streets through innovative, sports-based solutions to eradicate homelessness and poverty in the United States. As of 2010, SSUSA has 18 teams across the United States. 
Reviving Baseball in Inner Cities (RBI) is a youth baseball program operated by Major League Baseball.  This youth initiative is designed to provide young people from underserved and diverse communities the opportunity to play baseball and softball.  The program was created by John Young in 1989 in Los Angeles, and now serves more than 200 communities. 
Beat the Streets National cultivates youth development in underserved communities by encouraging a desire for excellence, respect, teamwork, leadership, integrity, and perseverance through the instruction of quality wrestling programs. Beat the Streets National empowers our city leaders to deliver sustainable, quality youth development wrestling programs. 
The organization includes 8 accredited member cities working together to grow opportunities for youth: New York City, Philadelphia, Los Angeles, Chicago, Providence, Lancaster, Cleveland, and Boston 
Beedy, J.P. (1997). Positive Learning Using Sports: Developing Youth Sports Programs That Teach Positive Values. New Hampton, NH: Project Adventure Inc.       Beedy, Jeffrey (2016). Positive Learning Using Sports: The New Science of Sport-based Education. Global Children Publishers. Farmington, Maine 
Argiro Barbarigou (born October 22, 1967) is a Greek celebrity chef, restaurateur and cookbook author. She is also the Ambassador for the South Aegean, European Region of Gastronomy, Global Ambassador of Authentic Greek Cuisine. Argiro focuses on Greek cuisine. 
Barbarigou was born and raised on the island of Paros to Kostanza and Ioannis Barbarigou. She has one sister Nikoletta Barbarigou. In the 1970s, Barbarigou's father owned and ran a restaurant in Paros called Papadakis. Growing up she spent most of her free time assisting and helping their family restaurant. 
Having already worked in their family restaurant in Paros for over 10 years, she studied as a Chef at the Le Cordon Bleu School of Cooking in London. She studied as a Pastry Chef at the Valhrona Ecole du Grand Chocolat in Paris and at Stelios Parliaro's Pastry Chef School in Greece. 
Barbarigou revived her farther's Papadakis restaurant in March 1996 by re-opening the restaurant's doors in Naoussa, Paros. Papadakis presented an Aegean Cuisine menu with an emphasis on fish, seafood and authentic local products from all over Greece.[citation needed] 
In 2005, Barbarigou opened her second Papadakis restaurant set at the foothills of Mt. Lycabettus in  Athens. A Paros-inspired eatery the restaurant offers a menu focused on seafood and traditional Greek recipes with a modern presentation. 
In 2015, Barbarigou launched a series of new food retail products under her personal brand in all major supermarkets in Greece. The same year, she designed the menu for Alfa Piehouse and launched an exclusive line of cookware in collaboration with the Greek advertising agency, J.W. Spot Thomson and the Greek supermarket chain, Delhaize Group AB. 
She is currently working on several projects including the opening of her latest restaurant in the West End district of Washington D.C. 
Argiro has received multiple awards, including three from the French Gourmand Awards. Her monthly magazine is the no. 1 selling magazine in Greece in the category of Greek culinary.[citation needed] The magazine features topics of culinary interest for all ages and genders including a Monthly Menu, Unique Greek Ingredients, Cooking with Children, Delicious Sweets, Healthy recipes and Gluten free.c 
She is currently working on a new production called Aegean Mamas Know Best set to premier this fall. 
Argiro teaches Greek cuisine courses and offers seminars as phyllo dough expert at the Greek cooking school, Le Monde. 
The Old Firm is the collective name for the Scottish football clubs Celtic and Rangers, which are both based in Glasgow. The two clubs are by far the most successful and popular in Scotland, and the rivalry between them has become deeply embedded in Scottish culture. It has reflected, and contributed to, political, social, and religious division and sectarianism in Scotland. As a result, the fixture has had an enduring appeal around the world. 
Celtic and Rangers have played each other 426 times in major competitions: Rangers have won 167 matches, Celtic 159 matches, and 100 ended in a draw. 
At the turn of the 21st century, the two clubs jointly registered the 'Old Firm' term at the Intellectual Property Office; it was confirmed this was still being renewed as a trademark in 2021. 
The competition between the two clubs had roots in more than just a simple sporting rivalry. It has as much to do with Northern Ireland as Scotland and this can be seen in the flags, cultural symbols, and emblems of both clubs. It was infused with a series of complex disputes, sometimes centred on religion (Protestant and Catholic), Northern Ireland-related politics (Loyalist and Republican), national identity (British or Irish Scots), and social ideology (Conservatism and Socialism). 
Supporters of both clubs, when interviewed, have conceded that they do not particularly enjoy the intense atmosphere of Old Firm matches. 
After passing through the parliamentary process in early 2018, on 19 April the bill received royal assent, repealing the 2012 Act. 
Glasgow-based brewers Tennent's were the primary commercial sponsor of both teams for several years; any local business that only sponsored one would likely lose half its customers. Previously, glazing company CR Smith (who later had a deal with Celtic alone), communications firm NTL and English brewers Carling had also sponsored both clubs. 
In 2012, Rangers suffered a financial collapse leading to the liquidation of the commercial entity; however, the sporting assets were acquired by a new company which allowed its playing membership to continue unbroken (albeit in the lowest division of the Scottish football league system). As a result, this would mean that for the first time in 120 years, no fixtures would be played between Rangers and Celtic. 
Some Celtic supporters were particularly vociferous in their assertions, to the extent of a group paying for a full-page newspaper advertisement in January 2015 announcing that their club would soon play its first fixture against the new Rangers. 
It is regarded as a continuation of the same club by the SPFL chief executive Neil Doncaster; external governing bodies such as UEFA, the European Club Association and FIFA have never formally stated their position on Rangers but have issued general remarks about the continuation of a club's history when controlled by a new company. 
In July 2012, a large banner was displayed at Celtic Park during a game showing a cartoon zombie representing Rangers rising from the grave before being shot by a sniper, drawing criticism due to the gunman resembling a paramilitary from the Northern Ireland conflict, although Celtic escaped formal punishment over the matter. Celtic fan groups have continued to display banners claiming Rangers are 'dead'. 
Celtic and their followers also became involved in other legal proceedings relating to Rangers, including the outcome of the long-running EBT investigation. 
In the First World War, the Scottish Cup was suspended. Among the unofficial competitions which were held for fundraising purposes was the Navy and Army War Fund Shield, during which Rangers defeated Celtic in December 1914. 
* Four or more goals difference between the teams. Only includes the league and two major cups; other big winning margins were recorded in minor competitions such as the Glasgow Merchants Charity Cup. 
The ferocity of the rivalry has made it rare for a player to represent both teams during his career. Players who played for both sides of the Old Firm included Alec Bennett, Scott Duncan, Robert Campbell, and George Livingstone, who all played before the intensity of the rivalry had started prior to 1912, as well as later players: Alfie Conn, Maurice Johnston, Kenny Miller, Steven Pressley and Mark Brown (none of whom moved directly between the two clubs). 
In the 1890s, Tom Dunbar spent a season with Rangers between two spells for Celtic, but he and his brother Mick (see above) never played against each other in the fixture. In the 1980s, the McAdam brothers played on opposite sides, and directly against one another, on several occasions: defender Tom for Celtic and forward Colin for Rangers. 
Jimmy Simpson was a Rangers captain in the 1930s, while his son Ronnie Simpson was Celtic's European Cup-winning goalkeeper in 1967. 
When compared to other clubs in Scotland, the Old Firm maintain considerably higher attendances; Celtic's recorded crowds tend to be higher than Rangers as their stadium holds approximately 9,000 more seats. Both clubs (among others) have been accused of inflating their attendance figures by counting all season ticket holders in the crowd when many have not actually attended the match in question, with the accurate figures reported to the police for crowd control being lower. 
The intensity of the rivalry is fuelled by the clubs' historical duopoly in Scottish football, with most meetings between them being pivotal in deciding the destiny of a championship or cup and anything but a title-winning season seen as a major disappointment, particularly as it would usually mean 'the enemy' has won the trophy. 
Although there have been brief periods when silverware went elsewhere, there have also been long spells of domination by each Old Firm club, the 9-in-a-row championship was first set by Celtic between 1966 and 1974, then by Rangers between 1989 and 1997, and again by Celtic between 2012 and 2020. 
The longest sequence without an Old Firm title is three years between 1983 and 1985, while the longest unbroken run of championships between the two clubs began immediately afterwards and is ongoing: 35 seasons and counting since 1986 (overtaking a previous sequence of 27 years between 1905 and 1931). 
Although the initial Scottish Cup was played in 1874, 15 years before Celtic were formed, they have still won the competition more than any other club - 40 times, plus 18 runners-up - with Rangers not far behind on 33 (also 18 runners-up). 
There have been 14 Old Firm finals, while there have been just 39 finals involving neither Rangers or Celtic, 17 of which were in the 1800s. 
In 1805 present-day Wisconsin Avenue became a toll road and was later macadamized in the late 1810s and early 1820s.  The village continued to grow in the 1800s, with a church, school, houses, and other businesses built near the tavern.  By the 1850s the stagecoach service had ended due to the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad and the village was connected to rural communities to its east by a country lane that was called New Cut Road or Road from Turnpike to Broad Branch. 
Two schools were also built during the war.  A school for white children stood on a hill overlooking the road and a school for black children was farther east, near the road's intersection with present-day Broad Branch Road.  After the war New Cut Road was renamed in honor of General Ulysses S. Grant.  Due to development that resulted from Fort Reno, the area's population increased and Grant Road became a residential street and important part of the village's growth. 
The two-story stucco and stone commercial building at 4425 Wisconsin Avenue NW is one of several buildings in the historic district designed in the Italianate style.  The building is two-stories and three bays wide with a sloped roof.  It originally included a projecting storefront but that was later replaced with the current show window.  The building's main entrance is on Wisconsin Avenue, but the side door facing Grant Road originally served as a second entrance. 
The house at 4561 Grant Road NW, also known as the Payne House, is another two-story, two bay wide Italianate house.  It includes the original porch with decorative elements.  The vernacular I-house at 4565 Grant Road NW is two-stories and three bays wide with a small porch.  The last house in the historic district, 3812 Brandywine Street NW, is also two-stories and three bays wide.  It was designed in the Italianate style and includes a small porch. 
This biographical article related to Brazilian artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Granger is a town in Allegany County, New York, United States. The population was 538 at the 2010 census. The town was named after Francis Granger, United States Postmaster General. 
The area was first settled circa' 1816. The town of Granger was established in 1838 from the town of Grove, after having been part of many towns incorporated earlier in Livingston County and Allegany County. At the time the town was established it was called "West Grove", but assumed its current name in the next year, 1839. 
The Genesee River forms part of the western border of the town. Rush Creek, an important stream in the town, is a tributary of the Genesee River. The north town line is the border of Livingston County. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 577 people, 215 households, and 159 families residing in the town. The population density was 18.0 people per square mile (7.0/km2). There were 357 housing units at an average density of 11.2 per square mile (4.3/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 96.19% White, 0.52% African American, 2.60% Native American, 0.17% from other races, and 0.52% from two or more races. 
There were 215 households, out of which 30.7% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 62.8% were married couples living together, 6.0% had a female householder with no husband present, and 26.0% were non-families. 22.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.3% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.68 and the average family size was 3.04. 
In the town, the population was spread out, with 27.0% under the age of 18, 6.8% from 18 to 24, 27.7% from 25 to 44, 25.8% from 45 to 64, and 12.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 37 years. For every 100 females, there were 112.9 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 117.0 males. 
The median income for a household in the town was $25,875, and the median income for a family was $28,056. Males had a median income of $24,083 versus $18,250 for females. The per capita income for the town was $12,084. About 25.3% of families and 31.2% of the population were below the poverty line, including 51.1% of those under age 18 and 10.1% of those age 65 or over. 
The Permanent Revolution is a political theory book by communist leader Leon Trotsky. Its title is the name of the concept of permanent revolution advocated by Trotsky and Trotskyists in opposition to the concept of socialism in one country as advocated by Joseph Stalin and Stalinists. It was first published by the Left Opposition in the Russian language in Germany in 1930. 
Classic Rock (Local Version) (formerly known as Genuine Classic Rock) is a 24-hour music format produced by Dial Global, formerly by Waitt Radio Networks and then by the now-defunct Dial Global Local. Its playlist comprises classic rock music released from the 1960s to the 1980s from artists such as ZZ Top, Led Zeppelin, Aerosmith, Pink Floyd, Lynyrd Skynyrd, Tom Petty and Eric Clapton among others.  
Chilo niponella is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Thunberg in 1788. It is found in Japan and the Russian Far East. 
The first surviving shigajiku, Newly Risen Moon over a Brushwood Gate, was produced in the Five Mountains Zen monasteries during 1400. Of the eighteen inscriptions, six are connected to Nanzen-ji, the temple and literary epicenter for Zen monks during the early 15th century.  This connection highlights the importance of the social relationships of the clerics and the spiritual value of the painting. 
Though the west lake swells with water as spring arrives, / the emerald bamboo outdoors blocks the sight of boats. / Had the east wind facilitated his quest, / he would have returned by boat in moonlight to the frosted land of Wu faraway. 
Floating in a boathouse on the brimming spring river, / what could one desire in a sound sleep after mooring? / In nothing but insouciant boating would I spend the rest of my life, / with mountains along the white gull-dotted stream as my beauties.
Initially, all members of the class carried the name of a Governor (or equivalent) of Kenya, Tanganyika or Uganda, but later all of the Governor nameplates were removed. 
Professor Murnighan earned his Ph.D. (1974) and MS degrees (1972) in social psychology and a BS in psychology (1970) from Purdue University. Prior to joining Kellogg, he taught at the University of Illinois and the University of British Columbia. He also earned an MFA in Photography from the University of Illinois. 
He was the father to five children: Jack Murnighan (b 1969), Erik Murnighan (b 1972), Kate Keegan-Cook (b 1987), Annie Murnighan (b 1995) and William Murnighan (b 1999). His first marriage to Marilyn Becker ended in divorce. He married Elizabeth Keegan in 1991 in Urbana, Illinois. 
Professor Murnighan's research has been published in many different academic journals, primarily in organizational behavior, psychology, and economics.  He has published seven books, most recently Do Nothing! How to Stop Overmanaging and Become a Great Leader, released in June 2012 by Portfolio/Penguin. 
Buena Vista Battery was an artillery battery near the Buena Vista Barracks at the southern end of the British Overseas Territory of Gibraltar. It is located on a slight ridge in front of the nearby Buena Vista Barracks, which was once the base of the Royal Gibraltar Regiment. 
The area of the battery and barracks was originally used as a lookout post with an attached guardroom, which had to be rebuilt in the 1760s after falling into ruin. At the time the shoreline below was considered to be unassailable, as it was swept by strong currents. The lookout was subsequently converted into an artillery battery intended to protect Camp Bay from surprise attacks. 
The Government of Gibraltar has designated Buena Vista Battery as a Class A listed building under the Gibraltar Heritage Trust Act of 1989. The ownership of buildings associated with Buena Vista passed from the UK Ministry of Defence ownership to the Government of Gibraltar in 2011. The agreement swapped over 300 MOD houses and flats with the Government of Gibraltar and in exchange they agreed to build 90 new houses on remaining MOD land. 
The site is now being re-developed for residential use but the developers intend to retain, restore and preserve the barracks and the gun emplacements. The fifteen residences were said to sell for between one and two million pounds. 
In the estuary, the Bodie Creek Suspension Bridge is considered the southernmost suspension bridge in the world, and connects Lafonia with Goose Green. 
This article related to a river in the Falkland Islands is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The heptyl homologue of cannabidiol was identified as a natural phytocannabinoid and named cannabidiphorol (CBDP) in 2019. It had previously been reported as a synthetic compound, but was not identified as a natural product prior to 2019. 
Gordon was born on 16 May 1882 in Glasgow, Scotland, the fifth of seven children of Mary and Robert Gilmour, a wire weaver. She worked as a dressmaker before finding work on the stage. Joining a company bound for an American tour, she came to the U.S. in her twenties, apparently making a few appearances on Broadway in small roles, but primarily touring in stock companies. 
She entered retirement just as television reshaped the entertainment industry, making only a single appearance in that medium. 
She lived out her final years in Pasadena, California with her daughter and grandson. She died at age 81 on 23 August 1963 in Pasadena after a long illness. 
Hotels.nl, founded in 2001, is a hotel booking site for the Netherlands and Belgium. It was founded by Kees Eldering and Henriette IJzelenberg. 
As of 2018, the website is available in Dutch, English, and German. It is affiliated with over 2000 different hotels. 
Owner Kees Eldering was short member of the Dutch alt-right political party Forum for Democracy, but left the party because he found the party not democratic enough. 
It has a long hike from its trailhead and usually requires about 4-5 hours to hike it.  Visitors should be aware of the weather and not try to hike it during windy or days with heavy rain.  Also note that the trail is not paved and in some parts requires use of hands to clear certain parts of the trail.  
Due to heavy winter snowfall, the mountain and shrine are inaccessible for long periods of the year; however, skiing is possible on the mountain from April to mid-summer. 
The mountain is interesting in that it contains elements of both shield volcanoes as well as stratovolcanoes, although it is classified as a stratovolcano. 
This article about a location in Yamagata Prefecture is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Manly Oval is a sporting ground located in Manly, New South Wales, Australia, primarily used for cricket and rugby union. The ground serves as the home ground for the Manly Marlins and Manly Warringah District Cricket Club. Manly Oval has also previously been used to host National Rugby Championship games as a home ground for the Sydney Rays. The ground primarily hosts Shute Shield and Sydney Grade Cricket matches. 
As Troctolite 76535 is the oldest known unshocked lunar rock, it has been used for thermochronological calculations in order to determine whether the Moon formed a metallic core or generated a core dynamo. The results of these studies have been shown to support the core dynamo hypothesis. 
This Japanese biographical article related to motorcycle racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bergman was born in 1953 in Kibbutz Givat Brenner and contracted polio as a young baby. In his youth he was active in the Kibbutz's water polo team, and later joining the Israel Sports Center for the Disabled. Throughout the years he won 12 medals at the Paralympic Games. 
Bergman is active with the Israeli Paralympic Committee. In 2000; he was introduced into the International Swimming Hall of Fame. 
Linssen is a Dutch patronymic surname specific to Dutch Limburg. It and Linsen appear to be a hypercorrection of the name Lenssen/Lensen, where "Lens" is a local short form of the given name Laurence. Notable people with the surname include: 
Greenbank railway station serves the village of Hartford, Cheshire as well as the Greenbank and Castle areas of Northwich, Cheshire, England. The station is situated on the A559 road from Northwich to Chester. 
CLC trains were headed by locomotives in LNER livery. A link to LMS service was made by a shuttle service to Acton Bridge using LMS stock (this normally continued via Northwich, Middlewich & Sandbach to Crewe). This service was nicknamed "The Dodger", but was withdrawn in 1942. 
The signal box is situated to the north of the station  - this supervises the line from Cuddington through to Plumley and the various branches & siding connections from it (including the line to Sandbach and the now-disused link into the defunct Brunner-Mond chemical works at Winnington). 
The service to and from Manchester Piccadilly and Chester on weekdays and Saturdays is basically hourly (with a couple of weekday peak period extras to/from Stockport). 
On Sundays, the trains run every two hours each way and the eastbound service runs through to Southport via Bolton & Wigan Wallgate. 
Monofilament is made by melting and mixing polymers and then extruding the mixture through tiny holes, forming strands of line, which is then spun into spools of various thicknesses. The extrusion process controls not only the thickness of the line but its test as well. 
New materials, e.g., Spectra or Dyneema, are finding growing usage as fishing lines. Polyvinylidene fluoride (also sold as fluorocarbon or PVDF) is very much like nylon monofilament, but has several advantages. Optical density is lower, which makes the line less easily discernible. The surface is harder so it is more resistant to sharp fish teeth and wear. Furthermore, PVDF does not take up water and it is resistant to UV-light. It is denser than nylon, too, which makes it sink faster. 
Dyneema is also becoming very popular and it is much stronger, but it is used mostly as a braided fishing line. Because the elastic stretching is only a fraction of that of nylon monofilament, the contact with fish or bait is more direct. It is often used for deep water fishing from boats because lower diameters are used, which give less resistance to currents, and the low stretch makes bites easily detectable. 
Monofilament is not advisable for deepwater fishing, since it can absorb water, resulting in loose knots, and its sensitivity can decrease when it is wet. Monofilament degrades with time and can weaken when exposed to heat, sunlight, and/or saltwater. When stored on a spool for a long time, it may come off the fishing reel in coils or loops. It is advisable to change the monofilament line at regular intervals to prevent degradation. 
The transparency of monofilament fishing line makes it desirable for special effects where objects need to look like they are floating unsupported. 
It has also been used for string trimmers, musical instrument strings, sewing thread and bent in the shape of a staple for use as a septum piercing retainer. 
For these reasons, programs have been started to recycle fishing line, to keep it out of the environment. Specialized containers have been designed to collect fishing line for recycling. 
Nuevo San Carlos is a town, with a population of 22,657 (2018 census), and a municipality in the Retalhuleu department of Guatemala. 
The protected area was designated in 1964 to protect Viljandi Ancient Valley (included Viljandi Lake) and Viljandi Castle Park. In 2009, the protected area was redesigned to the landscape conservation area. 
A Current Sense Monitor is a type of monitor. It uses a high side voltage and reforms it into a proportional output current. It has a range of 20 Volts to 2.5 Volts. It is used for portable battery products. 
Former SAS Major Harry Maxim, reassigned from Number 10 Downing Street back to the Ministry of Defence after the demotion of his boss George Harbinger  from the post of private secretary to the Prime Minister, is part of a security detail at Westminster Abbey for a state funeral. The guest list includes the Queen of the United Kingdom and the President of the United States, as well as numerous other heads of state of various NATO member nations. 
Algar is relaxed and confident when she trades sex for secret information ("gave her little all for her Service" is Agnes's humorously self-mocking phrase), but her first time with Maxim is a disappointment. 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Let's Get the Mood Right is the fifth album by singer Johnny Gill, released in 1996. Certified gold in January 1997, it was his third and final album for Motown Records. 
Aulonium tuberculatum is a species of cylindrical bark beetle in the family Zopheridae. It is found in North America. 
The Chesapeake and Ohio Canal Association is a not-for-profit organization that supports the Chesapeake and Ohio Canal National Historical Park.  Its charter states that the association is "concerned with the conservation of the natural and historical environment of the C&O Canal and the Potomac River Basin." 
Pinchas Goldschmidt (born 21 July 1963) has been the Chief Rabbi of Moscow, Russia since 1993. serving at the Moscow Choral Synagogue. He also founded and heads the Moscow Rabbinical court of the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS) since 1989, and since 2011 serves as President of the Conference of European Rabbis (CER) which unites over seven hundred communal rabbis from Dublin to Khabarovsk. 
Goldschmidt arrived in Russia in 1989 and began playing an instrumental role in re-establishing Jewish life and the communal structures of the community, including schools, kindergartens, a rabbinical court, a burial society, kosher restaurants, soup kitchens, rabbinical schools and political umbrella structures, such as the Russian Jewish Congress and the Congress of the Jewish Religious Organizations and Associations in Russia (CJROAR). 
Goldschmidt was deported from Russia during September 2005, but was allowed to return to the community after three months, after an international campaign. In 2010 by special order of Russia's president, Dmitry Medvedev, he was made a citizen of Russia. He takes an active part in interfaith dialogue gatherings with Christians and Muslims in New York, Paris,[failed verification] Astana, Seville, Vienna and Moscow. 
He also leads the Conference of European Rabbis, the rabbinical umbrella group of Europe (uniting four hundred rabbis from Dublin to Khabarovsk) as the Chairman of the Standing Committee. 
Rabbi Goldschmidt has been awarded Certification as candidate for the Position of Chief Rabbi in Israel or in one of the cities in Israel by the Council of the Chief Rabbinate of Israel in the year 2002. Rabbi Goldschmidt is married and has seven children. 
In his role as president of the CER, Goldschmidt has focused on ensuring Jewish continuity in Europe, as well as fighting legislation across European countries against ritual slaughter and circumcision. 
On July 27, 2016 the Government of the French Republic awarded to Rabbi Pinchas Goldschmidt the title of Chevalier of the National Order of the Legion of Honor for his paramount contribution to the strengthening of relations between Russia and France. 
The Jerusalem Post in its yearly list of the fifty most influential Jews in the world, in 2018 placed Rabbi Goldschmidt on 31st place. 
In November 2018 Rabbi Goldschmidt has made an appeal to Israel and the Jewish world to stay away from nationalistic, populist and xenophobe parties and not to encourage controversial relationships in exchange for loud defences of the Jewish State and unacceptable declarations of friendship. 
Another common feature is an adjustable catch to restrict the opening of the device to either one direction or the other; for example, to allow the pet to come in for the night, but not go out again until the owner releases the catch the next morning. Some pets, mostly cats with their retractile claws and flexible paws, learn to circumvent one-way pet doors, especially the "flap-within-flap" design. 
Most also have a locking mechanism of some kind, and can be closed off by sliding a rigid plate into parallel rails on the left and right of the interior side of the pet door, useful during bad weather or when the owners are traveling with their pets. 
Pet doors are generally designed to be safe for any pet.  The panels are often designed with soft vinyl that does not trap or injure the animal. Cheap, easily replaceable pet doors are made from plastic and may not always be robust enough for large, boisterous pets. 
Pet doors are most often fitted in a plywood or plastic paneled door, into which it is straightforward to cut a large round hole, but can also be fitted in brickwork or (if a sealed unit is obtained with the hole already provided) in a double glazed door.  The latter is a relatively expensive option but may be the only alternative in some cases. Removable pet doors suitable for sliding glass doors are also available. 
Innovation has contributed to a new generation of more expensive pet doors making use of specific materials, automation, time control devices, and/or sophisticated sensors to deal with common problems like poor insulation and drafts, higher noise levels, insufficient pet safety and access difficulties. 
The Oxford English Dictionary records the first use of the phrase "cat flap" in 1957 and "cat door" in 1959, but the idea is much older. 
 The 14th-century English writer Geoffrey Chaucer described a simple cat hole in the "Miller's Tale" from his Canterbury Tales (late 14th century). In the narrative, a servant whose knocks go unanswered uses the cat door to peek in:
An hole he foond, ful lowe upon a bordTher as the cat was wont in for to crepe,And at the hole he looked in ful depe,And at the last he hadde of hym a sighte.
Modern cat flaps are popular in some countries, even in urban environments, particularly the United Kingdom where it is estimated that about 74% of cats have access to the outdoors. 
Dog doors are common in suburban North America, where they mostly lead to fenced-in yards.  Pet doors are also common between suburban homes and their attached garages, so that pet-related mess (cat box, dog food, etc.) can be kept in the garage with pets having free access. 
Some of the newest models use radio-frequency identification to electronically read a pet's microchip implant. This removes the need for a cat to wear a collar, which could become lost. Other high-end doors use a key with RFID. The key is attached to the pet's collar, and the electric door only opens for the assigned keys. 
In England, Ireland, and other areas with large numbers of livestock fences and walls in areas through which people walk on footpaths, stiles often have wooden, lift-up dog hatchways next to them, because dogs are not good at climbing stile steps and are often too heavy to lift over a fence. 
Pet barriers are typically made of fabric and are especially used to secure staircases. They are available in banister-to-banister and wall-to-banister options and are customizable and portable. 
Greenwood Township is a township in Columbia County, Pennsylvania, United States. The population was 1,952 at the 2010 census. 
The Sam Eckman Covered Bridge No. 92 and Kramer Covered Bridge No. 113 were listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1979. 
There were 721 households, out of which 32.6% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 66.6% were married couples living together, 6.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 23.3% were non-families. 18.7% of all households were made up of individuals, and 8.5% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.68 and the average family size was 3.06. 
In the township the population was spread out, with 24.7% under the age of 18, 8.3% from 18 to 24, 29.7% from 25 to 44, 25.3% from 45 to 64, and 12.1% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 38 years. For every 100 females, there were 102.7 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 102.1 males. 
The median income for a household in the township was $37,650, and the median income for a family was $41,473. Males had a median income of $28,884 versus $21,417 for females. The per capita income for the township was $17,104. About 3.7% of families and 6.0% of the population were below the poverty line, including 6.6% of those under age 18 and 10.7% of those age 65 or over. 
The club was created in 2007 after the merge of two clubs in the island, that in previous years agreed collaboration terms: 
After resigning to promote to LEB Plata in 2011, the next season promotes again to this league and this time accepts to play this league, the third one in the Spanish basketball league system. 
In May 2013, the team promotes to LEB Oro, but decided to continue playing at LEB Plata. One year later, they would be defeated by CB Prat in the promotion playoffs final, but finally promoted to LEB Oro after achieving a vacant berth. 
In 2019, the club played the Final Four for promoting to Liga ACB, but it was defeated in the final by Bilbao Basket. 
Note: Flags indicate national team eligibility at FIBA sanctioned events. Players may hold other non-FIBA nationality not displayed. 
Note: Flags indicate national team eligibility at FIBA sanctioned events. Players may hold other non-FIBA nationality not displayed. 
 Shotgun Express was a short-lived British R&B band formed in London in May 1966.  Although it achieved little success at the time, it is notable for having briefly included such subsequently famous musicians as Rod Stewart, Mick Fleetwood, Peter Green and Peter Bardens. 
The band emerged when Peter Bardens' instrumental group, Peter B's Looners, which included Bardens on keyboards, Peter Green on guitar, Dave Ambrose (who went on to become an A&R man, signing the Sex Pistols and Duran Duran) on bass and Mick Fleetwood on drums, decided to change styles and add vocalists.  They were joined by Rod Stewart and Beryl Marsden - who had been the leading female singer on the Liverpool club scene - and took the name Shotgun Express. 
The band played London clubs, and focused on performing soul classics.  Green left the band in late 1966 to join John Mayall's Bluesbreakers, and was replaced by, first, John Mooreshead and then Phil Sawyer.  The group released their first single, "I Could Feel The Whole World Turn Round" (Columbia DB 8025), in October 1966, but it was regarded as over-orchestrated by the band's followers and was not successful. 
Shotgun Express split up in early 1967 after Stewart left the band to join the Jeff Beck Group in February 1967.  Fleetwood joined Green in John Mayall's band before the two left to found Fleetwood Mac. Marsden joined The She Trinity, Ambrose joined Brian Auger, Sawyer joined Spencer Davis, and Bardens later formed prog-rock band Camel. 
This article about a Swedish association football competition is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born Martha Otito Osantor in Delta State, Nigeria, Osamor moved to the UK in 1963 to join her husband who was then studying in London. Osamor and her husband settled in Tottenham, where they had four children. Her husband died unexpectedly in 1975. 
Osamor was a co-founder of the United Black Women's Action Group (UBWAG). From 1977 to 1997 Osamor worked at the Tottenham Law Centre (now called the Haringey Law Centre) and during this time became  part of the Broadwater Farm Youth Association Mothers' Project on the nearby Broadwater Farm housing estate. 
From 1986 to 1990 she served as a Labour councillor representing the Bruce Grove Ward in the London Borough of Haringey, eventually becoming deputy leader. 
Following the Broadwater Farm riot, Osamor and Dolly Kiffin organised a civil rights demonstration  on 3 October 1987 and produced a Manifesto of the movement for civil rights and justice. She became a founding member of the Broadwater Farm Defence Campaign. 
A left-winger and Labour Party Black Sections national vice-chair, Osamor was nominated by most of the branches within the Vauxhall Constituency Labour Party as the party's candidate for the by-election in 1989. However, her candidacy was blocked by the party's National Executive Committee on the advice of Neil Kinnock. Kate Hoey was instead selected by the national party as the constituency's Labour candidate. 
Osamor was nominated for a life peerage by Jeremy Corbyn in May 2018 and on 26 November 2018 the Queen conferred upon her the title of Baroness Osamor, of Tottenham in the London Borough of Haringey and of Asaba in the Republic of Nigeria. 
After completing his college eligibility, Parks was drafted by the Indianapolis Olympians in the 1949 BAA Draft.  However, he opted to compete in the Amateur Athletic Union.  He joined the Denver Chevrolets with former teammate Blake Williams, and in 1950 the team was chosen as the U.S. National team's entry to the first FIBA World Championship in 1950. 
Parks played in all six of the team's matches as the team won their first five games to reach the final against host team Argentina.  Parks averaged 2.2 points per game for the tournament. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball player, coach, or other figure born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The level of Lake Managua raises significantly during the periods of heavy rain. The highest water level was recorded during the flooding of 1933. 
Lake Managua has been described by some authors as "the most contaminated lake in Central America." The lake has been severely polluted, mostly by decades of sewage being dumped into the lake. The city sewers have drained into the lake since 1927. It was only in 2009 that a modern wastewater treatment plant (built and operated by the British company Biwater) was opened in Managua, but even it treats only 40% of the city's wastewater. 
The lake today has no stable outlet, with only occasional floods to Lake Nicaragua through the Tipitapa River. Pollutants are thus concentrated. Despite the pollution, some of the people of Managua still live along the lake's shores and eat the fish. 
The Women's Suffrage Movement in the Western world influenced changes in female fashions of the early 1900s: causing the introduction of masculine silhouettes and the popularity Flapper style. 
Kents Lagoon is a rural locality in the Scenic Rim Region, Queensland, Australia. In the 2016 census, Kents Lagoon had a population of 56 people. 
Kents Lagoon has a population of 56 at the 2016 census. The locality contains 24 households, in which 51.6% of the population are males and 48.4% of the population are females with a median age of 38, the same as the national average. The average weekly household income is $1,624, $186 above the national average. 
It was founded in 1769, and was granted town status in 1938.[citation needed] The reconstructed Church of the Ascension was built between 1990 and 2006. 
Bataysk has gained international attention since unveiling a "monument that shows a man's hand gripping a nubile female breast", which officials say "will bring family happiness to men who touch it". 
The Gang of Four was a term used to refer to a breakaway group of four Labour politicians who founded the Social Democratic Party in 1981, including two sitting Labour MPs and a former deputy leader of the party. 
Bill Rodgers, Shirley Williams, Roy Jenkins and David Owen proposed a group called the Council for Social Democracy which ended up becoming the Social Democratic Party. Their first public move was the Limehouse Declaration, named after the house in Limehouse where David Owen lived and where the group met. 
In March 2017, the three then-living members of the SDP Gang of Four all said Jeremy Corbyn should step down as leader before the next general election originally scheduled for 2020 under the Fixed-term Parliaments Act. In the 2017 general election, Labour under Corbyn again finished as the second-largest party in parliament, but the party increased their share of the popular vote to 40%, resulting in a net gain of 30 seats and a hung parliament. 
The Independent Group have been described as similar to the Gang of Four, which was backed by Bill Rodgers. 
Mappowder is a village and civil parish in the county of Dorset in southern England. The parish lies approximately 9 miles (14 kilometres) southeast of the town of Sherborne and covers about 1,900 acres (770 hectares) at an elevation of 75 to 160 metres (250 to 520 feet). It is sited on Corallian limestone soil at the southern edge of the Blackmore Vale, close to the northern scarp face of the Dorset Downs. In the 2011 census the parish had 71 dwellings, 69 households and a population of 166. 
The village name comes from mapuldor, Old English for 'maple tree'. In 1086 in the Domesday Book Mappowder was recorded as Mapledre and appears in four entries; it was in Buckland Newton Hundred, had 33.3 households and a total taxable value of 8.3 geld units. 
The church, dedicated to St Peter & St Paul, is Perpendicular and was built in the late 15th and 16th centuries. However, it includes features remaining from an earlier 12th-century church. The chancel was extended in 1868 by the Wingfield Digby family of Sherborne Castle, who owned the village in Victorian times. 
Novelist and short story writer Theodore Francis Powys lived in Mappowder for the last 13 years of his life; he died and was buried here in 1953. 
Ethiopia's first revenues were issued in 1930. The earliest issue consisted of four stamps printed by Waterlow and Sons, with a Lion of Judah in the centre. This issue exists either with a background design of ornamental scallops or with a plain background. 
The Ethiopian Empire fell to Italy at the end of the Second Italo-Ethiopian War in 1936. During the Italian occupation, various revenue stamps inscribed Africa Italiana, Africa Orientale Italiana (Italian East Africa) or Colonie Italiane were used in Ethiopia, as well as in Italian Eritrea and Italian Somaliland. The cities of Addis Ababa, Dire Daua and Gondar also issued municipal revenue issues. 
In the ensuing period, postage stamps were initially overprinted for fiscal use, and later a new set similar to the 1930 issue was printed. The stamps still depicted the Lion of Judah. Between 1948 and 1964, these were issued several times, denominated in Maria Theresa Dollars or Ethiopian birr. 
After the Derg came to power during the Ethiopian Civil War, revenue stamps were issued in a similar design to the imperial issues but with different coats of arms and inscriptions. These exist for the Provisional Military Government of Socialist Ethiopia, the People's Democratic Republic of Ethiopia and the Federal Democratic Republic of Ethiopia. 
The Chamber of Commerce of Addis Abeba had its own revenues from 1949 to 1969. When Eritrea was part of Ethiopia, it still had separate revenues until the 1960s. 
This is intended to be a complete list of the properties and districts on the National Register of Historic Places in Morgan County, Illinois, United States. Latitude and longitude coordinates are provided for many National Register properties and districts; these locations may be seen together in a map. 
The brevity of the compendium led inevitably to a lack of scientific solidarity. For the uses of his classes at Vals, Gury lithographed a more scientific manual which was never published. 
Hourihan was born in Concord, Massachusetts. He graduated from Phillips Exeter Academy and Yale University. 
McGuireWoods LLP is a law firm with more than 1,000 lawyers in 21 offices worldwide. The firm's largest offices are in Richmond, VA, Charlotte, NC, and Chicago, IL. 
McGuireWoods traces its origins to two lawyers, Egbert R. Watson and Murray Mason McGuire. In 1834, Watson opened a law office in Charlottesville, VA. In 1870, he formed a partnership with his son-in-law, George Perkins in what would become Perkins, Battle & Minor. 
In 1991, McGuire, Woods, Battle & Boothe took over Cable, McDaniel, Bowie & Bond, a Baltimore law firm. After additional mergers, the firm changed its name to McGuireWoods in 2000. 
In 1998, the firm established its affiliate McGuireWoods Consulting to provide consulting services in government and public relations. 
In 2003, McGuireWoods merged with Chicago firm Ross and Hardies.  In 2006, McGuireWoods merged with Chicago-based Gordon & Glickson. 
In 2008, the firm merged with Helms Mulliss & Wicker in North Carolina. In 2009, McGuireWoods opened a London office after a merger. 
In 2014, McGuireWoods opened its Dallas office. In 2015, the firm entered into an alliance with FuJae Partners, a Shanghai-based law firm and opened a second office in Los Angeles. In 2016, the firm opened an office in San Francisco. As of 2019, the firm has 21 offices worldwide. 
McGuireWoods was named one of the most innovative law firms in North America by Financial Times in 2018 and 2019. 
The South Deccan Plateau dry deciduous forests is a tropical dry forest ecoregion in southern India. The ecoregion lies in the southernmost portion of the Deccan Plateau, and includes the southernmost portion of the Eastern Ghats. 
The Verrazzano Open is a professional tennis tournament played on clay courts. It is currently part of the Association of Tennis Professionals (ATP) Challenger Tour. It is held annually in Sophia Antipolis, France since 2017. 
The Strombo Show is a Canadian radio show hosted by George Stroumboulopoulos, which has aired since 2005. 
The show moved to CBC Radio 2 in November 2009. In an interview with ChartAttack, Stroumboulopoulos acknowledged that being on a public radio network gives him more flexibility to choose music without genre limitations than the Corus version of his show, which aired on modern rock and active rock stations, did. 
Every Sunday night on CBC Music, the show follows a freeform format, airing contemporary music personally chosen by Stroumboulopoulos. The program is not recorded in the CBC's main studios, but in Stroumboulopoulos' own home. 
Each show features a conversation and live acoustic performance from various guests. Past guests include major international artists like Queens of the Stone Age, Vampire Weekend, Slash, The National, Patti Smith, Band of Horses, Greg Graffin of Bad Religion, Ghostface Killah and Buddy Guy to Canadian talent such as Gord Downie, Joel Plaskett, Arkells, Tegan & Sara, Emily Haines, and City & Colour. 
Other regular features of the show include a 'Nod to the Gods' segment at the top of each show that celebrates important forces in music and the Magnificent Seven countdown highlights the seven best new tracks of the week, as determined by Stroumboulopoulos - its namesake also serves as a testament to The Clash. The Strombo Show pays tribute to Tom Waits' music on Ten With Tom and there is 'The Blend' - a 15-minute mix from some of Canada's best DJ's. 
Live sessions recorded for the program are also uploaded to Stroumboulopoulos' YouTube channel as The Strombo Show Sessions. 
On January 1, 2017, the show aired a special episode entitled The Hip 30, which consisted of Canadian musicians performing live covers of The Tragically Hip's songs and sharing their thoughts on the band's impact on Canadian culture. Participating artists included Blue Rodeo, Sarah Harmer, Barenaked Ladies, Donovan Woods, Choir! Choir! Choir! and Rheostatics. 
In 1900, she was appointed headmistress of All Hallows School in Bow, one of five small schools in the area, all of which were made of tin. In 1905, Devons Road Infants' School in Bromley-by-Bow, a new purpose-built school opened to accommodate all the children from the tin schools, with Grant again as headmistress. 
Clara Grant died in 1949 aged 82 at her home at 38 Fern Street and was buried in Tower Hamlets Cemetery, near to her Fern Street Settlement. She never married. 
Song Weigang (born 5 May 1958) is a Chinese water polo player. He competed in the men's tournament at the 1984 Summer Olympics. He is from Zhanjiang. 
This biographical article relating to a Chinese water polo figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nigel Shafran (born 1964) is a photographer and artist. His work has been exhibited at Tate and the Victoria and Albert Museum. In the 1980s Shafran worked as a fashion photographer, before turning to fine art photography. Talking to The Guardian journalist Sarah Philips, Shafran described his work as, "a build-up of images, often in sequences. There is a connection between them all. Basically, I'm a one-trick pony: it's all life and death and that's it." 
Platycholeus is a genus of small carrion beetles in the family Leiodidae. There are at least two described species in Platycholeus. 
Alojz Ihan (born 23 July 1961) is a doctor, specialist in medical microbiology and immunology from Slovenia. Beside his medical profession he is also an acclaimed poet, writer, essayist and editor. 
From Korsze, she was a highly ranked athlete during her career, placing within the season's top ten hurdlers on time between 1977 and 1981. Her personal best of 12.65 seconds came in Mexico City in 1979. She was a member of Gwardia Warsaw during her career. Perka changed her competitive name after marrying fellow athlete Wlodzimierz Perka. 
In the summer of 2015 he also joined the first team in the pre-season camp. He made his unofficial debut for the team against AC Omonia. Four days later he played and in the match against Vereya. He made his official debut for the team in a cup match on 22 September 2015 against Lokomotiv 2012 Mezdra. He also scored his debut goal for the team. 
Yordanov made his official debut for the team in First League on 31 May 2017 against Dunav Ruse. He signed his first professional contract with the team on 6 June 2017 alongside Slavi Petrov and Angel Lyaskov. 
On 5 September 2019, he scored three goals for the Bulgaria U21 team in the 4:0 away win over Estonia U21 in a 2021 UEFA Euro qualifier. 
This article about a location in Halland County, Sweden is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Transit was an American rock band from Stoneham, Massachusetts. From their formation in 2006 to their 2016 split, they released five albums, four EPs, and a split EP with Man Overboard. Although they largely took influence from emo acts such as Saves the Day, Death Cab for Cutie, American Football, Fairweather, Lifetime, and Hot Water Music their sound transformed from a fusion of pop punk and contemporary emo from their early releases into an indie rock sound by their final release, Joyride. 
Sidney Henry Kibrick (born July 2, 1928) is an American former child actor, most notable for appearing in the Hal Roach short subjects series Our Gang. 
Kibrick worked as a real estate developer after leaving show business in the 1940s. He kept in touch with Our Gang members at reunions, some of which he used to host. In 1991, he acknowledged that he had avoided the tragic lives that former child actors often ended up having as adults. In July 2017, he was reported as one of the few surviving cast members of the original Our Gang series. 
This article about a United States film actor born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Josh Hohneck (born 6 January 1986) is a New Zealand rugby union footballer. His regular playing position is as a prop. He has played for the Championship winning Highlanders in Super Rugby and Waikato in the Mitre 10 Cup. 
On 23 July 2020, Hohneck announced he left Gloucester to return to New Zealand due to personal reasons. Instead, he re-signed with  Otago for the 2020 Mitre 10 Cup. 
This biographical article relating to New Zealand rugby union, about a person born in the 1980s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sans Souci Press began as a reactionary underground printing house in Potsdam, Germany, in the late nineteenth century. Named for the Sanssouci Palace, the press produced pamphlets decrying the supposed liberalism of Wilhelm II's reign, and particularly his ties to the English.  
The Press is not to be confused with the later Wellesley Hills, Massachusetts firm of the same name. 
For many years it relied on reprints of 18th-century polemical pamphlets produced during the reign of Frederick the Great, whose relationship to contemporary political questions was not always immediately clear. This continued through World War One. 
This biographical article related to association football in England, about a forward born in the 1900s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ottiglio borders the following municipalities: Casorzo, Cella Monte, Cereseto, Frassinello Monferrato, Grazzano Badoglio, Moncalvo, Olivola, and Sala Monferrato. 
The actor Ernest Borgnine became honorary citizen in 2006, being his father Camillo Borgnino born in Ottiglio. 
This article on a location in the Province of Alessandria is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Beluguppa is a village in Anantapur district of the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh. It is the headquarters of Beluguppa mandal in Kalyandurg revenue division. 
This article about a location in Anantapur district, Andhra Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to Yugoslavian football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
East Clandon is a village and civil parish in Surrey, England on the A246 between the towns of Guildford to the west and Leatherhead to the east. Neighbouring villages include West Clandon and West Horsley. 
The word Clandon (first recorded as Clanedune) goes back to Anglo-Saxon times, meaning "clean down" (open downland) from the North Downs hills that rise to the south of the village. People settled here due to the availability of water that emerged where the high chalk downs meet the lower lying clay to the north. 
In 1544 Henry VIII granted East Clandon Manor to Sir Anthony Browne. The manor house, thought to have been close to where Hatchlands Park now is, was moated since times of unrest in the early 14th century. The house, and with it the village, changed hands many times during the next 200 years. 
The oldest houses in the village, Frogmore Cottage, Lamp Cottage, Old Manor Farm, Tunmore Cottage among others, had already been built when the London brewer John Raymond sold the Hatchlands Park estate to Admiral Boscawen in 1749. The present Hatchlands House was built for him with the help of prize money from his victory over the French, and it was completed in 1758, only three years before the Admiral died. 
Several houses in the village were built to his drawings, including Antler's Corner, Appletree Cottage, Meadow Cottage and 5 School Lane (1910), Prospect Cottages (1914), Snelgate Cottages (1926) and the St Thomas' Housing Society Cottages (1947). 
In 1945 the Hatchlands house, park and some land were given to the National Trust. When Captain Goodhart-Rendel died in 1959 the estate passed into the hands of two relatives, a split he regarded with misgivings. Late 20th century owners, the Dunne-Ritche estate, sold most houses around 1970, but a few still remain in their possession. 
The TV series Catweazle was shot in East Clandon (on Home Farm), West Horsley and the surrounding area in summer 1969. Home Farm still hosts the annual Hexwood Summer Fete. 
Francis Octavius Grenfell VC. Recipient of the first Victoria Cross of the First World War; born at Hatchlands Park. 
The average proportion of accommodation in the region composed of detached houses was 28%, the average that was apartments was 22.6%. 
In September 2018, the company rebranded as "Fremantle", introducing a new handwritten logo. Although it no longer uses the FremantleMedia brand name, it is still used as the legal name for Fremantle, as seen in their shows' closing credits. On 13 July 2020, Fremantle spun off Storyglass into an independent company within Bertelsmann. On 9 September, Fremantle merged Boundless and Naked Entertainment to form Naked Television. 
Fremantle is known for its ownership of a number of non-scripted formats, including the talent competitions Idols,  Got Talent, and The X Factor (the latter two with Simon Cowell's Syco Entertainment), and game shows via its ownership of the libraries of U.S. producer Goodson-Todman Productions, Australian producer Reg Grundy, and others, which includes formats such as Family Feud, The Price is Right,  and Sale of the Century among others. 
Via the Reg Grundy library, Fremantle Australia owns a number of notable Australian dramas and soap operas, including the long-running Neighbours and Prisoner. 
Fremantle has production units across its global offices and network of production companies and labels on the ground in over 26 territories. 
In the United States, Fremantle's largest production and distribution division, Fremantle North America is based in Burbank, California, and includes a portfolio of companies. Fremantle North America produces and distributes scripted and alternative programs for broadcast and cable networks, syndication, and streaming platforms. 
In addition, Fremantle North America owns several other smaller production companies; among these are Thom Beers' Original Productions (responsible for creation and production of numerous reality shows such as Deadliest Catch, Ax Men, and Ice Road Truckers) and Amygdala Music, Leslie Beers' production and composition firm that writes themes, incidental, and featured music for Original Productions shows.  
They were members of the Big East Conference and finished the season with a record of 30-7 overall, 10-4 in Big East play. They won the Big East Tournament championship, and in the 48-team NCAA Tournament they advanced to the national championship game, but lost to North Carolina. 
Senior center Ed Spriggs started the first game of the year but did not start again, instead coming off the bench to relieve Ewing, especially during the middle of games when Ewing had to come out of play with foul trouble. Spriggs' greatest success came in mid-season with a 14-point, seven-rebound effort against Syracuse. 
Sophomore Fred Brown started all 37 games and played point guard all season. He shot 50% from the field, had 131 assists, and set a single-season school record with 80 steals. Senior guard-forward Eric Smith shot 47.9% from the field, averaging 9.5 points per game, and had 75 steals and 116 assists. Early in the year, he scored 17 points against Villanova, and he had 11 points in the Missouri game. 
Floyd was among five seniors on the team to graduate in 1982, having been the Hoyas' top scorer in all four of his seasons with the team; he remains the top-scoring player in Georgetown history. Drafted in the first round in 1982 by the New Jersey Nets, he had a very successful NBA career, playing for the Nets, Golden State Warriors, and Houston Rockets before retiring in 1995. 
Heisteria is a genus of plant in family Olacaceae. It contains the following species (but this list may be incomplete): 
"The Craziest Thing" is a song recorded by Canadian country music artist Rick Tippe. It was released in 1996 as the first single from his second studio album, Get Hot or Go Home. It peaked at number 9 on the RPM Country Tracks chart in January 1997. 
Three Island Crossing State Park is a history-focused public recreation area in Glenns Ferry, Elmore County, Idaho, United States, that interprets the site of a ford of the Snake River on the Oregon Trail. The state park features camping, cabins, disk golf, and a visitors center with interpretive exhibits. 
Residential animals of this state park feature deer, waterfowl, fox, swans, songbirds, pelicans, eagles. 
Charter flights are operated by Blue Wing Airlines and Gum Air for which this airport is their mainhub and homebase. 
The museum was established in 1983 to display excavations unearthed in the area from a   fortified city that once stood in its place from the 6th century BC to the 5th century AD. The artifacts of the museum were also discovered in Olympus, the archaeological site of ancient Leivithra and the wider Pieria regional unit.  
On the ground floor of the museum are a number of important statues, including the Statue of Dionysos, the Asklepios Daughters and many others found in the ancient baths. The votive statues of Isis and Aphrodite Hypolympia, were unearthed from the Sanctuary of Isis. The heads of Demeter were also found in the sanctuary. The museum also contains notable exhibits from the necropolis, including further votive offerings found in Macedonian tombs and a wide collection of wooden figurines.  
On a stone slab there are also the remains of an alliance agreement between the Macedonian king Philip V and the citizens of Lysimacheia in Thrace. 
Among the remains of the great thermal baths were several statues representing Asklepios, the healer and protector of the body, and parts of his family. Next to his wife Epione were statues of his sons Podaleirios and Machaon. From his daughters, statues of Hygieia, Panakeia, Akeso and Iaso were found. 
A statue of Perseus, the last king of Macedon (reign from 179 to 168 BC), and stone writing plaques are exhibited in the museum.  
Exhibited objects of this sanctuary are cultic statues of Zeus and Hera as well as two stone statuettes of sitting eagles. 
From early Christian times, stone reliefs, crucifixes and objects of the liturgy can be seen. From the Leda House, a fully preserved marble table, supported by a lion statue, is exhibited. In addition to numerous other statues and statuettes, a mosaic from the Villa of Dionysus is depicted, which represents a Medusa head in a circular frame. 
The predominant material for coin production was silver. It was mainly heavy, precious, silver coins, of which pieces were found in Mesopotamia, Egypt or the Levant, and also smaller coins, thought to for the payments of daily life, were minted. 
In addition to the usual means of payment, coins showing gods such as Zeus, Athene or Artemis were found. 
A further innovation of the Roman coin was that for the first time all coins had a uniform appearance. 
A plow from the third century AD, which was found south of the Hellenistic theater, should be mentioned separately. From the 1st century BC, A hand scale was found which was very finely adjustable. Also from the 1st century BC, is a speculum, an instrument used for gynecological examinations. 
This excavation lies at the eastern foot of the lower Olympus. The presence of people was proofed from the first half of the 7th millennium BC. First settlements date from the time of the Middle and Late Neolithic Period (5600 - 4500 BC). Some thousand years later (2100 - 1050 BC) hill graves (tumuli) were excavated. The central tomb was considerably larger and deeper than the surrounding tombs, indicating a special status of the deceased. 
A Roman cemetery from the 4th century AD consists of 16 graves for 12 adults and 4 children. The numerous grave attachments (Kterismata) were completely preserved. 
Named after the river Tribina (or Derbina), the remains of a settlement dating from the time around 2500 BC. were unearthed. From the Mycenaean era there are 24 tombs, in which either individual persons or up to three persons were buried. The tombs do not have a uniform shape, but they have grave attachments such as vessels, weapons and jewelry. 
Located at the foot of Mount Olympus; The first traces of the presence of people dating around the middle of the 2nd millennium BC. A tumuli from the late Bronze Age was surrounded by a stone ring (10 m diameter). Within the hill grave nine separate graves were found. The tumuli was marked by the collection and arrangement of stones in a certain form (Sema). 
The Dionysus mosaic is exhibited in this building, which is located west of the museum and was completed in 2007. From a gallery the mosaic can be viewed from all sides. In showcases the visitor is presented the latest finds from excavations from Dion and surrounding ancient sites. A video informs about the dismantling of the mosaic at its site, the transport to the Archaiothiki and the subsequent restoration. The building was built especially for the exhibition of the Dionysus mosaic. 
South of Archaeothiki is the scientific laboratory. It is operated by the Aristotle University of Thessaloniki. 
Southeast of the museum, archaeological finds from Dion, Leivithra and the surrounding area are stored in a long-stretched building. In a workshop, professional staff deal with the cataloging and cleaning of the finds. Repairs of broken pottery are performed on an all-round table. 
The museum offers guided tours for young school children and has a room devoted to educational activities. 
Dragon Skulle is an action-adventure game for the Commodore 64 developed and published by Ultimate Play the Game in late 1985. It is a sequel to The Staff of Karnath, Entombed and Blackwyche, and the final title to feature the aristocrat adventurer, Sir Arthur Pendragon. The game was created by brothers Dave and Bob Thomas. 
Dragon Skulle is an arcade adventure in isometric perspective pseudo-3D set on the fictional island of Dragon Skulle, where you must find and destroy the Skull of Souls. The gameplay is more about exploring than puzzle solving when compared with its predecessors. 
The game received a 53% rating from Zzap!64 who criticised the game on the basis of poor 3D, weak sound and lack of originality.  All three reviewers expressed gratitude that it was the last in the Arthur Pendragon series. 
Commodore User's Eugene Lacey was also unimpressed by the game, stating that the Pendragon series of games had been dragged out too long. Although this was said to be the most difficult title in the series due to "hair wrenching puzzles" it was otherwise weaker than its predecessors with poorer graphics and "appalling" animation of the lead character. Lacey concluded the review by stating that it was "A disappointing conclusion to what was a very good series of games." 
 Rugby League Raw was a regional BBC Sport television programme featuring rugby league action and behind-the-scenes footage from the National Leagues play-offs. 
The series began in 2000 as a regional programme on Yorkshire Television and switched to the BBC in 2004. 
The programme was narrated by Mark Chapman, and later, Tony Livesey, with match commentary from Dave Woods, David Oates and John Helm. 
The documentary-style programme picked up two Royal Television Society awards and several nominations.  
Rugby League Raw was broadcast in the BBC's North East & Cumbria, Yorkshire & North Midlands, East Yorkshire & Lincolnshire and North West regions and attracted over 400,000 viewers, despite its late night timeslot. The series can also be viewed online or downloaded using BBC iPlayer in the UK.  
The Moto Guzzi Museum is a transport museum in Mandello del Lario, Italy.  The collection includes a number of important Moto Guzzi street motorcycles and motorcycle racing machines, as well as examples of rare engines like the Moto Guzzi V8. A section of the museum is devoted to historic Guzzi racer Bill Lomas. 
Scott Joseph Shaw (born September 4, 1951), often spelled Scott Shaw![citation needed] and Scott Shaw? in Rick and Steve, is an American cartoonist, animator, and historian of comics. Among Shaw's comic-book work is Hanna-Barbera's The Flintstones (for Marvel Comics and Harvey Comics), Captain Carrot and His Amazing Zoo Crew  (for DC Comics), and Simpsons Comics (for Bongo Comics). He was also the first artist for Archie Comics' Sonic the Hedgehog comic book series. 
He and Roy Thomas co-created Captain Carrot and His Amazing Zoo Crew! which first appeared in a special insert in The New Teen Titans #16 (Feb. 1982), followed by a series published from 1982 to 1983. 
Shaw both wrote and drew for Archie Comics' Sonic the Hedgehog early on in the series' run. Most recently, he has become involved in the long-running litigation between Ken Penders and the publishers over copyright and character ownership. 
For nearly 10 years, Shaw was the Senior Art Director of Ogilvy & Mather in Los Angeles, where he co-wrote, co-directed, storyboarded and designed hundreds of animated TV commercials for Post Fruity and Cocoa Pebbles cereal. He also wrote and drew many print ads for the product, and has designed and illustrated many of the cereal's packages.[citation needed] 
Shaw has also designed lines of action figures of Hanna-Barbera and Simpsons characters for McFarlane Toys. 
He co-founded Comic-Con International San Diego in 1970 by Shel Dorf, Richard Alf, Ken Krueger, Mike Towry, Barry Alfonso, Bob Sourk and Greg Bear. 
For 10 years, Shaw wrote a column on the Comic Book Resources website titled "Oddball Comics" where he selected comic and magazine issues noted for their strangeness and provided facts and commentary on them. It serve as the basis for a digital slide show he has presented at comics conventions. 
Shaw was the initial artist photographed in his studio for The Artist Within: Portraits of Cartoonists, Comic Book Artists, Animators and Others by photographer Greg Preston, published by Dark Horse Books in 2007. Shaw is credited by Preston with suggesting the idea for the project. 
The 2018 FINA Swimming World Cup was a series of seven three-day meets in seven different cities between September and November 2018. This edition integrated meets held in 25m-pool (short course) as well as meets in 50m-pool (long course). 
Lindley was born January 13, 1852, in Monrovia, Indiana, the son of Milton Lindley of North Carolina and Mary Elizabeth Banta. He was married to Florence Haynes on July 18, 1894, in Los Angeles. They had four children, Francis Haynes, Dorothy (Mrs. Robert P. Fite), Myra (Mrs. Samuel F. Bothwell) and Flora (Mrs. Kitchen). 
Lindley died of a cerebral hemorrhage on January 24, 1922, in the family home at 2207 South Figueroa Street, leaving his wife, children and four siblings. He was buried in Inglewood Park Cemetery. 
Lindley went to high school in Minneapolis, Minnesota, and to Central Normal School in Kokomo, Indiana. He studied medicine at Keen School of Anatomy in Philadelphia, at Long Island College Hospital in Brooklyn, New York, (where he earned his degree) and Loyola Marymount University, Los Angeles. 
He was superintendent of the Los Angeles County Hospital in 1885 and was president of the California State Medical Society. 
Lindley was a member of the Los Angeles Board of Education in 1880 and 1881 and of the city's Board of Library Directors at the time of his death. He was also acting secretary of the California Board of Health when he died. 
He was the creator and editor of The Southern California Practitioner, a medical publication, and wrote or co-wrote the following: 
During the first Grand Ordinary Congress of the AKP held on 12 October 2003, he became a member of the Central Board for Management and Decision Taking of the party.  He was re-elected to that position during the second Grand Ordinary Congress, held on 11 November 2006. 
The Seventh Senate District of Connecticut elects one member of the Connecticut Senate. Its current Senator is Republican John Kissel, who was first elected in 1994. The district is centered on the town of Enfield and also  contains the towns of Suffield, Windsor Locks, East Granby, Somers and parts of Granby and Windsor.   
The chapel has two expressive murals by Florentine artist Michelangelo Palloni completed during the restoration work in 1692. 
Phoenix's original city hall, at 1st Street and Washington (on Block 23) was demolished after the construction of Old City Hall. 
This is a list of U.S. states, the District of Columbia and territories by infant and under-five mortality rates in 2017. The infant mortality rate is the number of deaths of infants under one year old per 1,000 live births. This rate is often used as an indicator of the level of health in a country. The child mortality rate is the number of deaths of infants and children under five years old per 100,000 live births. 
Kontarsky is the younger brother of the duo pianists Aloys and Alfons Kontarsky, with whom he has occasionally appeared in a triple-piano ensemble. 
Viault is the author of several McGraw-Hill books that have been widely used in college courses. His articles and reviews have appeared in journals in the United States and Europe. His articles include: "Le 20 juillet 1944 vu d'Amerique," Guerres Mondiales et Conflits Contemporains, no. 163, July 1991. He was a consultant on Modern European History for Merriam-Webster's Collegiate Encyclopedia (2000). 
The station is served by Transdev (Conflans department) lines 5, A1 and A2. At night it is served by Noctilien bus line N152. 
Alexander Tukhachevsky (1793-1831) was a Russian military officer and a Colonel of Imperial Russian Army. A commanding officer of the (14th) Olonets Infantry Regiment, he took part in the Polish-Russian War of 1830 and was killed in the battle of Warsaw (1831). Coincidentally, his great-grandson Mikhail Tukhachevsky was defeated at the gates of Warsaw almost a century later. 
This biographical article related to the Russian military is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Justices Commitment Act 1741 (15 Geo. II, c.24) was an Act of the Parliament of Great Britain passed in 1742 and formally repealed in 1914. It clarified the powers of Justices of the Peace to imprison convicts. 
Many towns did not maintain their own prisons, and as such the power of Justices in those towns to sentence someone to imprisonment had become questioned. To resolve doubts which had arisen on the matter, the Act declared that the justices of the peace of a liberty or corporation, on sentencing someone to be sent to a house of correction, could send them to the house of correction of the county in which the liberty or corporation was situated. 
The Act was repealed by section 44 of, and Schedule 4 to, the Criminal Justice Administration Act 1914 (c.58). 
The show was canceled when its producer, Prime Time Entertainment Network (also known as PTEN), ceased operations and no other producer opted to continue the series. 
In 1992, the series was sold to television networks as a first-run syndicated series alongside Time Trax. The series was originally sold as "Kung Fu: The Next Generation". 
On May 27, 2014, Warner Bros. released the complete first season on DVD in Region 1 in the USA only not Canada, via their Warner Archive Collection.  Season 2 was released on August 18, 2015. 
The first season was released in Germany on DVD in 2009. And there is no news on whether or not season three and four will ever be on DVD. 
Poplar Forest is a plantation and plantation house in Forest, Bedford County, Virginia. Thomas Jefferson designed the plantation and used the property as a private retreat and a revenue-generating plantation. Jefferson inherited the property in 1773 and began designing and working on the plantation in 1806. While Jefferson is the most famous individual associated with the property, it had several owners before being purchased for restoration, preservation, and exhibition in 1984. 
Dr. James Johnson purchased the house and 50 acres of land from the Watts family in 1980 and then the nonprofit Corporation for Jefferson's Poplar Forest purchased the acreage and the remaining physical structures on the property in 1984. The organization has worked in recent years to reacquire land within the original plantation boundaries, and as of 2008 owned 617 acres of the original property. 
By different owners, the main house underwent many alterations, and the plantation's acreage was incrementally reduced to 50 acres (20 ha) at the time of acquisition by the Corporation for Jefferson's Poplar Forest. There was a fire in 1845; the Cobbs and Hutter families chose to rebuild in the Greek revival style and to add an attic story for sleeping; this modified the interior plan of the house. The original walls, chimney, and columns remained after the renovation. 
The Corporation for Jefferson's Poplar Forest is using early 19th-century building materials including heavy timber frame construction, hemp sash cord, iron hardware from Colonial Williamsburg as well as 19th-century building techniques in their restoration work including column rendering and burning limestone to produce traditional lime mortar and plaster. The goal of the restorations is to restore Poplar Forest to Jefferson's original architectural vision. 
Hannah was not born at Poplar Forest, but served there from the time she was a teenager until ca.1821. She married and had a family with a fellow slave, was literate, and worked for a time as Jefferson's housekeeper. 
James (Jame) Hubbard was purchased by Jefferson when he was 30 and went on to oversee field laborers at Poplar Forest. He fathered six children with a fellow slave named Cate and fostered several others, and worked as a hogkeeper when he was older. Scholars are also able to trace his family members and their roles at Poplar Forest, which included Nace, Hannah, Nancy, Joan, James, and Phill. 
Phill was born at Poplar Forest to James Hubbard and his wife Cate. Phill briefly worked at Monticello before returning to Poplar Forest, where he married Hanah and had a son. He died at age 33, reportedly of poisoning. 
William (Billy) was born at Poplar Forest and violently rebelled against slavery by attacking an overseer on more than one occasion. Jefferson sent him and three others to Louisiana, where William attempted to run away, but was caught and sold. 
John Hemmings never lived at Poplar Forest, but documentary records show that he was responsible for much of the interior woodwork in the retreat house at Poplar Forest. 
Lydia Johnson lived at Poplar Forest when Edward Hutter owned the property. She named one of her children Ida Reeder, after Hutter's niece; expense records show that he purchased a dress for her as a gift. Lydia continued to work for the family after Emancipation until she died in 1919. 
Archaeological excavations of Poplar Forest have yielded evidence suggesting that maps of Poplar Forest created in Jefferson's time were incomplete and did not illustrate the extent to which slaves were present. Current scholarship suggests that the enslaved men and women at Poplar Forest lived and worked at one of three sites, but it is possible that there were even more than are currently known. 
The Old Plantation/North Hill is believed to have been established in the 1770s/1780s and was the site of the oldest slave farm structures at Poplar Forest dating from 1764, and maps suggest that the original structures included an overseer house, large barn, and slave housing built over the course of 40 years. Scholars also refer to this area as the Old Quarter, and it was located to the south and west of the main house. 
The Corporation for Thomas Jefferson's Poplar Forest has been in charge of Poplar Forest since 1984, when the 501(c)(3) organization purchased 50 acres of land and the original buildings with the goal to preserve the estate for the educational benefit of the public. The Corporation currently operates Poplar Forest as a historic house museum and cites their mission as seeking to both preserve Thomas Jefferson's personal retreat and inspire visitors to explore Jefferson's legacy. 
Poplar Forest first welcomed visitors in 1986, and presently conducts guided tours thematically dedicated to the main retreat house and the enslaved community in addition to its ongoing restoration and archaeological work. The property is a National Historic Landmark and designated a Virginia History Trails site as part of Virginia's 2019 Commemoration. 
The texts in the collection were grouped into four chapters, differentiating their central themes. The first chapter, "The Coming of the Robots", included some of Asimov's earliest robot stories, where the Three Laws of Robotics were not yet explicitly defined. 
The third chapter, "Susan Calvin" includes stories where robopsychologist Dr. Susan Calvin makes an appearance. These four stories are representative of Asimov's robot short stories, following his traditional themes of aversion and distrust of robots by the general public and issues arising from the robots' interpretation of the Three Laws. The final chapter, titled "Lije Baley", consists of the two novels with detective Elijah Baley, whom Asimov affectionately calls Lije. 
While the original hardcover edition of this book included the two novels, some paperback editions have included only the eight short stories. Some of these shorter paperback editions, but not all, have been called Eight Stories from the Rest of the Robots. 
Algis Budrys of Galaxy Science Fiction in June 1965 praised the collection as "a fine book of entertainment," but faulted Asimov's extensive annotations, saying they "[suck] the juice out of some very vivacious writing indeed, and [embalm] one of science fiction's most ebullient personalities." In February 1966 he named the book "the single most useful publishing idea of the year". 
Gymnopilus rigidus is a species of mushroom in the family Cortinariaceae. It was given its current name by American mycologist Murrill in 1917. 
Ochrimnus lineoloides is a species of seed bug in the family Lygaeidae.  It is found in the Caribbean and North America. 
Kalaniyot (Hebrew: "anemones") is an Israeli song that became popular in the days leading up to the establishment of the State of Israel and has remained an Israeli classic. 
The lyrics, by Nathan Alterman, describe a little girl who dreams she is gathering anemones in a basket and brings them to her mother. The music, by Israeli composer Moshe Vilensky, became one of his most famous melodies. 
The song was used as a code during the British Mandate to alert fighters of the Lehi and Etzel to the presence of British soldiers (their caps were of the color of the flower). 
The song was sung by Shoshana Damari. It was sung to her by family and friends when she was on her death bed. 
He took part in the war against the Tibet. He fought at Kerung Axis during the Sino-Nepalese War under the leadership of Chautariya Balbhadra Shah along with Kirtiman Singh Basnyat and Bhotu Pande. He was sent with Balbhadra Shah, Pratiman Rana Magar and all Thargars and Oomaras for defence of Adijgarh. He also fought battles against many independent principalities of Nepal. 
Polyporus curtisii Berk. (1849) Fomes curtisii (Berk.) Cooke (1885) Scindalma curtisii (Berk.) Kuntze (1898) 
Ganoderma curtisii is a wood-decaying polypore whose distribution is primarily in the Southeastern United States. Craig and Levetin claim to have observed it in Oklahoma. 
The name was originally established by Miles Berkeley in 1849 as Polyporus curtisii, and later transferred to the genus Ganoderma by William Alphonso Murrill in 1908. This species is tentative and is a subject of debate as to its viability as a distinct species from North American specimens described as G. lucidum (G. sessile), which is much more widely distributed throughout the US. There is also debate about the identities of several species that resemble G. lucidum and G. tsugae. 
One reason for an alleged synonymy between G. sessile and  G. curtisii is overlap in habitat, decaying hardwoods. According to Volk, Gilbertson and Ryvarden, authors of North American Polypores, it is not considered a separate species from G. lucidum. Bessette et al., authors of Mushrooms of the Southeastern United States, echo this and list it as a synonym to G. lucidum. Paul Stamets considers G. lucidum and G. curtisii to both be members of a tight-knit species complex. 
This polypore bears a marked resemblance to G. lucidum and generally has a stipe, sometimes lacking the characteristic red to purple varnished appearance that G. lucidum possesses. The flesh is spongy in pore tissue and firm in the stipe. The pores bruise brown when damaged. 
Its habitat of choice is decaying stumps and roots of hardwoods, which aligns perfectly with that of G. sessile. 
Hypotacha ochribasalis is a species of moth in the family Erebidae first described by George Hampson in 1896. It is found in Burkina Faso, Ethiopia, Ghana, Kenya, Mauritania, Oman, Saudi Arabia, Sudan, Tanzania, Yemen and Iraq. 
The Moth Diaries is a 2011 gothic horror film written and directed by Mary Harron, based on the 2002 novel of the same name by Rachel Klein. The film stars Lily Cole, Sarah Gadon, Sarah Bolger, Judy Parfitt, and Scott Speedman. The plot follows Rebecca, a teenage girl who suspects that Ernessa, the new student at an all-girls boarding school is a vampire. An Irish-Canadian venture, the film was co-produced by Samson Films and Mediamax. 
The Moth Diaries premiered at the 68th Venice International Film Festival on 6 September 2011, and was theatrically released in Canada on 6 April 2012 by Alliance Films and in Ireland on 24 May 2013 by Lionsgate UK. The film received generally negative reviews from critics. 
At an exclusive boarding school for girls, 16-year-old Rebecca Cantor writes her most intimate thoughts in a diary. Two years earlier, Rebecca's father, a poet, took his own life by slitting his wrists. Her mother transferred Rebecca to the school, hoping to help her daughter escape the memory of her father's death. With the help of her best friend and roommate, Lucy Blake, Rebecca soon recovers. 
To Rebecca, Ernessa is an enigma. She seems like she can walk through closed windows, and she is often seen lingering around the basement (a place that students are forbidden to go). Rebecca thinks Ernessa is a vampire. 
Ernessa slowly gets rid of Rebecca's close friends, leaving Rebecca to find out what is happening by herself. 
A new English teacher, Mr Davies, arrives at the school. Mr Davies shows particular interest in Rebecca. The two share ideas on Romantic literature and poetry. Rebecca soon learns that vampires do not necessarily drink blood, but they can drain the lively spirit out of their victims. Mr Davies addresses himself as a fan of Rebecca's poet father. Rebecca turns to Mr Davies for help, and, during their conversation, the two kiss but Rebecca pulls away. 
Ernessa confronts Rebecca in the library and presents her with a sharp razor and elaborates on the pleasure of death. Another time, Ernessa sings a disturbing nursery rhyme about "The Juniper Tree" then slits her own wrists, causing blood to rain down on her and Rebecca. Afterwards, Ernessa and the blood disappear. 
Lucy is sent to the hospital, but only Rebecca knows that Lucy is sick because of Ernessa. Rebecca tries to convince Lucy that Ernessa is the root of all their problems, but Lucy refuses to listen and profanes at her. She tells Rebecca that she is not the "old Lucy" anymore, and that Rebecca's refusal to see this is what has really spoiled their friendship.  Although Lucy recovers for a couple days, she soon dies after Ernessa completely drains the life out of her. 
Rebecca steals the keys to the basement, and after entering, sees an old suitcase with Ernessa's full name written on it. From an old diary, Rebecca learns that many years ago Ernessa's father also killed himself, and Ernessa, unable to cope with the grief, took her own life thereafter. Rebecca soon learns that Ernessa has wanted Rebecca to kill herself. 
Shortly after, Rebecca returns to the basement to discover Ernessa sleeping in the suitcase. Rebecca pours kerosene on Ernessa and around the coffin and lights it before Ernessa wakes up. Rebecca walks outside to see a fire truck present and her classmates standing around. Through a door she sees the ghost of Ernessa, who slowly turns around and walks into the sun before vanishing. 
Knowing the authorities are suspicious of her, Rebecca is certain that Ernessa will not have left any remains. During the ride to the police station she pulls a razor blade out of her diary and drops it out of the window, staring blankly into the distance. 
Dana W. Gonzales (born November 18, 1963) is an American cinematographer from Los Angeles, California. 
His television work includes NYPD Blue, Southland and Pretty Little Liars, he made his directorial debut on the latter series in 2011. 
Gonzales was also the "A" camera operator and 2nd Unit Director of Photography on the Academy Award winning film for best picture Crash. 
Gonzales was the Director of Photography on the music video "We Are the World 25 for Haiti" shot in 3D and directed by Paul Haggis. 
A regular cinematographer on Fargo, he won the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Cinematography for a Limited Series or Movie for the episode "Waiting for Dutch". 
The Kula Plate was an oceanic tectonic plate under the northern Pacific Ocean south of the Near Islands segment of the Aleutian Islands. It has been subducted under the North American Plate at the Aleutian Trench, being replaced by the Pacific Plate. 
The Kula Plate began subducting under the Pacific Northwest region of North America during the Late Cretaceous period much like the Pacific Plate does today, supporting a large volcanic arc system from northern Washington to southwestern Yukon called the Coast Range Arc. 
About 55 million years ago, the Kula Plate began an even more northerly motion. Riding on the Kula Plate was the Pacific Rim Terrane consisting of volcanic and sedimentary rock. It was scraped off and plastered against the continental margin, forming what is today Vancouver Island. 
By 40 million years ago, the compressional force of the Kula Plate ceased. The existence of the Kula Plate was inferred from the westward bend in the alternating pattern of magnetic anomalies in the Pacific Plate. 
10BASE2 (also known as cheapernet, thin Ethernet, thinnet, and thinwire) is a variant of Ethernet that uses thin coaxial cable terminated with BNC connectors to build a local area network.  
10 Mbit/s Ethernet uses Manchester coding. A binary zero is indicated by a low-to-high transition in the middle of the bit period and a binary one is indicated by a high-to-low transition in the middle of the bit period. Manchester coding allows the clock to be recovered from the signal. However, the additional transitions associated with it double the signal bandwidth. 
Some terminators have a metallic chain attached to them for grounding purposes. The cable should be grounded at one end. Grounding the terminators at both may produce a ground loop and can cause network outages or data corruption when swells of electricity traverse the coaxial cabling's outer shield. 
When wiring a 10BASE2 network, special care has to be taken to ensure that cables are properly connected to all T-connectors. Bad contacts or shorts are especially difficult to diagnose. A failure at any point of the network cabling tends to prevent all communications. For this reason, 10BASE2 networks can be difficult to maintain and were often replaced by 10BASE-T networks, which (provided category 5 cable or better was used) also provided a good upgrade path to 100BASE-TX. 
He played in the Scottish Football League's top division across a decade for Ayr United, Dundee and Clyde, with his most significant achievement coming at its end, when he was a member of the Clyde team that won the Scottish Cup in 1939. World War II then broke out, effectively ending his senior career; during the conflict, he featured for Ayr United again in unofficial competitions. 
This biographical article related to association football in Scotland, about a forward born in the 1900s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Kannapolis Towelers were a minor league baseball team based in Kannapolis, North Carolina from 1936 to 1941. The Kannapolis Towelers played exclusively as a member of the Class D level North Carolina State League. 
The Kannapolis use of the "Towelers" moniker corresponds to local industry in the era. The Cannon Mills Corporation was headquartered in Kannapolis, North Carolina and was reportedly once the world's largest manufacturer of towels and sheets. 
Kannapolis North Carolina was without minor league baseball until the city hosted the 1995 Piedmont Phillies , who played as members of the South Atlantic League. Today, Kannapois hosts the Kannapolis Cannon Ballers, who play as members of the Low-A East. 
Beginning in 1939, the Kannapolis Towelers teams were noted to have played home minor league games at the Kannapolis Ball Park. The ballpark was reportedly located at Bell Street & Leonard Avenue, Kannapolis, North Carolina. 
Baseball ReferenceTeam photo of 1937 Kannapolis Towelers1935 Semi-pro Kannapolis Towelers team photo 
The Fund's lead portfolio manager, Mark Stoeckle, CEO, succeeded Douglas Ober on February 11, 2013. Mr. Stoeckle has over 30 years of experience in financial services and asset management. James Haynie, Executive Vice President, joined the team in August 2013. They are supported by a team of research analysts that looks for investments that offer long-term earnings growth at a reasonable price. 
In 168 Agepolis went as ambassador to Rome to communicate to the Senate how Rome's war against Perseus was a great burden for Greece, and ultimately unprofitable for Rome itself.  The war, however, had already concluded with Rome's victory, and the Senate accused Agepolis of serving neither Greece nor Rome's interests, but those of the now-defeated Perseus. 
Mittagong Lions Rugby League Football Club is an Australian rugby league football club based in Mittagong, New South Wales. Originally a rugby union club in the late 19th century, Mittagong was a founding member of the Berrima District Rugby League in 1914, just prior to the outbreak of the First World War. 
This article about a rugby league football team or club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Mexican association football defender is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mike Badger's Country Side is an album which features a compilation of Mike Badger's country style songs from 1988 to 2008, including previously unreleased material from his solo projects and his back catelogue with The Onset. It was released on the Generator Label in 2008. 
  (* Previously unreleased)  All words and music by Mike Badger, except  Track 5 Roky Erickson;  Track 8 Mike Badger, Danny Dean;  Track 14 Hank Williams/Rose arr. Danny Dean; 
"The view from 'Mike Badger's Country Side' is frequently breathtaking. You really should catch it while you can." Tim Peacock (Whisperin and Hollerin). 
The Kafufu or Kavu is a river of southwestern Tanzania. It flows through the Rukwa Valley, flowing between Lake Chada and emptying into Lake Rukwa. The river is deep and has a rapid flow. The Kafufu valley has significant reserves of iron and coal. 
Keagan Masters (born 2 March 2000) is a South African racing driver who currently competes in the Sasol GTC Championship. He has taken three championship titles in the series, two in the GTC2 Class (2017, 2018) and one in the GTC Class (2019). 
This biographical article related to South African auto racing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Bernhard Sabel (1957, Trier) is a German psychologist who heads the Institute of Medical Psychology at the Otto-von-Guericke-University Magdeburg. 
Sabel investigates treatment options for visual impairments through the activation and rehabilitation of residual vision. His work has appeared in over 200 publication. 
Sabel's basic and clinical research work focuses on brain plasticity and vision restoration.  Based on this work with animal models of vision loss and his clinical work, he discovered that low vision and blindness must not be viewed as irreversible, but that it can be improved or restored to some extent, even long after the damage has occurred. 
Sabel showed that vision restoration is independent of the person's age, sex, and duration of the damage, but that it depends primarily on the degree of how much residual vision the patients still have. Most recently, he discovered that the mental stress has a negative influence on vision restoration while relaxation techniques (such as meditation) improve outcome. 
Sabel's work has been published in Science, Nature Medicine, Archives of Neurology, Neurology, and Neuroimage.. 
Sabel has published over 240 science publications since 1979 in international SCI journals, 10 books, and over 40 book-chapters related to the topic of brain plasticity and vision restoration following glaucoma, optic neuropathy and stroke. Sobel has given over 500 lectures at national and international conferences. Since 1997 Sobel has been the Editor-in-Chief of the SCI journal Restorative Neurology and Neuroscience.  He is the author of 10 books, including: 
The Sopranos - Mitchell Burgess, David Chase, Diane Frolov, Robin Green, Andrew Schneider, Matthew Weiner, Terence Winter 
The Office - Steve Carell, Jennifer Celotta, Greg Daniels, Lee Eisenberg, Brent Forrester, Ricky Gervais, Mindy Kaling, Paul Lieberstein, Stephen Merchant, B.J. Novak, Michael Schur, Gene Stupnitsky 
Ugly Betty - Veronica Becker, Oliver Goldstick, Silvio Horta, Sarah Kucserka, Sheila Lawrence, Cameron Litvack, Myra Jo Martino, Jim D. Parriott, Marco Pennette, Dailyn Rodriguez, Don Todd 
John Francis Meagher (born 17 September 1948 in Melbourne, Australia) is an Australian Racing Hall of Fame Thoroughbred racehorse trainer. 
He is a Melbourne Cup winning trainer who relocated to Singapore from Melbourne in 1999. Meagher trained What A Nuisance to a win in the 1985 Melbourne Cup. Ridden by Pat Hyland and owned by Lloyd Williams the win was particularly memorable for the attendance of Prince Charles and Lady Diana who presented the winning connections with the famous trophy. It was also the first Melbourne Cup to offer $1,000,000 in prize money. 
The Cascade-Sierra province is a physiographic region of mountains in the western United States, east and adjacent to Pacific Border province and west and adjacent to the Basin and Range Province (in the south) and Columbia Plateau Province (in the north). 
The region is extremely diverse geologically and ecologically and is commonly divided into two regions: the Cascade Mountains and the Sierra Nevada Mountains. This province is part of a larger physiographic region that extends from Alaska in the north to the southern tip of South America. Several tectonic plates meet and form this region and make it one of the most geologically active places in North America. 
The province is home to several national forests, including the Lassen, Modoc, and Plumas National Forests. The Modoc Plateau, an area of high elevation basalt flows between the Medicine Lake Highlands and the Warner Mountains, is also within the region. The ecology of the province is extremely diverse and contains areas of pine, aspen, and cypress forests, mixed conifer and evergreen forests, along with montane meadows, fens, mammoth granite outcroppings, vernal pools, and sagebrush flats. 
Hydroboration produces organoborane compounds that react with a variety of reagents to produce useful compounds, such as alcohols, amines, alkyl halides. The most widely known reaction of the organoboranes is oxidation to produce alcohols typically by hydrogen peroxide. This type of reaction has promoted research on hydroboration because of its mild condition and a wide scope of tolerated alkenes. Another research subtheme is metal-catalysed hydroboration. 
If BH3 is used as the hydroborating reagent, reactions typically proceed beyond the monoalkyl borane compounds, especially for less sterically hindered small olefins. Trisubstituted olefins can rapidly produce dialkyl boranes, but further alkylation of the organoboranes is slowed because of steric hindrance. This significant rate difference in producing di- and tri-alkyl boranes is useful in the synthesis of bulky boranes that can enhance regioselectivity (see below). 
For trisubstituted alkenes such as 1, boron is predominantly placed on the less substituted carbon. The minor product, in which the boron atom is placed on the more substituted carbon, is usually produced in less than 10%. A notable case with lower regioselectivity is styrene, and the selectivity is strongly influenced by the substituent on the para position. 
The C-B bonds generated by hydroboration are reactive with various reagents, the most common one being hydrogen peroxide. Because the addition of H-B to olefins is stereospecific, this oxidation reaction will be diastereoselective when the alkene is trisubstituted. Hydroboration-oxidation is thus an excellent way of producing alcohols in a stereospecific and anti-Markovnikov fashion. 
Hydroboration can also lead to amines by treating the intermediate organoboranes with monochloramine or O-hydroxylaminesulfonic acid (HSA). 
Terminal olefins are converted to the corresponding alkyl bromides and alkyl iodides by treating the organoborane intermediates with bromine or iodine. Such reactions have not however proven very popular, because succinimide based reagents such as NIS and NBS are more versatile and do not require rigorous conditions as do organoboranes. etc. 
Diborane can be produced in situ by reduction BF3 with NaBH4 (see for Flavopiridol). Usually however, borane dimethylsulfide complex BH3S(CH3)2 (BMS) is used as a source of BH3. It can be obtained in highly concentrated forms. 
The adduct BH3(THF) is also commercially available as THF solutions wherein it exists as the 1:1 adduct.  It degrades with time. 
Borane adducts with phosphines and amines are also available, but are not widely used. Borane makes a strong adduct with triethylamine; using this adduct requires harsher conditions in hydroboration. This can be advantageous for cases such as hydroborating trienes to avoid polymerization. More sterically hindered tertiary and silyl amines can deliver borane to alkenes at room temperature. 
Monoalkyl boranes are relatively rare. When the alkyl group is small, such as methyl, the monoalkylboranes tend to redistribute to give mixtures of diborane and di- and trialkylboranes.  Monoalkylboranes typically exist as dimers of the form [RBH2]2. One example is thexylborane (ThxBH2), produced by the hydroboration of tetramethylethylene: 
Species of the form RBH2 are available for R = alkyl and halide. Monobromo- and monochloro-borane can be prepared from BMS and the corresponding boron trihalides. The stable complex of monochloroborane and 1,4-dioxane effects hydroboration of terminal alkenes. 
dimesitylborane is a dimer (C6H2Me3)2B2H2). It reacts only slowly with simple terminal alkenes. On the other hand, alkynes undergo monohydroboration with Mes2BH easily to produce alkenylboranes. 
Simple, unhindered dialkylboranes are reactive at room temperature towards most alkenes and terminal alkynes but are difficult to prepare in high purity, since they exist in equilibrium with mono- and trialkylboranes. One common way of preparing them is the reduction of dialkylhalogenoboranes with metal hydrides. An important synthetic application using such dialkylboranes, such as diethylborane, is the transmetallation of the organoboron compounds to form organozinc compounds. 
For catalytic hydroboration, pinacolborane and catecholborane are widely used. They also exhibit higher reactivity toward alkynes. Pinacolborane is also widely used in a catalyst-free hydroborations. 
They formed after the disbandment of The A-Sides in 2009, where they originated from Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, being Jon Barthmus and his drummer Patrick Marsceill. There was a brief hiatus in 2013 with speculation that the band had disbanded once again, after only seeing a few posts on their Facebook page between 2012 and 2016. Speculation was put to rest with the announcement of their third album. 
The band commenced as a musical entity in 2009, with releasing a studio album, Nocturne of Exploded Crystal Chandelier, on October 25, 2010, with Dead Oceans. Their subsequent studio album, Soft Fall, was released on October 2, 2012, as the final release from the duo by Dead Oceans. In December 2016, Sun Airway released a single called FOAM, with an announcement of a new album, on their Facebook Page. 
The skin reaction to insect bites and stings usually lasts for up to a few days. However, in some cases, the local reaction can last for up to two years. These bites are sometimes misdiagnosed as other types of benign or cancerous lesions. 
Feeding bites have characteristic patterns and symptoms, a function of the feeding habits of the offending pest and the chemistry of its saliva. 
The histomorphologic appearance of insect bites is usually characterized by a wedge-shaped superficial dermal perivascular infiltrate consisting of abundant lymphocytes and scattered eosinophils. This appearance is non-specific, i.e. it may be seen in a number of conditions including: 
Nationality words link to articles with information on the nation's poetry or literature (for instance, Irish or France). 
A Salawaku (in the Tidore and Pagu languages), is a traditional shield originating from the Maluku Islands, Indonesia. It is also known as Ma Dadatoko, Salwake, Saluwaku or Salawako in Galela, Salewaku-mu in Loloda, Hawau-mu in Madole,  Emuli in Buru or O Dadatoko in Tobelo. 
The term Salawaku means 'protection' and 'repellence': a reference to the supernatural protection of the ancestors; or 'to miss and to catch'. With this technique the defender catches his adversary's weapon, secures it in the wooden shield and then disarms him. The shield is not only a defensive weapon, but thanks to its peculiar, narrow shape may be easily moved to deliver blows with the sharp rims and corners. 
The Salawaku may be part and parcel of the bridegroom's marriage gifts and are worn during the Cakalele (war dance) or the Hoyla (war dance during the marriage ceremony among the Tobelorese people). During the Cakalele, the Salawaku is carried in the left hand and with a spear or sword in the other. Whereas in the Hasa dance which is only performed by men, who carry the Salawaku on the left hand and a wooden machete, Barakas on the other. 
KZUC-LP (also going by UCentral Radio) is the student radio station on the campus of the University of Central Oklahoma in Edmond, Oklahoma. UCentral Radio applied for an LPFM license in November 2013 and was awarded a construction permit by the Federal Communications Commission on February 24, 2015. UCentral Radio is part of the UCentral student media network at the University of Central Oklahoma. 
In 1979, the station began broadcasting a full-time classical music format. While this dramatically increased public support, student body interest in the station declined, as did the involvement of broadcast students with an increasingly professionalized KCSC. As to not disrupt the operations of an increasingly successful KCSC, faculty realized a separate facility was needed to provide students with radio broadcast experience. 
In the spring of 2006, KUCO rebranded itself as Z-100 (instead of Z-99) and flipped from alternative rock to a more student-friendly contemporary hit radio format geared towards 18 to 25-year-old students. Automation allowed students to produce and record content that could be played 24 hours a day. 
Carmenta suffusata is a moth of the family Sesiidae. It was described by George Paul Engelhardt in 1946. It is known from the United States, including Florida, Oklahoma and Kansas. 
In 2008, WJDQ changed formats from Top 40 to a new "mix" format, which blended both the Hot AC and Adult album alternative formats. Prior to its flip to its current urban contemporary format, the station was a Modern AC format. It also slightly altered its moniker, becoming "95Q" rather than the previous incarnation as "Q951" and debuted a new logo to go along with the new format. 
On September 9, 2011 WJDQ changed their format to classic hits, branded as "95.1 The Buzz". On September 26, 2011, the call letters changed to WKZB to match the new format and branding. 
Nothing Important is a studio album by Richard Dawson, released in 2014 by Weird World. The album consists of four songs, two of which ("Nothing Important" and "The Vile Stuff") exceed 16 minutes in length. The cover of the album features a photograph by Kuba Ryniewicz. 
Nothing Important has received some acclaim from music critics. At Metacritic, which assigns a normalized rating out of 100 to reviews from mainstream critics, the album received an average score of 78 based on ten reviews, indicating "generally favourable reviews". The Wire listed it on second position of its "Releases of the Year" 2014. 
In his review of the album for AllMusic, critic Marc Deming said that "the fact that one man with a guitar and some occasional overdubs can make something this powerful and challenging is truly impressive...Nothing Important's best moments clearly belie its title." Guardian reviewer Michael Hann wrote that "this is a record that unsettles and subverts. Whether it's a masterpiece or a fraud will become apparent with the passage of time." 
Mishra served as West Bengal secretary of the new party organization. Under Mishra's leadership new dalams (guerilla squads) were formed. 
In November 1975 Jauhar was killed in the midst of Lal Sena activities. Mishra became the new party General Secretary in a reorganized five-member Central Committee. Mishra organized a second party congress, held clandestinely in the rural areas of Gaya district in February 1976. The congress unanimously re-elected Mishra as General Secretary. 
Mishra was the political architect of the process of re-orientation of CPIML Liberation. By 1976 the party had adopted a position that armed struggle would be combined with building a broad anti-Congress democratic front movement. The process further elaborated through an internal rectification process initiated in late 1977. Party study circles and party schools were started from central to block level of the party structure. The theory of two line tactics started to develop. 
In 1981 party tried to unify the other splintered ML factions. The party organised a unity meet with 13 ML factions to form a unified leading core . But the initiative was a failure. 
In the third party congress it was decided that IPF will participate in parliamentary elections. In 1989 IPF's Rameshwar Prasad won the loksabha seat from Ara (Bhojpur). In 1990, IPF won 7 seats from Bihar Legislative Assembly. Special initiatives taken for restructuring the party and open up. IPF hold its first rally on 8 October 1990 in Delhi. 
In 1985, the party launched People's democratic Front (PDF)  in Karbi Anglong district of Assam which won a seat in state assembly. In 1987 PDF was transformed to Autonomous State Demand Committee (ASDC). A sustained mass movement by ASDC help it to sweep district council elections in 1989. In 1981, ASDC's Jayanta Rongpi became an MP in Parliament. In 1996, ASDC was able to send its five-member group in Assam assembly as MLA. 
In 1992, after the Fifth party congress (Held in Kolkata), the party comes out in the open from its underground status. Mishra was re-elected General Secretary of the party at the sixth congress of CPIML Liberation in Varanasi in October 1997. 
The English-language publication of the party is Liberation, and thus the party is called CPIML Liberation. Apart from Liberation, the party publishes a central Hindi weekly organ, Samkaleen Lokyuddh. Some state party committees publish their own organs, like the weekly Ajker Deshabrati in West Bengal, Nabasphulinga in Tripura, Teeppori in Tamil Nadu, Telugu Liberation in Andhra Pradesh, Kannada Liberation in Karnataka, Samkali Lok Morcha in Punjab, etc. 
The party has a longstanding conflict with the feudal landlords since the beginning of CPI (ML). Siwan, Bhojpur, Arrah  are the strongholds of CPI (ML) movement. The communist movement in Bihar was founded by the comrade Jagdish Mahto, Rameshwar Ahir and Ramnaresh Ram in the Ekwaari village of Bhojpur. 
CPIML Liberation emerged as the third largest party in Bihar Legislative Assembly Election 2015. The party contested jointly along with CPI, CPI(M), RSP, Forward block, and SUCI(C) as a third alternative to the National Democratic Alliance and the Mahagathbandhan of Lalu Prasad Yadav and Nitish Kumar. The party won the seats of Darauli, Balrampur and Tarari) each. The party has a vote  percentage of 1.5% in the state. All the left parties together have a vote percentage of 3.59%. 
CPI(ML) Liberation contested the 2020 Bihar Legislative Assembly election as part of the Mahagathbandhan, an alliance of the UPA and the leftist parties led by the Rashtriya Janata Dal. The party secured 12 seats with a vote percentage of 3.16%, making it the fifth largest party in the Bihar Legislative Assembly. However, the Mahagathbandhan lost the election to the rival National Democratic Alliance. 
As a result of the election, the CPI(ML)L was recognised as a state party by the Election Commission of India. 
 Since the separation of Jharkhand from Bihar important places like Ranchi, Dhanbad, Giridih, Koderma, Jamtada and others have been field of work of the party. In Jharkhand the party is the representative of regional adivasis who have conflicts with corporates and government against improper land seizure without proper rehabilitation. The party also has conflicts with the local coal mafias.
The party contested in cooperation with state left parties like  Marxist Coordination Centre(MCC),  CPI, and CPI(M) as an alternative to the BJP and INC led alliances. The party won the Dhanwar seat. 
Fabian Greilinger (born 13 September 2000) is a German professional footballer who plays as a winger for 1860 Munich. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a midfielder born in the 2000s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an Indian National Congress politician from Rajasthan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In mathematics, a hyperbolic link is a link in the 3-sphere with complement that has a complete Riemannian metric of constant negative curvature, i.e. has a hyperbolic geometry. A hyperbolic knot is a hyperbolic link with one component. 
As a consequence of the work of William Thurston, it is known that every knot is precisely one of the following: hyperbolic, a torus knot, or a satellite knot. As a consequence, hyperbolic knots can be considered plentiful. A similar heuristic applies to hyperbolic links.  
As a consequence of Thurston's hyperbolic Dehn surgery theorem, performing Dehn surgeries on a hyperbolic link enables one to obtain many more hyperbolic 3-manifolds. 
The Rural Municipality of Montrose No. 315 (2016 population: 712) is a rural municipality (RM) in the Canadian province of Saskatchewan within Census Division No. 12 and SARM Division No. 5. 
The RM of Montrose No. 315 is governed by an elected municipal council and an appointed administrator that meets on the second Thursday of every month. The reeve of the RM is Murray Purcell while its administrator is Desiree Bouvier. The RM's office is located in Delisle. 
In 1873, the German schooner R. J. Robertson was wrecked off the coast of Ueno Village of Miyako Island in the Ryukyu Kingdom. The crew was saved by the local islanders, who took care of them. As a gift for the islanders' kindness, and as an excuse for German warships to enter Ryukyuan waters, Kaiser Wilhelm I erected the monument in Hirara City in 1876. 
She is known for her work on Queen of Swords where she worked as a sword coach and onscreen as a sword double for female characters played by Tessie Santiago, Bo Derek, and Paulina Galvez. She has choreographed numerous fights and sword fights for other television series, theatre, and motion pictures. 
She was a theatre student at Brandeis University where she was introduced to fencing, and has been acclaimed as an outstanding alumna. She has practiced her craft for over ten years. 
Brown has choreographed for television series, theatre, and motion pictures. Among the actors she has trained, coached, and occasionally fenced onscreen are Billy Campbell, Tessie Santiago, Peter Wingfield, Andrew Helm, Valentine Pelka, Anthony Lemke, Patricia Arquette, Lucy Liu, Elizabeth Gracen, Bob Golec, Patrick Fabian, Noah Wyle, Goran Visnjic, Mary Reinhardt, and Alex Kingston. Though never having trained him, she fenced with actor/swordmaster Anthony De Longis onscreen. 
The Los Angeles Times wrote of Brown: "She's dead serious about the importance of proper training and safety procedures." 
Variety wrote that "Roberta Brown's fight choreography heightens the brutal confrontations." Backstage West calls her oeuvre "disturbing and convincing." The Fight Master opined: "It is her solid experience, talent, and smarts that allow her to thrive in an otherwise male-dominated field." 
Richard Pearce (born January 25, 1943) is an American film director, television director and cinematographer.  In addition to feature films, he has directed made-for-TV movies and TV series. 
Born in 1943 in San Diego, California, Richard Pearce went east to high school, attending St. Paul's School in Concord, New Hampshire.  
He attended Yale University, where he earned a B.A., English in 1965 where he met D.A. Pennebaker; afterwards he moved to New York City working with Pennebaker and Richard Leacock on several documentaries.  
In 1980 he won the Golden Bear award at the 30th Berlin International Film Festival for his film Heartland. 
La bellezza di Ippolita is a 1962 Italian comedy film directed by Giancarlo Zagni, starring Gina Lollobrigida and Enrico Maria Salerno. It was entered into the 12th Berlin International Film Festival. 
This article related to an Italian comedy film of the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dawsophila is a genus of fungi in the class Dothideomycetes. The relationship of this taxon to other taxa within the class is unknown (incertae sedis). 
John Francis Xavier Diffley (born 1958 in New York City) is a molecular biologist who specializes in studying eukaryotic DNA replication. He was awarded the 2019 Canada Gairdner International Award for his "pioneering research on the eukaryotic DNA replication cycles including initiation, regulation and responses to DNA damage". 
Morestone, which later changed its name to the more well-known Budgie Toys, was an English die-cast toy distributor, turned manufacturer, based in London. The company first specialised in horse-drawn carriages and coaches. It later made a wide variety of miniature cars and trucks. Vehicles were about Matchbox car size, though still slightly smaller and simpler. Some models marketed as Morestone were made by a separate company called Modern Products. 
Earlier models said "Morris & Stone" on the boxes, but the name was late. contracted Models were also marketed as promotionals for ESSO. The Budgie name, was introduced in 1959 and was more like other British toys named after dogs and other animals (Husky and Corgi, etc.). 
Other horse-drawn vehicles were a single-horse wheeled "Sam's" coffee stall, a horse-drawn snack bar, a single-occupant horse-drawn Hansom Cab, and Santa's sleigh with single reindeer. Additionally available was a smaller State Landau elaborate coach with six horses, but the finish was a bit cruder, and the horses were not detachable. 
One assembly detail different on Morestone/Budgie models, compared to other manufacturers, is the painting of wheels after they have been attached to axles. The appearance of painted 'hubs' at times makes a buyer wonder if the model has been 'retouched' by a collector, but this is factory spec. 
Before and after the Budgie name was introduced, the company also offered a line of Enid Blyton's 'Noddy' character figurines and vehicles. This included metal characters with wagons and bicycles of the wooden boy Noddy and his brownie friend, Big Ears. 
Early packaging for stagecoaches, etc. would be marked "Morestone" and "Modern Products". Boxes were two parts; lid and bottom with staples closing the lid on each end. The lid was covered with a printed, rather monocolor, paper label. 
The kiwi Midget Toys boxes took their design from the earlier Budgie / Modern Products boxes and their red and yellow colored panels. 
The Norman & Nancy Blake Compact Disc is a compilation album of tracks by the American musicians Norman Blake and Nancy Blake, released in 1986. It contains all of the tracks from the vinyl release "Lighthouse on the Shore" and six tracks from Nancy Blake's solo release "Grand Junction". 
Enslaved women were expected to maintain the enslaved populations, which led women to rebel against this expectation via contraception and abortions. Infanticide was also committed as a means to protect children from either becoming enslaved or from returning to enslavement. 
The university became autonomous on September 1, 1970,[citation needed] and is currently accredited by the Council of Higher Education of Puerto Rico, the Middle States Association of Colleges and Schools, and by the Congregation for Catholic Education. 
In October 1982 a multi-use sports complex inaugurated and was dedicated in honor of Rafael Pont Flores and it bears his name. 
This Caribbean-related university, college or other education institution article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
La Cardonnie joined the Navy as a volunteer in 1744, and became a Garde-Marine in 1746. He served on Alcyon in the Caribbean and in Canada, and was promoted to Ensign on 17 May 1751. 
In 1779, La Cardonnie had a duel in Paris with his former first officer, Schantz. Schantz was exiled to Sweden as punishment. 
In 1780, La Cardonnie captained the 74-gun Actif and cruised off Cadiz and Saint-Vincent. He captured the British Hercule, Wright, master, off Saint-Vincent. La Cardonnie proposed to use Actif for commerce raiding in addition to her usual duties of convoy escort. 
Anna Butkevich was born on February 27, 1985 in Dnipropetrovsk, Ukraine. She graduated from the Faculty of Law of Oles Honchar Dnipro National University named after Oles Honchar. 
In 2016, she debuted in the cinema as an actress, having starred in the ironic comedy "Future in the past" directed by Alexander Shapiro. The premiere of the film took place at the Kyiv International Film Festival "Molodist" in October of the same year. 
Kashmir walnut wood carving is wood carving work that is manufactured in Jammu and Kashmir, India. Walnut carving is protected under the geographical indication (GI) of the Agreement on Trade-Related Aspects of Intellectual Property Rights (TRIPS) agreement. It is listed at item 182 as "Kashmir Walnut Wood Carving" of the GI Act 1999 of the Government of India with registration confirmed by the Controller General of Patents Designs and Trademarks. 
The Juglans regia tree that grows widely in Kashmir region is used for wood carving, and Kashmir is one of a few places for availability of walnut trees. Walnut wood is used to make tables, jewelry boxes, trays, etc. 
McDowell was born on August 27, 1890 in Mount Sterling, Wisconsin, the son of assemblyman Archie J. McDowell. During World War I, he served in the United States Army. He died in 1973 and is buried in Soldiers Grove, Wisconsin. 
McDowell was a member of the Assembly from 1937 to 1948. He was chosen as speaker of the Assembly in 1945. He was also a delegate to the 1944 Republican National Convention. 
Neocompsa magnifica is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Martins in 1971. 
In 1969 she was awarded the Doctorate in Literature, and made President of the Folklore Society, a post she held until 1972, and which named an award in her honour. 
Briggs lived the latter part of her life at Barn House in Burford in Oxfordshire, and died aged 82 on 15 October 1980. 
The Katharine Briggs Folklore Award is an annual book prize established by the Folklore Society to commemorate her life and work and to encourage the study of folklore. 
Lake Christabel is a small lake in the north of New Zealand's South Island. It is located 12 kilometres southwest of the Lewis Pass. The lake is the source of the Grey River, one of the longest rivers on the South Island's West Coast, although its outlet is underground. The lake lies behind a landslide dam, thought to have been created by a prehistoric earthquake. 
Lorrenzo Manzin (born 26 July 1994) is a French cyclist, who currently rides for UCI ProTeam Team TotalEnergies. 
This biographical article related to a French cycling person born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Ecuadorian Social Security Institute (Spanish: Instituto Ecuatoriano de Seguridad Social (IESS)), is an autonomous entity that is part of the social security system of Ecuador and is responsible for implementing the mandatory universal insurance, according to the Constitution of the Republic, in force since 2008. 
The Constitution states that social security is an inalienable right of all people. Social security is governed by the principles of solidarity, obligation, universality, equity, efficiency, subsidiarity, adequacy, transparency and participation. 
In 1937, with the Law on Mandatory Social Security Insurance Fund of Private Employees and Workers is created and the Medical Department linked to it. On July 14, 1942, the new Law on Compulsory Social Security, in which new insurance conditions, the financing of all general insurance pensions are established with the State's contribution of 40% is issued; and sickness and maternity insurance benefits among some members joined. 
On September 19, 1963, by Supreme Decree No. 517, the Pension Fund and Insurance Fund merge to create the NATIONAL HOUSING AND MEDICAL INSURANCE DEPARTMENT. By Supreme Decree No. 40 of July 25, 1970, published in the Official Gazette No. 15 of 10 July 1970 the National Social Security Fund it becomes the Ecuadorian Social Security Institute (IESS). 
In 1988, the National Assembly amends the Constitution of the Republic and establishes the permanence of the IESS as the only independent institution responsible for the implementation of the General Compulsory Insurance. 
Benefits and services are delivered through four specialized Insurance: health, pensions, social security and peasant work risks. 
Parran was a telegraph station and post office in Churchill County, Nevada, United States. It was established in 1910 and closed in 1913. The abandoned site is currently considered a ghost town. 
Parran was first planned in 1902 as a telegraph station. The main idea was to serve a re-route through Hazen. The telegraph station and post office was officially opened on the 29th of January, 1910 and was closed on the 31st of July, 1913. It was built to assist the Kinney salt works, which only lasted seven years and shipped to farmers. The International Salt Company stopped working the project in 1912, which eventually lead to the closing of the station. 
Afterwards, she ended up studying acting in New York, and doing other ventures such as voiceover work, and writing for other artists (such as Mikkel Solnado's album It's Only Love, Give It Away). 
The following year, she announced she was working on some new music, and her three-track EP Oh So Full of Promise was released in early 2013. 
Next To You, written by Maria and produced by Chris Colonna from The Bumblebeez, was featured in the 80th-anniversary campaign for Lacoste. Additionally, her song "Missing piece" was featured in a 2013 Pandora campaign. 
In 2016, her second full-length album Oh So Full of Promise was released on digital and streaming services through the independent label ART:ERY, in addition to a vinyl release exclusively on her website. Later that year, she collaborated with the artist PEDER on the song "The Last Time." 
Babu is a former Indian film actor who has appeared in leading roles. After making his debut in Bharathiraja's En Uyir Thozhan (1990), the actor appeared in a few more Tamil films before being paralysed following a failed stunt sequence. 
Following a stunt sequence gone wrong when shooting for a film, Babu suffered spinal injuries and became paralysed in the early 1990s. He subsequently stopped working as an actor. In 1997, he worked as a dialogue writer for the unreleased film, Smile Please starring Prakash Raj, which would have marked the debut for filmmaker Radha Mohan. 
In June 2004, director Ponvannan revealed that he was going to make a film based on the life of his friend, Babu, and that he would use the profits from his film Gomathy Nayagam to fund the venture. However, the film eventually did not materialise. 
Kailash Nath Singh Yadav (born 3 July 1957) is an Indian politician for the Chandauli (Lok Sabha Constituency) in Uttar Pradesh. 
This article about a Samajwadi Party politician from Uttar Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Albert Felix Etter was born near Shingle Springs in Eldorado County, California, on November 27, 1872. He was one of ten surviving children of the Swiss-born Benjamin Etter (d. 1889), all but one of whom were boys. Around 1876 the family moved to Humboldt County, where Benjamin acquired a farm near Ferndale and became the first person to grow lentils in the county. 
By 1910, Ettersburg 121 had become the leading variety in the Willamette Valley, Oregon, because its firm flesh, high color, and strong flavor meant that it canned well. In 1912, you could get a gift of a dozen plants with your subscription to the Pacific Rural Press. 
By 1920, Etter's catalog showcased over 50 new varieties, some of which achieved limited commercial success. None are commercially important today, although their germplasm continues in a number of modern cultivars. In 1928, he donated all of his strawberry material to the University of California, where his Ettersburg 121 became an ancestor of various commercially important  varieties. 
Etter also experimented with breeding over a hundred varieties of forage plants, grasses, and clovers. His research showed that some of the large white clovers from southern Europe were suitable for Humboldt County dairy farmers to use for forage because they put on a great deal of growth during the winter. He also undertook some experiments with tree nut crops such as English walnuts, chestnuts and filberts. 
Etter was a member of the California Nurserymen's Association and the American Pomological Society, and he was president of the Ettersburg Farm Center (a branch of the Humboldt County Farm Bureau). 
Goutam is a member of the largest political party in India, the Indian National Congress. He is a president of Dhar District Congress Committee.  
He ran on the Congress ticket in the 2008 Madhya Pradesh Legislative Assembly Election from Dhar Vidhan Sabha Constituency, but lost due to unfair means, against Neena Verma of the Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP). Goutam won the seat by two votes in the first vote count; he received 50,507 votes against Verma's 50,505. Verma and her party requested to recount the votes, and she was declared winner by a margin of only one vote. The final tally of votes was 50,510 to 50,509. 
On 5 November 2013, the All India Congress Committee announced Goutam as the party's candidate from Dhar Constituency for the 2013 state legislative assembly election; the election held on 25 November. His nomination was opposed by some Congress leaders from Dhar. He lost to Neena Verma by a margin of 11,482 votes. 
The Rajasthan Police seized a tanker in Subhash Nagar, Bhilwara, for carrying illegal liquor on 3 August 2003, and registered a case under the Rajasthan Excise Act against five people, including Goutam and his younger brother Rakesh Singh. Goutam was arrested on 11 December 2012 from a hotel in Pithampur by Rajasthan Police with the help of Dhar and Jhabua police. His brother was arrested from Delhi on 15 April 2012 with the help of Dhar, Khandwa and Delhi Police. 
(323137) 2003 BM80, provisional designation: 2003 BM80 and cometary designation 282P/2003 BM80, is an asteroid and main-belt comet from the outer regions of the asteroid belt, approximately 9.4 kilometers (5.8 miles) in diameter. It was discovered on 31 January 2003, by astronomers of the LONEOS program conducted at Anderson Mesa Station near Flagstaff, Arizona, in the United States. 
The body's observation arc begins with its first precovery observation by the NEAT program in December 2001, more than a year prior to its official discovery observation at Anderson Mesa. 
This minor planet was numbered by the Minor Planet Center on 6 April 2012. As of 2021[update], it has not been named. 
Based on a generic magnitude-to-diameter conversion, 2003 BM80 measures approximately 4.4 kilometers in diameter using an absolute magnitude of 15.3 and an estimated albedo 0.07, typical for rather dark cometary-like bodies. 
As of 2021[update], no rotational lightcurve of 2003 BM80 has been obtained from photometric observations. The body's rotation period, shape and spin axis remain unknown. 
The sculpture was created by the Florentine sculptor Bruno Innocenti. The entire Statue was completed in 1965. 
The 1983 NCAA Division II Soccer Championship was the 12th annual tournament held by the NCAA to determine the top men's Division II college soccer program in the United States. 
The final match was played on December 2 at Pepin-Rood Stadium on the campus of the University of Tampa in Tampa, Florida. 
The William E. Ervin House is a historic mansion in Columbus, Mississippi, U.S.. It was built in 1836 for William E. Ervin. It has been listed on the National Register of Historic Places since December 1, 1989. 
This article about a property in Mississippi on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joseph-Louis Lambot (born 22 May 1814 in Montfort sur Argens; died 2 August 1887 in Brignoles), is the inventor of ferro-cement, which led to the development of what is now known as reinforced concrete. He studied in Paris, where his uncle Baron Lambot was aide-de-camp to the Duke of Bourbon. 
After Chen returned to Taiwan, she had starring roles in many of Tsai Ming-liang's films. She also appeared in Lin Cheng-sheng's Sweet Degeneration (1997), which was entered into the 48th Berlin International Film Festival. In 2014, she won the Best Actress award at the Golden Horse Film Festival for her performance in Exit. 
The Grasse's shrew (Crocidura grassei) is a species of mammal in the family Soricidae. It is found in Cameroon, Central African Republic, Republic of the Congo, Gabon, and Equatorial Guinea. Its natural habitat is subtropical or tropical moist lowland forests. 
Bueng Kum was separated from Bang Kapi on 4 September 1989. It consisted of three sub-districts: Khlong Kum, Khan Na Yao, and Saphan Sung. On 14 October 1997, Khan Na Yao and Saphan Sung were elevated to districts, leaving Bueng Kum with a sole sub-district, Khlong Kum. 
Bueng Kum was named so because of a lake ("bueng" means 'lake') used as water reservoir for flood prevention. There are also plants called "kum" (Crataeva sp.) around the lake. The lake is part of Seri Thai Park. 
The District Council for Bueng Kum has seven members, who each serve four-year terms. Elections were last held on 6 June 2010. The results were: 
This article related to the city of Bangkok, Thailand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1834 Congress repealed the rule. Immediately afterward, claim jumpers claimed much of the land.  The government gave away mixed-blood peoples' claims to the land, effectively ending the provisions of the Half-Breed Tract by 1841. 
A similar treaty was signed in 1825 between the Osage Indians and the United States.  The Osage ceded lands in Missouri, Arkansas, and south of the Arkansas River in Oklahoma in exchange for a reservation in Kansas and Oklahoma.  Forty-two tracts of one-square mile each were reserved for the mixed blood children of French traders and Osage women.  Most of the tracts were scattered around eastern Kansas but a few were on the Neosho River in Oklahoma. 
The 1830 Treaty of Prairie du Chien specified the following boundaries of a Half-Breed Tract centered around Lake Pepin, as follows: 
In 1989, the L.A. Posse left Def Jam and signed with Atlantic Records, producing Breeze's album The Young Son of No One which yielded the charting rap single "L.A. Posse". Some of the members of the group also ended up producing on LL Cool J's later albums Walking with a Panther, Mama Said Knock You Out and 14 Shots to the Dome. Following this, the group recorded their own album, They Come in All Colors, in 1991.  
Muffla is currently heading new multimedia company Covert Entertainment Soundworks, Big Dad has been connected with Dr Dre, John Singleton, Nona Gaye, and others, Bobcat has been working with Dr Dre and Battlecat at The Pharmacy, while DJ Pooh has expanded into a Hollywood powerhouse with films Friday, 3 Strikes, The Wash, and Grow House. 
This article on a United States hip hop music group or collective is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The anomalous photovoltaic effect (APE), also called the bulk photovoltaic effect in certain cases, is a type of a photovoltaic effect which occurs in certain semiconductors and insulators. The "anomalous" refers to those cases where the photovoltage (i.e., the open-circuit voltage caused by the light) is larger than the band gap of the corresponding semiconductor. In some cases, the voltage may reach thousands of volts. 
Although the voltage is unusually high, the short-circuit current is unusually low. Overall, materials that exhibit the anomalous photovoltaic effect have very low power generation efficiencies, and are never used in practical power-generation systems. 
First, in polycrystalline materials, each microscopic grain can act as a photovoltaic. Then the grains add in series, so that the overall open-circuit voltage across the sample is large, potentially much larger than the bandgap. 
Second, in a similar manner, certain ferroelectric materials can develop stripes consisting of parallel ferroelectric domains, where each domain acts like a photovoltaic and each domain wall acts like a contact connecting the adjacent photovoltaics (or vice versa). Again, domains add in series, so that the overall open-circuit voltage is large. 
This model suggests that when a material crystallizes both in cubic and hexagonal structures, an asymmetric barrier can be formed by a residual dipole layer at the interface between the two structures. A potential barrier is formed due to a combination of the band gap difference and the electric fields produced at the interface. One should remember that this model can be invoked to explain anomalous PV effect only in those materials that can demonstrate two types of crystal structure. 
It was suggested by Starkiewicz  that the anomalous PV is developed due to a distribution gradient of positive and negative impurity ions through the microcrystallites, with an orientation such as to give a non-zero total photovoltage. This is equivalent to an array of p-n junctions. However, the mechanism by which such p-n junctions may be formed was not explained. 
A perfect single crystal with a non-centrosymmetric structure can develop a giant photovoltage. This is specifically called the bulk photovoltaic effect, and occurs because of non-centrosymmetry. The electron processes like photo-excitation, scattering, and relaxation may occur with different probabilities for electrons moving one direction versus the opposite direction. 
This effect was first discovered in the 1960s. It has been observed in lithium niobate (LiNbO3), barium titanate (BaTiO3) and many other materials. 
Theoretical calculations using density functional theory or other methods can predict the extent to which a material will exhibit the bulk photovoltaic effect. 
When light is shining, an electron will occasionally move right by absorbing a photon and going from A to B to C. However, it will almost never move in the reverse direction, C to B to A, because the transition from C to B cannot be excited by photons, but instead requires an improbably large thermal fluctuation. Therefore, there is a net rightward photocurrent. 
Because the electrons undergo a "shift" each time they absorb a photon (on average), this photocurrent is sometimes called a "shift current". 
This also explains why large open-circuit voltages tend to be seen only in crystals that (in the dark) have very low conductivity: Any electrons that can freely move through the crystal (i.e., not requiring photons to move) will follow the drift-diffusion equation, which means that these electrons will subtract from the photocurrent and reduce the photovoltaic effect. 
A consequence is that the quantum efficiency of a thick device is extremely low. It may require millions of photons to bring a single electron from one electrode to the other. As thickness increases, the current goes down as much as the voltage goes up. 
In some cases, the current has different signs depending on the light polarization. This would not occur in an ordinary solar cell like silicon. 
The bulk photovoltaic effect is believed to play a role in the photorefractive effect in lithium niobate. 
Finland recognised both the Federal Republic of Germany and the German Democratic Republic (West and East Germany) in 1972 and it established diplomatic relations with East Germany in July 1972 and with West Germany in January 1973. 
This biographical article relating to an American baseball catcher born in the 1920s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This geographical article about a location in Mersin Province, Turkey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
R-10 regional road (Montenegrin: Regionalni put R-10) (previously known as R-4 regional road) is a Montenegrin roadway. 
In January 2016, the Ministry of Transport and Maritime Affairs published bylaw on categorisation of state roads. With new categorisation, R-4 regional road was renamed as R-10 regional road. 
Adesmus fortunei is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Lingafelter in 2013. 
Bold textThis is a partial list of Non-governmental organization (NGOs) based in Karachi, Sindh, Pakistan. 
Aghebati graduated from Tehran University of Art majoring in theater directing in 2000. Upon graduation, he became a member of the Leev Theater Group. After departure from Leev Theatre Group, he moved to New York and started a special research fellowship at Yale University, School of Drama. He then followed his education by obtaining his M.F.A in Performance and Media Arts at Brooklyn College, New York. 
Agehbati is the co-founder and artistic director of Maaa Theater which is currently active in New York and Tehran. 
This biographical article about a Norwegian historian is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
St Augustine's Church is a Church of England parish church located in Hedon, East Riding of Yorkshire, England. The church is a Grade I listed building. 
The organ was built by Arthur Nelson in 1926. A specification of the organ can be found on the National Pipe Organ Register. 
This article is about the constitutions of the Mongolian People's Republic.  The Mongolian People's Republic had three constitutions, in effect from 1924, 1940, and 1960. 
The first constitution was passed by the First National Great Hural on November 26, 1924. It abolished the system of monarchial theocracy, described the legislative consolidation of state power, provided a basic statement of socioeconomic and political rights and freedoms for the people, and espoused a national program that would bypass the capitalist stage of development in the course of promoting fundamental social transformations in order to bring about socialism in Mongolia. 
The regime's justification for making these changes was that Mongolia had already realized many sociopolitical achievements in its advance toward socialism. Therefore, it became historically correct to introduce reforms that had been adopted in the more advanced society of the Soviet Union. 
The second and longest general section defined the state structure, following that laid down in the 1940 constitution, as amended in 1959. It detailed the nature, composition, and duties of all state organs of power, including the executive, the legislative, and the judicial at both the national and local levels. 
Lambeth Academy is a mixed secondary academy in the London borough of Lambeth. Its sponsor  is United Learning. 
Lambeth Academy specialises in English with Business & Enterprise.  There are around 180 in sixth form. It is situated on Elms Road just east of Clapham Common, off the A24, north of the junction with the South Circular Road (A205). Next door is the sixth-form centre of Lambeth College. It lies in the parish of Holy Spirit, Clapham. 
Lambeth Academy was founded after a four-year campaign by local parents, including the author John O'Farrell, who became the school's first Chair of Governors, a post he held for eight years. He recalls the campaign and his involvement in the school in his memoir 'Things Can Only Get Worse'. The academy was formally opened by Queen Elizabeth II in 2004. The first principal was Ms Pat Millichamp, who retired after two years. 
The second principal was Mr Stephen Potter who retired during the Christmas break of 2011 who was then replaced by Ms Jan Shadick, who served in this position until Summer 2017. She was succeeded by Ms Carol Shepherd until her resignation in the Christmas of 2017. Subsequently, she was succeeded by Mr Peter Mathershaw who stood down as headteacher in the summer of 2018, he was replaced by Mr Leon Wilson who is the current Executive Headteacher. 
The landscapes and the viewpoints are protected. This protection strictly limits any expansion of the village but seems to correspond to the current inhabitants' desire to treasure their shared heritage. 
"Love in Song" is a song credited to Paul and Linda McCartney that was released on Wings' 1975 album Venus and Mars. It was also released as the B-side of Wings' number 1 single "Listen to What the Man Said." It has been covered by artists such as Helen Merrill and the Judybats. 
Author Robert Rodriguez describes the song as a "delicate ballad." Beaver County Times critic Bob Bonn described the melody as "mysterious sounding."  Music professor Vincent Benitez describes the song's key as G Aeolian, a melancholy key. Author John Blaney describes the arrangement as "measured," claiming that contributes the singer distancing himself from the subject, although he believes that McCartney's warm vocal "more than compensates for the song's guarded tone." 
Rodriguez considers "Love in Song" to be one of McCartney's "better efforts," although he claims that it is neglected today. Rough Guide to The Beatles author Chris Ingham considers it a "luxurious acoustic ballad." Rolling Stone critic Paul Nelson found "Love in Song" to be one of several "banal ballads" on Venus and Mars.  Music critic Richard Tozier described the song as a "formal, yet easily palatable ballad." 
Helen Merrill covered "Love in Song" on the 2005 album Love Is Song. The Judybats covered it on the 2001 album Listen to What the Man Said: Popular Artists Pay Tribute to the Music of Paul McCartney. 
The Church of St. Mary of the Priory (Italian: Chiesa di Santa Maria del Priorato), also known as  St. Mary on the Aventine (Italian: Santa Maria in Aventino), is the monastery church of the Priory of the Knights of Malta on the Aventine Hill in Rome, and is dedicated to the Blessed Virgin Mary. 
The first church on this site was built in 939, when Odo of Cluny was given the Roman palace of Alberic II of Spoleto, which was then converted into a Cluniac Benedictine monastery. When the monastery was dissolved in the 14th-century, the site was acquired by the Knights of Malta, who had the church rebuilt in the 1550s. 
Piranesi's decoration of the church interior culminates in the very sculptural main altar. The church contains Piranesi's tomb and that of Bartolomeo Carafa (died 1405) designed by Paolo Romano. 
The Grand Priory of Rome (a division Knights of Malta) with support from the Fondazione Roma finances the restoration of both the interior and exterior that lasted from 2015 to 2019. 
In the last days of the 2011 January transfer window, Juande was loaned to Betis neighbours Granada CF, joining his local club until the end of the second division campaign. He totalled 29 appearances for the two teams, with both finally attaining promotion. 
On 16 July 2014, after two years in the second tier with SD Ponferradina where he was an undisputed first choice, Juande joined Spezia Calcio from the Italian Serie B. On 26 August 2016 he returned to his homeland, signing a one-year loan deal with UCAM Murcia CF. 
At the age of 32, Juande moved to the Australian A-League in July 2018, agreeing to a two-year contract at Perth Glory FC. In September 2020, he left. 
Juande returned to the Australian top division on 24 March 2021, signing a short-term deal with Adelaide United FC. 
Dentipratulum is a genus of fungi in the family Hericiaceae. It was circumscribed by Dutch mycologist Marinus Anton Donk in 1962. Species in the genus have membranous fruit bodies that are either completely resupinate or effuso-reflexed (stretched out flat on the substrate but turned up at the edges). The hymenium (spore-bearing surface) bears "teeth". 
Dave Chadwick was a Grand Prix motorcycle road racer. His best season was in 1958 when he finished in fourth place in the 350cc world championship, and fifth in the 125cc world championship. Chadwick was killed in 1960 while competing in the Mettet International Road Races in Belgium. 
This British motorcycle racing biographical article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rajarhat is a locality in Bidhannagar Municipal Corporation of North 24 Parganas district in the Indian state of West Bengal. It is close to Kolkata and also a part of the area covered by Kolkata Metropolitan Development Authority (KMDA). Lying just on the periphery of the planned New Town, Rajarhat-Gopalpur has seen huge spurt in real estate development. 
As per the 2011 census, Rajarhat-Gopalpur Municipality had a total population of 402,844 persons, Males constitute 50.55% of the population and females 49%. Rajarhat-Gopalpur has an average literacy rate of 89.69%. 
This biographical article relating to a college football coach first appointed in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Aretaon asperrimus is a species of insect in the Aretaon genus of the Phasmatodea order. The sometimes used common name thorny stick insect is a bit misleading, since the species does not correspond to the typical stick-like habitus and many other species are thorny as well. 
Aretaon asperrimus is native to the Malay part of Borneo. Here it can be found especially in the north of the island, in Sabah. Another locality of the species is the Philippine island Palawan. It should also appear on Labuan and Luzon, more precisely in Benguet. 
The syntypes of Aretaon asperrimus are in the Natural History Museum Vienna, in the Museo Nacional de Ciencias Naturales in Madrid and in the Zoological Museum of the Russian Academy of Sciences in St. Petersburg. 
Norborne is a city in Carroll County, Missouri, United States. The population was 708 at the 2010 census. 
Norborne was founded in 1868 by Norborne B. Coates, a civil engineer for the railroad. The town has numerous small businesses but is mostly an agricultural community. Norborne is the self-proclaimed Soybean Capital of the World and holds a Soybean Festival every year during the weekend of the second Saturday in August. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 708 people, 306 households, and 185 families residing in the city. The population density was 1,089.2 inhabitants per square mile (420.5/km2). There were 367 housing units at an average density of 564.6 per square mile (218.0/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 95.3% White, 2.1% African American, 0.7% Native American, 0.1% from other races, and 1.7% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.3% of the population. 
There were 306 households, of which 29.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 41.8% were married couples living together, 9.8% had a female householder with no husband present, 8.8% had a male householder with no wife present, and 39.5% were non-families. 34.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 19.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.31 and the average family size was 2.97. 
The median age in the city was 40.5 years. 23% of residents were under the age of 18; 8.8% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 23.5% were from 25 to 44; 27.5% were from 45 to 64; and 17.2% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the city was 47.2% male and 52.8% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 805 people, 358 households, and 220 families residing in the city. The population density was 1,285.0 people per square mile (493.4/km2). There were 404 housing units at an average density of 644.9 per square mile (247.6/km2). The racial makeup of the city was 95.16% White, 3.60% African American and 1.24% Native American. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.99% of the population. 
There were 358 households, out of which 28.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 50.0% were married couples living together, 6.4% had a female householder with no husband present, and 38.3% were non-families. 34.6% of all households were made up of individuals, and 20.4% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.25 and the average family size was 2.93. 
In the city the population was spread out, with 25.0% under the age of 18, 7.7% from 18 to 24, 24.2% from 25 to 44, 22.4% from 45 to 64, and 20.7% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 40 years. For every 100 females, there were 90.3 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 81.9 males. 
The median income for a household in the city was $25,208, and the median income for a family was $31,488. Males had a median income of $24,821 versus $18,393 for females. The per capita income for the city was $14,526. About 11.1% of families and 15.8% of the population were below the poverty line, including 21.1% of those under age 18 and 15.2% of those age 65 or over. 
Norborne was laid out in 1868. The community was named after one of its founders, Norborne B. Coats. A post office called Norborne has been in operation since 1869. 
Collaboration is an album by American jazz group the Modern Jazz Quartet with Brazilian guitarist Laurindo Almeida featuring performances recorded at Webster Hall in 1964 and released on the Atlantic label. 
This Nodaway County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Scott Creek is named for Hiram Scott, who in 1852 bought part of the Rancho Agua Puerca y las Trancas. Scott, for whom Scotts Valley is also named, bought Rancho San Agustin (now Scotts Valley) in the same year. 
Fishes of Scott Creek include steelhead, coho salmon, threespine stickleback (Gasterosteus aculeatus), prickly sculpin (Cottus asper), Coastrange sculpin (Cottus aleuticus), and tidewater goby (Eucyclogobius newberryi). Juvenile starry flounder (Platichthys stellatus) and Pacific staghorn sculpin (Leptocottus armatus) are infrequently observed in the estuary. 
The steelhead and coho salmon hatchery on Big Creek is operated by The Monterey Bay Salmon and Trout Project (MBSTP). The hatchery uses spawning wild steelhead trout to obtain eggs and milt so that the genetics of the hatchery fish are wild. The hatchery site was historically known as Kingfisher Flats. 
On big north swells that occur during the winter, a large bowly right is enjoyed by many surfers. The spot has similarities to Swami's surfspot in San Diego County. The beach is also frequented by nudists. 
Tony Bua (born February 11, 1980) is a former American football linebacker. His hometown is Liberty, Texas. 
Bua had a distinguished college career as a linebacker/safety while playing at the University of Arkansas, and entered the draft with Mark Bloom as his agent. Although Bua was drafted as a linebacker, he mainly was used to play on special teams, primarily during punting situations. 
While Bua was moved to safety to begin the 2005 season, Dolphins waived him on September 4. He was later signed as a free agent, but he was waived again on October 19. He was then signed by the Cincinnati Bengals, but on August 20, 2006, he again was waived. Bua reportedly worked out with the Minnesota Vikings, but was never signed. 
The Troy Haymakers were an American basketball team based in Troy, New York, that was a member of the American Basketball League. 
After its first season the team became known as the Troy Celtics. During the first half of the 1939/40 season, the team absorbed the Kingston Colonials on December 19, 1939. During the first half of the 1940/41 season, the team moved to Brooklyn and became the Brooklyn Celtics. 
Wallkill is a hamlet (and census-designated place), generally identified as coterminous with ZIP code 12589, telephone exchange 895 in the 845 area code and most of the Wallkill Central School District located mostly in the eastern half of the Town of Shawangunk, Ulster County, New York, United States, but partly spilling over into adjacent regions of the Orange County towns of Newburgh and Montgomery. The population was 2,288 at the 2010 census. 
The Lenape population had been ravaged not only by war, but by European diseases for which they had no natural immunity. The last known sale of land by an Esopus Indian in Ulster County occurred in 1770 (Fried 2005). The refuge itself lies close to two sites of great historic interest; only a mile to the west, the Esopus tribe had a major village on the Shawangunk Kill that was the scene of a dramatic battle and rescue of prisoners by Dutch forces in 1663, during the Second Esopus War. 
The Walstein Childs House, J. B. Crowell and Son Brick Mould Mill Complex, Andries DuBois House, and Reformed Dutch Church of New Hurley are listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
There were 788 households, out of which 39.0% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 57.7% were married couples living together, 7.6% had a female householder with no husband present, and 29.4% were non-families. 25.4% of all households were made up of individuals, and 9.3% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.72 and the average family size was 3.26. 
In the CDP, the population was spread out, with 28.9% under the age of 18, 8.0% from 18 to 24, 30.8% from 25 to 44, 22.4% from 45 to 64, and 9.8% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 35 years. For every 100 females, there were 97.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 97.3 males. 
The median income for a household in the CDP was $47,604, and the median income for a family was $58,704. Males had a median income of $44,792 versus $26,786 for females. The per capita income for the CDP was $19,258. About 3.6% of families and 5.0% of the population were below the poverty line, including 4.2% of those under age 18 and none of those age 65 or over. 
On the original Borden Farm, there was a cow named Elsie the Cow. Her likeness has become the name of a local restaurant, Elsie's Place Restaurant and Pub, as well is the Borden Milk Products logo. 
At the request of Watchtower, Muller Martini has designed a very "tour-friendly" layout of the machinery for efficient "visitor management". Every year, the plant, which is based in Wallkill, about two hours from New York, welcomes 50,000 visitors. 
The hat was originally worn by nobles and royalty, and later by the rising merchant class. It was often decorated with feathers, jewels, or other ornaments. Today, it is commonly associated with the character Robin Hood. 
"You Say You Will" is a song written by Beth Nielsen Chapman and Verlon Thompson. It was originally recorded by Holly Dunn for her 1992 album Getting It Dunn and later by American country music artist Trisha Yearwood. It was released in March 1993.  Yearwood's version was the third single from her album Hearts in Armor. The song reached number 12 on the Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks chart in May 1993. 
"You Say You Will" debuted at number 58 on the U.S. Billboard Hot Country Singles & Tracks for the week of March 6, 1993. 
This article about a location in the province of Soria, Spain is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dora Jemaa-Amirouche (born 15 July 1985, at Oullins) is a  French athlete, who specializes in the 400 hurdles. 
She won two champion of France  titles at the 400 meters hurdles, in 2006 and 2010, and she also won national title for the Indoors 400 m in 2008. 
Wolica was founded in 1361 by Bals family. From 966-1018, 1340-1772 (Ruthenian Voivodeship) and from 1918-1939 Wolica was part of Poland. While during 1772-1918 it belonged to Austrian empire, later the Austrian-Hungarian empire. 
The village was burned down in the spring 1946 by the UPA. Some people left Wolica on April 29, 1947 (Akcja Wisla) and moved to the Gdansk area of Poland. Some people went to Ukraine in 1946. 
Renault armoured cars were a number of armoured car variants produced in France during the First World War. 
Like most of the armoured cars of the period they were developed from armoured bodies fitted to commercially available large car or truck chassis, in this case those from Renault, and armed with a machine gun or relatively small calibre gun. 
This is a list of the 89 cases reported in volume 108 of United States Reports, decided by the Supreme Court of the United States in 1882 and 1883. 
"one of the greatest judges Australia ever had. A commanding presence, a striking face, an exquisite voice, unusual swiftness in comprehension, with an immense combination of eloquence and power". (Quoted at the time of Downer's death in The South Australian Advertiser, 3 August 1915).
The Stow Scholarship and medal was awarded to any law student who was most successful at the final examinations in each of three successive years. Early recipients were: 
This list shows the IUCN Red List status of mammal species recorded in Germany. One of them is critically endangered, three are endangered, and several are near threatened. One of the species listed for Germany can no longer be found in the wild. The following tags are used to highlight each species' IUCN Red List status as published by the International Union for Conservation of Nature: 
The lagomorphs comprise two families, Leporidae (hares and rabbits), and Ochotonidae (pikas). Though they can resemble rodents, and were classified as a superfamily in that order until the early twentieth century, they have since been considered a separate order. They differ from rodents in a number of physical characteristics, such as having four incisors in the upper jaw rather than two. 
The order Erinaceomorpha contains a single family, Erinaceidae, which comprise the hedgehogs and gymnures. The hedgehogs are easily recognised by their spines while gymnures look more like large rats. 
The "shrew-forms" are insectivorous mammals. Shrews and solenodons closely resemble mice, while moles are stout-bodied burrowers. 
The bats' most distinguishing feature is that their forelimbs are developed as wings, making them the only mammals capable of flight. Bat species account for about 20% of all mammals. 
The order Cetacea includes whales, dolphins and porpoises. They are the mammals most fully adapted to aquatic life with a spindle-shaped nearly hairless body, protected by a thick layer of blubber, and forelimbs and tail modified to provide propulsion underwater. 
There are over 260 species of carnivorans, the majority of which feed primarily on meat. They have a characteristic skull shape and dentition. 
The even-toed ungulates are ungulates whose weight is borne about equally by the third and fourth toes, rather than mostly or entirely by the third as in perissodactyls. There are about 220 artiodactyl species, including many that are of great economic importance to humans. 
Paul was nominated by President Chester A. Arthur on February 27, 1883, to a seat on the United States District Court for the Western District of Virginia vacated by Judge Alexander Rives. He was confirmed by the United States Senate on March 3, 1883, and received his commission the same day. His service terminated on November 1, 1901, due to his death in Harrisonburg. He was interred in Woodbine Cemetery in Harrisonburg. 
Paul was the father of John Paul Jr. also a United States Representative from Virginia and a United States District Judge of the United States District Court for the Western District of Virginia. 
Paul dedicated a new courthouse in Harrisonburg in 1896, and delivered a carefully prepared historical address concerning the local bar. Paul was survived by his widow and six children, and interred in Woodbine Cemetery. Paul donated part of the family's farm in Ottobine, Virginia to become the Paul State Forest.[citation needed] 
Georissa filiasaulae is a species of a minute land snail that have an operculum, terrestrial gastropod mollusk in the family Hydrocenidae. 
Dillard has a PhD in American Culture from the University of Michigan, an MA from the University of Michigan in American Culture, an MA from the New School for Social Research in Political Theory, and a BA she earned from James Madison College and Michigan State University in Justice, Morality, Constitutional Democracy. 
As well as being an Associate Dean, she is the Earl Lewis Collegiate Professor of Afroamerican and African Studies. Her work specializes in American and African-American intellectual history including issues of race, religion, and politics. 
Scott L. Malcomson reviewed Guess who's coming to dinner? for The New York Times Book Review and described it as timely after the election of George W. Bush as U.S. President and his efforts to maintain a diverse cabinet and staff of Conservatives. 
For the second straight year, the Huskies were picked to finish third in the division in 2016 in the poll released during the 2016 MAC Media Day at Ford Field in Detroit. 
On 15 March 1736, at the age of 13, Elizabeth married Stephen Fox, the 31-year-old future earl. A homosexual, he was for many years the lover of John Hervey, 2nd Baron Hervey, whose letters to him have been published. Hervey was angered by the marriage and broke off his relationship with Fox. 
He was raised to the peerage in 1741 and was created an earl on 17 June 1756, making his wife a countess. In 1758, the earl took the additional surname and arms of Strangways in compliance with the terms of his wife's inheritance. 
Initially, the earl and countess did not live together because of Elizabeth's youth. Several of their children died in infancy. Those who survived to adulthood were: 
In the mid-1760s, Elizabeth arranged the construction of a seaside villa with landscaped gardens, near Chesil Beach in Dorset, in imitation of Horace Walpole's Strawberry Hill House; it was called "Strangways", later known as "Abbotsbury Castle". The house was demolished in 1934, but the gardens, expanded and improved by Elizabeth's son Henry, were restored and opened to the public as Abbotsbury Subtropical Gardens. 
Elizabeth is supposedly the real person behind the "first Countess of Wessex" in Thomas Hardy's short story of that name, published in 1891. 
Real Madrid finished the season as champions for the third season running, the runners-up this time being Real Sociedad, while Barcelona finished a disappointing sixth, though they did at least have Copa Del Rey success as consolation for their lack of form in the league. 
The Public Health Service Outstanding Service Medal is a decoration of the United States Public Health Service presented to members of the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Officer Corps and to members of any Uniformed Services of the United States whose accomplishments or achievements are of outstanding or unique significance to the missions of the Corps. It is the seventh-highest award awarded by the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps. 
The PHS Outstanding Service Medal is awarded to an officer who has demonstrated continuous outstanding leadership that has had a major effect on the health of the Nation, or has performed a heroic act resulting in the preservation of life or health. 
This article related to orders, decorations, and medals is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Secret of Treasure Island is a 1938 Columbia movie serial based on the serialized Argosy Magazine story Murder at Pirate Castle (1936). The magazine story was written by L. Ron Hubbard, at the time a writer of pulp fiction  who went on to found the Scientology religion. 
The film version is divided into 15 chapters. The serial was well received by fans, and William C. Cline wrote positively of the action sequences in his book In the Nick of Time: Motion Picture Sound Serials. 
Columbia assigned staff producer Jack Fier to oversee the Treasure Island project, but the film was actually produced by an independent company, Weiss Brothers. Louis Weiss hired motion picture pioneer Elmer Clifton to direct. Yakima Canutt and Dave O'Brien collaborated on the action sequences. The special effects (including the climactic eruption of a volcano and the destruction of the island) were handled by cameraman Kenneth Peach and explosives expert Earle Bunn.  
The Secret of Treasure Island was well received by fans, and helped to solidify Columbia's presence in the serial marketplace.  William C. Cline described the action in the serial as "well paced and lively". Alan G. Barbour's book Days of Thrills and Adventure described actor Don Terry's performance as "excellent". 
Upon completion of the serial, Columbia Pictures ended its affiliation with the Weiss Brothers, opting to make its own serials. The Weiss Brothers were slated to produce The Great Adventures of Wild Bill Hickok, but Columbia took over the production. 
The Secret of Treasure Island was highlighted as part of "Serial Fest 2002" in Pennsylvania, which also included serials Batman and Robin, Mysterious Doctor Satan and The Adventures of Rex and Rinty. The serial was shown along with the 1922 Down to the Sea in Ships at the 2006 Memphis Film Festival, and in an article about the festival John Beifuss of The Commercial Appeal called the two serials "Elmer Clifton classics". 
The Becket Fund for Religious Liberty is a non-profit organization based in Washington, D.C. that describes itself as "a non-profit, public interest law firm defending the freedom of religion of people of all faiths."  The Becket Fund promotes accommodationism and is active in the judicial system, the media, and in education. 
In 2011 Hasson stepped down as President of the Becket Fund, making way for William P. Mumma who has since served as the President and Chairman of the Board. Kristina Arriaga, who was the executive director of the Becket Fund starting in 2010 and a member of the firm since 1995, is now a "Senior Advisor to the Board." Montse Alvarado, who started with Becket in 2009, replaced Arriaga as executive director in 2017. 
As of 2014, the Fund had eleven litigating attorneys, and an estimated budget of five million dollars. The firm operates as a non-profit. 
The Becket Fund has served as counsel at the Supreme Court for three religious freedom cases since 2012 starting with Hosanna-Tabor v. EEOC (2012). As a result of the case, the United States Supreme Court unanimously ruled (9-0) in favor of the ministerial exception doctrine for the first time, which exempts religious institutions from anti-discrimination laws in hiring employees. 
They also served as counsel to the plaintiffs in Burwell v. Hobby Lobby Stores Inc. (2014) in their fight to exempt themselves from having to pay for four different drugs and devices they deemed as abortifacients. The court ruled 5-4 in favor of Hobby Lobby, asserting that family owned businesses have a right to operate in accordance with their conscience. 
The Becket Fund has also filed petitions to the Supreme Court in two cases involving the United States Department of Health and Human Services' contraceptive mandate on employer-paid health insurance coverage of contraception, which had at the time been consolidated into Zubik v. Burwell, Little Sisters of the Poor v. Burwell, and Houston Baptist University and East Baptist University v. Burwell. 
The Becket Fund's Supreme Court litigation has also extended to other cases, most recently filing amicus briefs in Reed v. Town of Gilbert (2015), Sac & Fox Nation v. Borough of Jim Thorpe (2015), and EEOC v. Abercrombie & Fitch Stores (2015). 
The Becket Fund has represented groups and persons from many different religious traditions; its founder, Kevin Hasson, has been quoted as saying that the Becket Fund defends the "religious rights of people from 'A to Z,' from Anglicans to Zoroastrians." 
Notable clients have included the nation's oldest Hindu temple, the Hindu Temple Society of North America, in Flushing, New York City; Prison Fellowship International; Muslim students in Richardson, Texas, seeking to pray the dhuhr prayer on the campus of Lloyd V. Berkner High School; and a Zen Buddhist silent meditation center in New York state that neighbors claimed would make too much noise. 
Previous clients also included the City of Cranston in the attempt to preserve the Prayer Banner at Cranston High School West. 
Most recently the Becket Fund helped the Matawan-Aberdeen Regional School District in New Jersey. A group of atheists who considered the phrase "under God" a violation of the Establishment Clause challenged the pledge. The case was taken to the Superior Court of New Jersey where the phrase "under God" was once again ruled constitutional. The atheist group did not appeal.[citation needed] 
Another Becket Fund client is a mosque in Murfreesboro, Tennessee, that was denied the right to use its building by a local court after complaints that the mosque was promoting terrorism. 
Among the Becket Fund's governmental clients have been the states of Colorado, Kansas, New Mexico and Oklahoma; the city of Jersey City, New Jersey; and Spartanburg County School District No. 7 in South Carolina. 
The Becket Fund has also litigated on behalf of prisoners who seek to continue following their beliefs in prison. The Becket Fund has sought to ensure that observant Jewish prisoners are provided with kosher food in every prison in the United States. In the case of Moussazadeh v. Texas Department of Criminal Justice, the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit affirmed the right of a Jewish prisoner to receive kosher food in a Texas prison. 
Another significant area of litigation for the Becket Fund has been religious land use.  The Becket Fund brought the first case under the Religious Land Use and Institutionalized Persons Act, and has been involved with such litigation throughout the United States. 
The Becket Fund has been a strong opponent of the concept of "defamation of religion" as it has been presented at the United Nations and elsewhere. The Becket Fund has argued that protecting religions against defamation puts governments in the position of deciding which religious concepts are valid and thus worthy of protection, and would lead to the suppression of both religious and non-religious speech. 
In addition to these activities, the Becket Fund provides resources for the public and other civil rights attorneys. For example, it operates resource websites about the Religious Land Use and Institutionalized Persons Act, the freedom to preach without fear of censorship or IRS retribution, the Blaine Amendments, and religious liberty in Sri Lanka. It also provides continuing legal studies courses in cooperation with West Legal EdCenter.[citation needed] 
Suphisellus puncticollis is a species of burrowing water beetle in the subfamily Noterinae. It was described by Crotch in 1873 and is found in Canada and the United States. 
Zable was born on 10 January 1947 in Wellington, New Zealand to Polish-Jewish refugee parents. They moved early in his life to Australia and he grew up in Carlton, Victoria. 
In an interview Zable explained that the rights and experiences of refugees and asylum seekers underpins his work:  
The current generation of refugees are experiencing the intense challenges faced by previous generations. We tend to forget, or fail to imagine, how difficult it is to start life anew far from the homeland. We forget also that nostalgia, the longing for the return to homeland, is a deep and enduring aspect of the refugee experience.
In the same interview he said about his language that "I am drawn to the quirky sayings and observations that define a person or a culture". 
Lublinianka is the oldest sports organization in the city of Lublin, and one of the oldest in the region. It continues the traditions of pre-1939 Wojskowy Klub Sportowy (Military Sports Club) Unia Lublin. The origins of Lublinianka date back to 1921. At that time, it had two departments: football, and track and field. In 1923, the organization split into WKS Lublin and KS Lublinianka, to be reunited in 1927 as WKS Unia. 
The drama, set in deep Soviet occupation era of Estonia, was developed by integrating a number of essays collected from 13-year-old schoolchildren of the era, and developed into a coherent, yet comprehensive plot depicting everyday life and culture of 1980s early teenagers. 
It was staged by Karusoo 1980 in the State Youth Theatre of the Estonian SSR. The text was born in course of repetitions. It was played at Klooga rand, a beach outside of Tallinn. 
As the director, Merle Karusoo was awarded by the award of the Theatre Union of the Estonian SSR (1980). The troupe got the collective special award of the Theatre Union. 
The experiment contributed significantly to the development of the CORSIKA simulation program which is use heavily in astroparticle physics. Co-located with KASCADE-Grande is the LOPES experiment. LOPES consists of radio antennas and measures the radio emission of extensive air showers. 
KASCADE (including all extensions) stopped operation in 2013, but a part of the detectors is still used in other experiments for cosmic-ray air showers, e.g., LOFAR or Tunka. 
The data acquired by KASCADE-Grande have meanwhile be made accesibile to the public in the KASCADE Cosmic-Ray Data Center (KCDC). 
KASCADE studied heavier components of cosmic rays, finding a "knee" near 80 PeV in 2011, and extending the spectrum measurements to 200PeV. 
Later, a knee-like feature in the heavy component and an ankle-like feature in the light component of cosmic rays was discovered at an energy of about 1017 eV. 
The Oilers were led offensively by rookie superstar Wayne Gretzky, as he tied for the lead league in points at 137, however lost the Art Ross Trophy due to scoring 2 fewer goals than winner Marcel Dionne. Gretzky, however, won the Hart Memorial Trophy as MVP of the NHL but was declared ineligible for the Calder Memorial Trophy due to his playing days in the WHA. 
They made the playoffs, however, they were quickly swept out by the powerful Philadelphia Flyers in 3 games, but Oilers fans were very excited about being part of the NHL, and of the future of the team. 
Note: GP = Games played, W = Wins, L = Losses, T = Ties, Pts = Points, GF = Goals for, GA = Goals against 
*Oilers promised to not make Paul Shmyr one of its priority selections in the 1979 NHL expansion draft  
The march was supported by the Unemployed Councils, a project of the Communist Party USA. It was an important part of a chain of events that resulted in the unionization of the U.S. auto industry. 
On Tuesday, October 29, 1929, the stock market had crashed, leading to the Great Depression. Vehicle production in the country plummeted. In 1930, production declined to 3,363,000 vehicles. In 1931, production fell to 1,332,000 vehicles, only 25% of the production of two years before. 
As a result, unemployment in Detroit skyrocketed, and the wages of those still working were slashed. In 1929, the average annual wage for auto workers was $1639. By 1931, it had fallen 54% to $757. By 1932, there were 400,000 unemployed in Michigan. 
The Detroit Unemployed Council and the Auto, Aircraft and Vehicle Workers of America called for a march on Monday, March 7, 1932, from Detroit to Dearborn to end at the Ford River Rouge Complex, the company's largest factory. 
The mayor of Detroit was Frank Murphy, a politician who later became Governor of Michigan. He was later appointed by Franklin D. Roosevelt as an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States. The Murphy administration decided to allow the march to proceed, although they did not grant a permit. 
About 25 Dearborn police officers were injured by thrown rocks and other debris; however, none were hit by gunfire. 
The mainstream trade union movement spoke out against the killings. The Detroit Federation of Labor, affiliated with the American Federation of Labor, issued a statement saying that "The outrageous murdering of workers at the Ford Motor Plant in Dearborn on Monday has cast a stain on this community that will remain a disgrace for many years." 
On March 12, at least 25,000 and perhaps as many as 60,000 people participated in a funeral procession for the four dead marchers, who were buried side by side in Woodmere Cemetery in Detroit. The slogan of the funeral march was "Smash the Ford-Murphy Terror". 
Three months later, a fifth marcher, Curtis Williams, died from his injuries. He was African American and could not be officially buried in Woodmere Cemetery, which was then segregated and for whites only. His family arranged for his cremation and his ashes were scattered in the area near the graves of his fellow marchers. 
Nine years later, on April 11, 1941, after the economy had begun to recover and 40,000 Ford workers conducted a ten-day sit down strike, Henry Ford signed a collective bargaining agreement with the United Auto Workers union. 
Photographic evidence of the march and the funerals that followed can be found at the website of the Walter P. Reuther Library, Wayne State University. 
The Constitution of the Republic of Singapore Tribunal is an ad hoc tribunal established by Article 100 of the Constitution of the Republic of Singapore. Article 100 was introduced into the Constitution by the Constitution of the Republic of Singapore (Amendment No. 2) Act 1994, which was passed by Parliament on 25 August 1994 and assented to by President Ong Teng Cheong on 14 September 1994. It came into force on 1 October 1994. 
Prior to the enactment of Article 100, Deputy Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong noted during the Second Reading of the Constitution of the Republic of Singapore (Amendment No. 2) Bill that the Singapore Constitution had no provisions for referring questions of constitutional interpretation to the courts for an advisory ruling, especially those relating to new and complex provisions of the Constitution. Article 100 was intended to address this perceived lacuna in the Constitution. 
A constitutional question can be referred to the Tribunal on three grounds. First, under Article 100 itself, the President, acting on the advice of Cabinet, may refer to the Tribunal for its opinion any question as to the effect of any provision of the Constitution which has arisen or appears to the President likely to arise. During the parliamentary debates preceding the introduction of Article 100, Nominated Member of Parliament Associate Professor Walter Woon posed the following question: 
The President can only refer a constitutional question to the tribunal on the advice of the Cabinet. He has no discretion to refer it himself. If you are going to give the power to the President to clear up constitutional ambiguities, would it not be better to allow him to make the reference himself when he sees there is an ambiguity, rather than to constrain it only to situations where Cabinet sees there is an ambiguity?
Questions referred to the Tribunal may concern the validity of enacted laws or of bills that have not yet been passed by Parliament. 
Among themselves, the judges in each category rank according to the priority of their appointments to the Bench. 
The Constitutional Tribunal, which consisted of the Chief Justice Yong Pung How and Judges of Appeal M. Karthigesu and L.P. Thean, held that although Article 5(2A) was in abeyance, it represented the will of Parliament and therefore had to be taken into consideration. The Tribunal concluded that the President had no power under Article 22H(1) to withhold his assent to any bill seeking to amend any of the provisions referred to in Article 5(2A). 
The President, acting on the advice of the Cabinet, turned down the request. The reply to Jeyaretnam dated 29 January 1999 pronounced the request as "misconceived". The following reasons were given: 
China Jones is a 1959 Warner Bros. Looney Tunes short directed by Robert McKimson. The short was released on February 14, 1959, and stars Daffy Duck. This cartoon later became rarely shown in the United States due to ethnic caricatures of Chinese and other East Asian people. The cartoon is a spoof of the 1950s TV series China Smith, starring Dan Duryea. 
In the 1990s, cable network Nickelodeon removed the ending in the laundromat scene when Daffy was held prisoner with his faux Chinese rant. The reason is due to offensive ethnic stereotypes, that cartoon wasn't shown in the US nor UK, not even DVD or Blu-Ray releases until WarnerMedia Ride restored a streaming print in 2021. 
Bernardino Machado began in politics from a young age, by the leader of the Regenerator Party, Fontes Pereira de Melo. It was the members of the Regenerator Party who elected him as a deputy for the first time to the Portuguese parliament for Lamego, in the supplementary elections of 1882. In the following legislature (1884-1887) he was reelected, this time by the Coimbra circle. 
In 1890 and 1894 was also elected Peer of the Realm by Coimbra University. During this period he was briefly Minister for Public Works on the Hintze Ribeiro cabinet in 1893, and created the first labour court in Portugal. Taking a special interest in public education, he was made part of the Superior Council of Public Education in 1892, and published several books on the subject. 
In February 1893, Machado joined the first ministry of Hintze Ribeiro, as Minister of Public Works, Commerce and Industry, presenting his resignation in December of that same year. 
Machado was also briefly President of the Directory of the Democratic Party in 1902, and after switching to the Republican Party, was this party's President of the Directory from 1906 to 1909. He was one of the few monarchists-turned-republican who switched during the monarchy. 
Once the Republic was proclaimed in 1910 he was made Minister for Foreign Affairs, and ran an unsuccessful campaign for the Presidential elections of 1911. Afterwards, on 20 January 1912, he was appointed Minister of Portugal in Rio de Janeiro, assuming office in July that year. The diplomatic mission was promoted to embassy in November 1913, with Bernardino Machado being the first Portuguese ambassador to that country. 
Machado ran again for the Presidency in 1915 and was this time elected President of Portugal. In the course of his term, he received Germany's declaration of war (March 1916), and visited the Portuguese forces placed in France in the battlefields. 
For a second time he went into exile in France, where he continued to be very critical of the Portuguese regime. The German occupation of France in 1940 forced him to seek protection in Portugal, which the government granted him with the condition that he was to be confined to his personal retreat in the northern part of Portugal. It was there in Porto that he died, aged 93, in 1944, making him the longest lived Portuguese president ever. 
The Tidnish River is a short Canadian river on the Isthmus of Chignecto along the interprovincial boundary with New Brunswick and Nova Scotia. 
Rising in the northwest corner of Cumberland County, east of the interprovincial boundary, the river's largest tributaries are the West Branch Tidnish River, Little West Branch Tidneish River, Paradise Brook and Chapman's Brook. 
The river becomes a tidal estuary at the community of Tidnish Bridge where the Chignecto Ship Railway constructed a large stone masonry bridge across it.  At Tidnish Bridge, the river flows the final 2 kilometres in a serpentine manner to discharge into the Northumberland Strait at Jacksons Point on Baie Verte. 
Deltoplastis lamellospina is a moth in the family Lecithoceridae. It was described by Chun-Sheng Wu and Kyu-Tek Park in 1998. It is found in Sri Lanka. 
This article relating to the subfamily Torodorinae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jim Knoedel (born c. 1952) was formerly the head Men's and Women's Cross Country and Track Coach at University of Illinois at Chicago, retiring at the end of 2016. Knoedel had held that position at the University since 1996. Prior to coming to UIC, Knoedel was the Assistant Coach at Loyola University Chicago. Jim Knoedel is a 1974 graduate of the University of Iowa 
The USA Track & Field National Office selected Knoedel as the head coach for two United States teams. In 1996 he coached the USA Women's Ekiden team competing in Yokohama, Japan, and in 1999, the Junior Men's Coach at the IAAF World Cross Country Championships in Belfast, Northern Ireland. The Junior Team placed a surprising sixth out of 81 competing countries.  
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David William Donald Mackay AFC (born 1957) is the Chief Pilot of Virgin Galactic, a commercial astronaut and a former RAF test pilot. He is the first native-born Scot to visit space. 
David Mackay was born in Scotland, and lived in Helmsdale, Highland. David's father was a police officer. He would see aircraft flying (low) from RAF Lossiemouth. 
David studied Aeronautical Engineering at the University of Glasgow. He first piloted an aircraft in 1977. 
He joined Virgin Atlantic in 1995, flying Boeing 747s as a Captain from 1999; he also flew the Airbus A340 from 2002. He finished his flying career with over 11,000 hours flying. 
Ita attended the Presbyterian Hope Waddell Training School in Calabar before pursuing his tertiary education at London University and Columbia University in New York. He stayed in the U.S. for 8 years. 
While in Calabar, he was exposed to the teachings of James Aggrey, who pursued academic opportunities for African students in Historical Black Colleges and Universities in America. Calabar became a training ground for some nationalist politicians due to the early site of secondary schools in the city and the influence of people like James Agrrey. 
Some of his mentors were W. E. B. Du Bois and Edward Wilmot Blyden, who were notable Pan-Africanists of their eras. 
Kilruane MacDonaghs GAA is a Tipperary GAA club which is located in County Tipperary, Ireland. Both hurling and Gaelic football are played in the "North-Tipperary" divisional competitions. The club is centred on the villages of Kilruane, Ardcroney and Cloughjordan. The club was founded in 1937 and is named after Thomas MacDonagh, a signatory of the 1916 Proclamation who was born and lived in Cloughjordan. The clubhouse and playing field are located in Cloughjordan. 
The finest day in the club's history was in 1986 when it won the Senior Hurling Club All-Ireland title, defeating Buffers Alley of Wexford GAA in the final by 1-15 to 2-10. 
The club incorporates many of clubs that existed in the parishes at the time. A forerunner to the MacDonaghs club was the famous De Wets formed in 1900. 
1901 , 1902, 1903, 1904, 1906, 1907, 1908 (De Wets), 1940, 1944, 1959, 1965, 1977, 1978, 1979, 1985, 1986, 1987, 1990, 2018 
He was born in Gloucester, the third son of Richard Roberts of Abergavenny and his wife Eleanor. He was educated at Eton College, and elected to a scholarship at King's College, Cambridge. He was a Fellow of King's, from 1756 to 1761. He graduated B.A. in 1757, and became an assistant master at Eton in the same year. While William Hayley was at Eton his poetical aspirations were encouraged by Roberts, then an usher in the school. 
In 1760 Roberts commenced M.A., and in 1771 he was appointed to a fellowship at Eton College. He was created D.D. at Cambridge in 1773, was presented to the rectory of Everdon, Northamptonshire, in 1778, and was inducted to the rectory of Farnham Royal, Buckinghamshire, on 3 June 1779. 
After the death of Edward Barnard, Roberts was appointed Provost of Eton College on 12 December 1781. For many years he was one of the king's chaplains. He died at Eton on 5 December 1791. 
According to William Cole, Roberts held noisy card playing parties at Eton. Fanny Burney  found him "good-humoured, loquacious, gay, civil, and parading". Both remarked on how fat he was. 
Roberts in 1755 contributed English verses to the university collection, on the visit of the Duke of Newcastle, In 1758 he gained the members' prize at Cambridge on the subject, Utrum diversarum Gentium Mores et Instituta a diverso earum situ explicari possint? Cambridge, 1758. Elegia scripta in coemeterio rustico latine reditta, published in 1762, was a Latin translation of Thomas Gray's Elegy Written in a Country Churchyard, with Christopher Anstey. 
His second wife was Charlotte Chamberlayne (born 1741), daughter of Edward Chamberlayne, rector of Great Cressingham, and Elizabeth de Grey his wife. She was sister of: Thomas Chamberlayne, a fellow of Eton College; Edward Chamberlayne, a Treasury official; and Ann Chamberlayne, who married Benjamin Kennicott. Also to George Chamberlayne, a Catholic convert. 
The plant grows wild on hillsides, shrubs, and is often cultivated as an ornamental plant. To the Sumatran Malays, this plant is known as daun putri or nusa indah (though the latter name refers to other species). Its twigs, leaves and roots are used as medicine. 
"Gunby is on the edge of the Lincolnshire Wolds, near Spilsby, some eight miles from Skegness and not far from Tennyson's home at Somersby. It was of Gunby that Tennyson wrote the lines a haunt of ancient peace." 
The house is built from red brick, and was constructed in 1700 for Sir William Massingberd. Many of the interiors of the house are wood panelled, and it has 8 acres of Victorian walled gardens, which contain traditional English flowers, fruits and vegetables. The Hall is a Grade 1 listed building. It was substantially extended in 1873 and again in 1898 with the addition of the North Wing and Clock Tower. 
The Hall contains significant collections of art, furniture, porcelain and silver including original pieces by Sir Joshua Reynolds, Edward Lear, William Morris, Lord Tennyson, William Holman Hunt, James Boswell, Samuel Johnson, Thomas Sheraton and Lucio Rannuci. 
Surrounding the hall is a 100-acre park, listed as being of historical significance and laid out in the style of Lancelot "Capability" Brown. Around that is a farmed estate of 1,500 acres. the estate used to extend to many thousands of acres and reached the coast at what is now Skegness. Land was sold in the 19th century to the Earl of Scarbrough who built the town of Skegness to satisfy increasing demand from tourism created by the expansion of the railways. 
The gardens are laid out in an informal English style with large Victorian walled and kitchen gardens, lawns, an arboretum and carp pond believed to be older than the main hall. There are 50 types of apple tree, 21 of pear and over 50 types of rose in the gardens. There is also a 17th-century dove cote, a grass tennis court, croquet pitch, cottage, apple store and studio. 
On the edge of the formal gardens and within the Park lies St Peter's Church. Rebuilt on medieval foundations in the 1870s, the Church is accessible only through the Hall's gardens but it remains the active Parish Church of Gunby with a service once a month. 
Lloyd Vernet "Beau" Bridges III (born December 9, 1941) is an American actor and director. He is a three-time Emmy, two-time Golden Globe and one-time Grammy Award winner, as well as a two-time Screen Actors Guild Award nominee. Bridges was awarded a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame on April 7, 2003, at 7065 Hollywood Boulevard for his contributions to the television industry. He is the son of actor Lloyd Bridges and elder brother of fellow actor Jeff Bridges. 
Wanting to become a basketball star, he played in his freshman year at the University of California, Los Angeles (UCLA) under legendary coach John Wooden, where he joined Sigma Alpha Epsilon, he later transferred to the University of Hawaii. In 1959, he enlisted in the United States Coast Guard Reserve and served for eight years. 
In 2001, he guest-starred as Daniel McFarland, the stepfather of Jack McFarland, in two episodes of the NBC sitcom Will & Grace. He played a single father and college professor in the fantasy adventure film, Voyage of the Unicorn, based on the novel by James C. Christensen. 
From 2002 to 2003, he took on the role of Senator Tom Gage, newly appointed Director of the Central Intelligence Agency, in over 30 episodes of the drama series The Agency. In January 2005, he was cast as Major General Hank Landry, the new commander of Stargate Command in Stargate SG-1. He also played the character in five episodes of the spin-off series Stargate Atlantis as well as the two direct to DVD films Stargate: The Ark of Truth and Stargate: Continuum. 
His role in the film Smile, with Linda Hamilton and Sean Astin, showcased his personal beliefs in helping others. 
In November 2005, he guest-starred as Carl Hickey, the father of the title character in the hit NBC comedy My Name Is Earl. Bridges' character became recurring. Bridges received a 2007 Emmy Award nomination for his performance. 
On February 8, 2009, Cynthia Nixon, Blair Underwood, and Bridges won a Grammy Award for Best Spoken Word Album for their recording of Al Gore's An Inconvenient Truth. 
In 2009, Bridges guest-starred as Eli Scruggs on the 100th episode of Desperate Housewives and received an Emmy Award nomination for his performance. 
On January 3, 2012, Bridges took on the role of J.B. Biggley in the hit revival of the Broadway musical How to Succeed in Business Without Really Trying, taking over for John Larroquette. He was contracted to play the role until July 1, 2012. However, the revival closed May 20, 2012. 
On October 3, 2013, Bridges became a major character on the CBS television show The Millers. He plays Tom, the father of two children: son Nathan Miller (Will Arnett) and daughter Debbie (Jayma Mays). Tom, after forty-three years of marriage, has gotten divorced and has moved back in with his daughter, driving her crazy. Bridges joined the series in early March 2013. 
Bridges has had several roles in films since then including Underdog Kids and Lawless Range in 2016. He has also had guest roles on the shows Masters of Sex and Code Black. 
Bridges has 14 Emmy Award nominations with three wins. He is the only actor to win the Emmy for Outstanding Supporting Actor In A Miniseries Or Special more than once, with two wins. 
Bridges married Julie Landfield in 1964 and the two divorced in 1974. They have two sons: Casey Bridges (b. 1969) and actor Jordan Bridges (b. 1973). He married Wendy Treece in 1984. They have three children: Dylan Bridges (b. 1984), Emily Bridges (b. 1986), and Ezekiel Jeffrey "Zeke" Bridges (b. 1993). 
Bridges is a Christian. He has stated that if the script calls for his character to say God's name in vain, he will ask the director if he can change the line. Bridges is a vegan and has been since 2004. 
Barbara Kanam (born September 27, 1973) is a Congolese singer-songwriter, music producer and actress. 
In 1995, Kanam settled in Abidjan, Ivory Coast, where she experimented musically by joining a religious choir. She later joined a church ensemble called the "Grace Choir" in Cocody, Ivory Coast, as a regular singer. In 1997, Kanam resumed her studies in international business.[citation needed] 
In 1998, Kanam released her first album, Mokili, with producer Kone Dodo, which popularized her in the African music genre, and earned her a Kora Award nomination. 
In 2003, she released her second album, Teti, which gained international recognition. She then began touring across Africa and Europe, and earned the following awards: 
Her career has included numerous collaborations with artists such as Jacob Desvarieux, and Edgar Yonkeu, with whom she produced African Dance Company in 2006. In 2006, Kanam accepted an invitation to appear on Fally Ipupa's album Droit Chemin in a song entitled 100% Love. Subsequently, Ipupa contributed to a song on Kanam's album entitled Noir et Blanc. 
The Spali (Latin: Spalaei, Spali, Palaei, Pali) was an ancient tribe mentioned in classical geography that inhabited the south of Russia. 
Louella Pettway was the youngest child of one son and six daughters born to Elizabeth and Sim Carson. She and her siblings raised crops typical of Gee's Bend farms: cotton, corn, sweet potatoes, peanuts, and peas. She went to school until the first grade. Her mother passed when she was still young and her father raised her and most of his grandchildren by himself. 
Louella did not grow up making quilts, though she learned to sew from her mother, who made all of her children's clothing. Louella began quilting after she married, and made quilts consistently until she developed arthritis. She recalls making quilts and giving them away; she made them for enjoyment as well as utility. 
This article about an artist from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Rafael Elizondo (born 21 September 1954) is a Costa Rican weightlifter. He competed in the men's light heavyweight event at the 1988 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to weightlifting in Costa Rica is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"A Little More Work" is a song recorded by Canadian country music artist Kira Isabella. It was released July 31, 2012 as the third single from her debut studio album Love Me Like That (2012). Peaking at number 68 on the Billboard Canadian Hot 100 and number 5 on the Canada Country airplay chart, it is, as of March 2018, Isabella's most commercially successful single. A "radio mix" of the song was released October 21, 2014 as Isabella's second American single, following "Quarterback". 
The video for "A Little More Work" was nominated for the CMT Video of the Year award at the 2013 Canadian Country Music Association Awards, but lost to Gord Bamford's "Leaning on a Lonesome Song". 
"A Little More Work" debuted at number 93 on the Canadian Hot 100 for the week of September 8, 2012. 
"Legendary" is a song by Canadian electronic music producer Deadmau5 with British rapper Shotty Horroh. An earlier edit of the song was uploaded to Deadmau5's YouTube channel in December 2016, and the song was officially released through Mau5trap on August 25, 2017, with a music video for the song released on September 11, 2017. 
Zimmerman first revealed that he would collaborate with Rooney on a Twitch livestream in 2016. On December 21, 2016, Zimmerman unofficially released an early edit of "Legendary" on his YouTube channel. This version featured an explicit voice sample of Donald Trump, which was omitted in the final release. Seven months later, on July 21, 2017, Shotty Horroh officially signed to Mau5trap and confirmed future releases. 
The music video for "Legendary" was released through Mau5trap's official YouTube channel on September 11, 2017. It features Shotty Horroh rapping, additional footage of Deadmau5 in his studio, and various YouTube comments. 
The women's heavyweight (70 kg/154 lbs) Full-Contact category at the W.A.K.O. European Championships 2004 in Budva was the second heaviest of the female Full-Contact tournaments and involved just five fighters.  Each of the matches were three rounds of two minutes each and were fought under Full-Contact kickboxing rules. 
As there were too few competitors for an eight-woman tournament, three of the fighters received a bye into the semi finals.  The tournament gold medallist was Julia Chernenko from Russia who defeated Karolina Lukasik from Poland by unanimous decision in the final.  Pierina Guerreri from Italy and Jelena Duric from hosts Serbia and Montenegro claimed bronze. 
Gum Creek is a historic home located near Columbia, Fluvanna County, Virginia.  It was built about 1797, and is a 1 1/2-story, three bay, center passage plan frame dwelling on a stone foundation.  Two one-story, shed roofed additions were built after 1839. It features unpainted original interior woodwork, a basement kitchen and stone and brick end chimneys. Also on the property are a contributing smokehouse, buggy shed, and the original stone-enclosed spring. 
This article about a property in Fluvanna County, Virginia on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fluorescence recovery protein (FRP) is a small protein involved in regulating non-photochemical quenching in cyanobacteria.  It prevents accumulation of the red photoactivated form of orange carotenoid protein (OCP), thereby reducing the amount of fluorescence quenching that occurs between the OCP and the phycobilisome antenna complexes.  It interacts with the C-terminal domain of OCP, which shares homology with the NTF2 superfamily. 
FRP is constitutively active, both in vivo and in vitro.  It is able to prevent quenching of phycobilin fluorescence by OCP in vitro. Overexpression of FRP in Synechocystis PCC 6803 leads to an absence of fluorescence quenching. Deletion mutants of FRP show a slightly larger degree of fluorescence quenching induced by strong blue-green light, but was unable to restore fluorescence levels when transferred to low-light or darkness. 
The gene for FRP is commonly found immediately downstream of OCP, although a CrtW-like B-carotene ketolase gene is occasionally found between the OCP and FRP.  The FRP gene is transcribed independently from OCP in Synechocystis 6803 and thus the OCP/FRP locus is not considered an operon. 
Bushnell, the son of Nathan & Chloe (Scranton) Bushnell, was born July 19, 1829, in Madison, Connecticut. At the age of 15, he decided to become a sailor and shipped out on a coastal vessel. Within a year and a half, he was master of a 60-ton schooner.  Later, he went into the grocery business with his brother. 
The bankrupt New Haven and New London Railroad offered new opportunities for him.  Working with friends and with his own capital, he invested in the railroad.  By 1860, under Bushnell's guidance, it had completed a critical connection with the Providence Road, which completed the connection between New York City and Boston. By 1861, Bushnell had been elected president of the railroad. 
Bushnell was in Washington, D.C., when the Civil War broke out.  At that time, he volunteered to defend the capital in a militia unit until regular troops could be moved in.  He mustered out on May 4, 1861, after the arrival of the 6th Massachusetts Infantry. 
Bushnell was also involved in the early development of a hand-crank powered submarine. the Intelligent Whale.  He disposed of his interest in the project before any actual attempts to deploy the vessel were made, however. 
Following the Civil War, Bushnell returned to the railroad industry, and was one of the organizers of the Union Pacific Railroad.  He died in New York City. 
Loring Air Force Base (IATA: LIZ, ICAO: KLIZ) was a United States Air Force installation in northeastern Maine, near Limestone and Caribou in Aroostook County. It was one of the largest bases of the U.S. Air Force's Strategic Air Command during its existence, and was transferred to the newly created Air Combat Command in 1992. 
Loring was home to a civilian population, many of whom were employed alongside active duty service members. The base included many amenities, such as a hospital, school, and ski hill, which facilitated the adjustment to Maine life by the civilians. 
The 1991 Base Realignment and Closure Commission recommended that Loring be closed and its aircraft and mission be distributed to other bases in the nation. The base was closed in September 1994 after over forty years of service. It was redeveloped by the Loring Development Authority as the Loring Commerce Centre, an industrial and aviation park; the airfield is operated as Loring International Airport. 
Another nearby installation was the GLOBECOM Communications Annex #2, located in Perham, Maine. From 1955 to 1962, it was run by the 2192nd Communications Squadron, which operated from Loring AFB. 
The 1991 Base Realignment and Closure Commission recommended closure of Loring AFB, and it was closed in September 1994. It was later reopened as the Loring Commerce Centre. 
The 42nd Bomb Wing was the host unit at Loring AFB from 1953 until 1994, supporting national security objectives with mission-ready B-52G Stratofortresses, and KC-135 Stratotanker aircraft. The wing had the ability to deploy at any time to support both SAC, and later, ACC missions. It was operational at Loring from 1953 to 1994. 
The 42nd Operations Group (OG) formerly supported national security objectives, as directed by the Joint Chiefs of Staff, utilizing B-52 and KC-135 aircraft. Operational squadrons during the time of its operation at Loring included: 
All B-52s carried the "LZ" Tailcode. In addition to the 42nd OG, other components of the 42nd Bomb Wing were: 
Upon Loring's 1994 closure, the 42nd was moved to Maxwell Air Force Base in Alabama, where it became the 42nd Air Base Wing. All other squadrons of the wing were inactivated and have remained inactive, except for the 69th, which was reactivated in 2009 at Minot Air Force Base. 
Loring AFB was named in 1954 for Major Charles J. Loring, Jr., USAF, a Medal of Honor recipient during the Korean War. During the morning of 22 November 1952, he led a flight of F-80 Shooting Stars on patrol over Kunwha. After beginning a dive bombing run and getting hit, he entered into a controlled dive and destroyed a Chinese gun emplacement on Sniper Ridge that was harassing United Nations troops. Limestone Air Force Base was renamed in his honor. 
One of the first structures was the Arch Hangar. At the time, it was the largest monolithic arch roof structure in the US, and one of the largest hangars in the world. The construction of the hangar was also groundbreaking, including a foundation set on bedrock, extensive footing structures, intricate formwork, and a 340-foot arch span. 
The runway was resurfaced in 1955 in anticipation of the arrival of the B-52 Stratofortress in 1956. Eighteen additional "nose-dock" hangars (hangars which could contain the nose and wings of the aircraft, allowing for maintenance to the cockpit area by the crew, without the need to use the larger hangars) were built in 1956 to the northwest of the runway, near the main parking area, along with parking areas and taxiways for these hangars. 
As the Cold War progressed, so did the need for new aircraft and techniques. The first KC-97 Stratofreighter arrived at Loring with the activation of the 42d Air Refueling Squadron in January 1955. The B-36's were not actually equipped to perform aerial refueling, so the planes supported other units until the arrival of the B-52 in 1956. Eventually, 21 tankers were based at Loring, along with 30 air crews. 
By 1955, the base consisted of the 42d, 69th, 70th, and the 75th Bombardment Squadrons. A hospital became operational. The next January, a B-52 landed at the airfield as part of a cold weather testing program. Five months later, the first Stratofortress, the "State of Maine", was permanently stationed at Loring. 
An Alert Force was established at Loring AFB in October 1957. The wing began supporting the force with six B-52s in January 1958. In response to a conflict in Lebanon, the Alert Force was expanded to include the entire bombardment wing in July 1958, when the SAC bomber force went to full alert status. SAC's overall goal was achieved in 1960. 
On 11 March 1958, base personnel were the first members of the Air Force to land a B-52 in a wheels-up configuration at Westover AFB near Springfield, Massachusetts. After being lifted up and onto its wheels, the plane was flown to Kelly AFB at San Antonio, Texas, for a complete overhaul and inspection, before it was returned to the 42nd. 
Loring was also home to an administrations support base of a Green Pine communications crew from Naval Station Argentia. The detachment did not even officially exist on the base, even though it was located on the top floor of the Bachelors Officers Quarters and consisted of six men. 
Fighter aircraft were also assigned to the base during its operation. The F-102 Delta Dagger, which was assigned to the 27th Fighter-Interceptor Squadron, was located on base from 1957 to 1960 while the F-106 Delta Dart was assigned from 16 October 1959 to 1 July 1971, and to the 83d Fighter-Interceptor Squadron from July 1971 to June 1972. 
The Nuclear Weapons Storage Area at Loring once operated as a separate, top secret facility. Originally called the North River Depot, the remote area to the northeast of Loring's property was the first U.S. operational site specifically constructed for the storage, assembly, and testing of atomic weapons. 
A parallel series of four fences, one of which was electrified, surrounded the heart of the storage area. This area was nicknamed the "Q" Area, which denoted the Department of Energy's Q clearance required to have access to Restricted Data. 
In June 1962, the Atomic Energy Commission released its custody and ownership of the weapons to the Air Force. The personnel and property of the later named Caribou Air Force Station were absorbed into the adjacent Loring Air Force Base. 
The New England Division of the Army Corps of Engineers managed the construction of these sites. The sites were manned by men from the 3rd Missile Battalion, 61st Air Defense Artillery Regiment, and provided defense for Loring and the northeastern approaches to the United States. In 1960, sites L-13 and L-58 underwent conversion from Ajax missiles to the MIM-14 Nike-Hercules missiles. These sites remained operational until 1966, although the site at Limestone was closed in September 1958. 
Operation Head Start was conducted at the base from September to December 1958. It helped to demonstrate that a continuous airborne alert could be maintained successfully. 
Before each flight, a briefing was held, alerting the crewmembers to basic world events as well as safety criteria. At least 15 hours before takeoff, the crew would thoroughly pre-flight their aircraft. Inadvertently, this also increased efficiency in terms of maintenance and other pre-flight routines. 
Every six hours, a bomber would take off with live warheads and continue on a pre-determined path over Greenland and eastern Canada, a trip that ended 20 hours later. Frequently, "Foxtrot: No message required" messages were sent to the bomber from Strategic Air Command headquarters at Offutt Air Force Base, keeping the crews alert. 
While entering the landing pattern, crash trucks would travel to the runway and await landing. This was standard procedure for all Head Start landings. After landing, the crew was interrogated prior to being released, so that maintenance, intelligence, and other crews could be alerted to the performance of the plane and other items that the crew might have noticed during their flight. After release, they would typically go to the Physical Conditioning room for a steam bath and rubdown. 
Operation Head Start eventually led to Operation Chrome Dome. Chrome Dome was an operation where bombers would be in constant airborne alert and loiter at points just outside the Soviet Union. 
On 5 September 1983, members of the 42d Air Refueling Squadron escorted a crippled F-4E Phantom II over the Atlantic Ocean after it experienced the loss of an engine. For its actions, crew E-113 received the Mackay Trophy for refueling it four times and towing it with its refueling boom. 
In 1981, Loring's bombers were placed on alert after Soviet submarines were spotted off the coast of the region. The base was briefly mentioned in the 1983 movie WarGames, although the film erroneously listed Loring as being home to the 43rd Bombardment Wing. In 1982, the base was hit by two earthquakes, which damaged the base hospital and caused cracks to appear on the walls of the control tower. 
In 1989, it was proposed to list Loring on the Environmental Protection Agency's National Priorities List. This was due to the presence of waste oil, fuel, solvents, and pesticides in the soil. Additionally, the burning of waste also created problems, in addition to the use of landfills in old gravel pits on site. The fire training area also needed clean up, as materials were burned until 1974 on that site. Loring was officially added to the list in February 1990. 
It has been learned that another member of the 2192nd Communications Squadron working at the Caswell Radar Station had been contacted by the base commander to look out towards the base and report what he sees.  That member responded, I see a helicopter with people rappelling out of it.  To quote him, "I never saw a UFO, but I did see a helicopter".  This incident was a base readiness security drill that has been passed off as a UFO sighting. 
In 1991, Secretary of Defense Dick Cheney, upon the recommendation of Secretary of the Air Force Donald B. Rice, identified Loring and five other SAC bases for closure through the BRAC Commission. The commission recommended that the 42d Bomb Wing be disestablished, and the B-52Gs transferred to the 410th Bomb Wing at K.I. Sawyer AFB near Marquette, Michigan. The KC-135 aircraft were realigned to USAF Reserve and other active units. 
The commission also projected an impact on the future of the community; 22,000 people were projected to leave the region with 9,900 direct and indirect jobs affected, and a loss of over $92 million of regional income. This was in contrast to a regional population of over 49,100, available jobs of 33,320, and an annual income of $755 million. The net savings by the end of 1997 from closing the base was $182 million, or about $61.8 million annually. 
As the Cold War ended, so did the mission of SAC, and it was disestablished on 1 June 1992. The last B-52 departed Loring in November 1993, and ceremonies were held in February 1994 to celebrate the end of the flying mission. The following month saw the last KC-135 depart and after 41 years, Loring AFB officially closed on 30 September 1994. 
Families at the base were able to take advantage of many of the opportunities that the facility provided for them, as life at Loring was not all military-related. Although Loring was constructed with support facilities including a hospital, chapel, and schools, other forms of civilian life were added over the years as well. 
Younger students on the base attended Damon Elementary School or Harrison Elementary School. Kindergarten-age children would attend school in either morning or afternoon sessions, and the older students were given the standard fare of lunch offerings. School educators were rated highly in the state. Students in grades 7 through twelve attended the nearby Limestone High School. 
For those who wanted to earn a graduate degree, the University of Denver offered a twelve course program for those wanting to earn a Master of Science degree in systems management. Embry-Riddle also offered three graduate degrees, including the Master of Aeronautical Science. The University of Maine at Presque Isle also offered a Master of Public Administration as well. 
The base's Education Center also provided testing service for those interested in taking exams. It provided the CLEP, DANTES Exams, SAT, ACT, the LSAT and GRE exams. The Community College of the Air Force also enrolled active duty personnel in its programs as well. Credits taken there could be transferred to other affiliated Air Force technical institutions, and personnel could qualify for commissioning programs. 
Military members adjusting to Loring had many facilities available to them. This included the Family Service Center, the Family Services Lending Closet, and the Corey Center. 
The base was also served by an independent bank, and included help for many types of financial needs, and an ATM. The Country Federal Credit Union was located right outside the facility, and helped supplement the bank itself. 
Shopping at Loring could be completed at the Maine Exchange Shopping Mall, which was designed to be a one-stop shop for the shopping needs of the residents. Goods could also be purchased at the base commissary as well, which included a Class VI store. 
Loring also was built with a non-denominational chapel, which helped to welcome new members onto the base. Services were offered to those of the Roman Catholic, Protestant denominations, and Judaic faiths. Members of the chapel also provided food for those who ate in Loring's dining hall, and helped to share the word of God to those who were believers. 
The base also came with its own newspaper, named Limelite. The on-base newspaper helped to provide readers with information on the USAF and Strategic Air Command, as well as information on the events happening around the facility. 
The main dining hall on base was named Dahlgren Hall, after Maine native Edward Dahlgren, who was a recipient of the Medal of Honor for his actions in World War II. 
A small downhill ski area provided recreation for personnel and their dependents, operating on the base from the early 1960s until Loring's closure in 1994. This ski chalet also included a lighted skating rink and could be used to host events in the area. The base also offered trips to regional ski resorts periodically, and cross country skiing was offered at the local golf course. 
The base also contained a Noncommissioned Officers Club and an Officers Club. The Noncommissioned Officers Club, or Club 42 as it was known, allowed in all military members and civilians up the GS-7. Many varieties of food were also offered there, and it could be used for live entertainment, in addition to the booking of parties. As the Visiting Officers Quarters and the Unaccompanied Officers Quarters were nearby, the club was also a convenient stopover for transient officers as well. 
Loring AFB was set to close as a result of the 1991 Base Realignment and Closure Commission, officially closing on 30 September 1994. Immediately, Limestone was decimated. The population of Limestone dropped 76%, from 10,000 to 2,000, in the six years following the base's closure. Regional economic activity was severely lowered, as 19% of the local economy was related to Loring Air Force Base. 
In 1998, the former base was considered for inclusion on the National Register of Historic Places, as previous studies had found that 88 buildings were eligible for inclusion on the list, including the base's arch hangar. 
Phish again staged a weekendlong concert, this time called Lemonwheel, on 15 and 16 August 1998.  60,000 people attended creating a community of fans that, again, made Limestone one of the largest cities in Maine over the weekend. 
Phish played a third weekendlong concert at the base called the IT Festival, on 2 and 3 August 2003. 60,000 people attended and again, Phish was the only band at the event, performing seven sets of music over two nights, including a late night ambient set on top of the air traffic control tower at 2:30 AM after the first night's concert. 
Cleanup continued at the base, including the removal of hazardous materials, which prevented further waste from entering the nearby Greenlaw Brook, as it received drainage from the flightline and nose dock areas. 
During the 1970s, the population of the base declined due to the possible closure of the base and the draw down in personnel from the Vietnam War. In 1972, the base's population was around 12,000, while in 1975 the population was 10,758. In 1978, 9,233 persons resided on the base, which declined to 8,116 the next year. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 225 people, 82 households, and 57 families residing on the former base. The population density was 27.4/mi2 (10.6/km2). There were 355 housing units at an average density of 43.2/mi2 (16.7/km2). The racial makeup of the base was 81.33% White, 10.22% African American, 2.22% Asian, 5.33% from other races, and 0.89% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 13.78% of the population. 
The Collegiate Church of St Mary is a Church of England parish church in the town of Warwick, England. It is in the centre of the town just east of the market place. It is grade I listed, and a member of the Major Churches Network. 
The church has the status of collegiate church as it had a college of secular canons. In governance and religious observance it was similar to a cathedral (although not the seat of a bishop and without diocesan responsibilities). There is a Bishop of Warwick, but this is an  episcopal title used by a suffragan bishop of the Diocese of Coventry. 
The church foundations date back nearly nine hundred years, being created by Roger de Beaumont, 2nd Earl of Warwick, in 1123. In addition to founding the church, de Beaumont established the College of Dean and Canons at the church. The only surviving part of the Norman church which de  Beaumont had built is the crypt. 
The college was dissolved in 1546, and the church was granted by the crown to the burgesses of Warwick. Before their destruction in the Civil War, Wencelaus Hollar copied many of the stained glass windows in the Beauchamp Chapel, showing heraldry of the Beauchamp family. 
There are two organs in St. Mary's, the transept organ and one at the west end. The specifications of both organs can be found on the National Pipe  Organ Register. 
Bear and ragged staff, emblem of the earls, city and county of Warwick. Tomb of Robert Dudley and Lettice Knollys 
Effigy of Robert Dudley, son of Robert Dudley and Lettice Knollys, known as the "Noble Impe", on his tomb in the Beauchamp Chapel 
Beginning in 1933, after the Cipher Bureau's mathematician-cryptologist Marian Rejewski reconstructed the German military Enigma rotor cipher machine, AVA built Enigma "doubles" as well as all the electro-mechanical equipment subsequently designed at the Cipher Bureau to expedite routine breaking and reading of Enigma ciphers. 
Semmler was born Clement William Semmler on 23 December 1914 in Eastern Well, South Australia. His parents were Germans of the Lutheran faith. He studied at Murray Bridge High School and then at the University of Adelaide, graduating with an M.A. with honours in English language and literature. 
He taught English and Latin at Unley High School, South Australia until 1942 when he joined the Australian Broadcasting Commission. 
When he assumed control of programs at the ABC in the 1950s and 1970s, he "introduced  jazz programs by Eric Child, Kym Bonython, Arch McKirdy, Ian Neil and others, and arranged regular programs from jazz groups all over Australia" and arranged "record-breaking concert tours by Australian jazz bands" (including those of Graeme Bell and Bob Barnard and the Australian Jazz Quintet). 
During his leisure time during his years at the ABC, Semmler devoted much of his leisure time to writing numerous books and reviews. In 1966 Lansdowne Press published his study of the Australian poet Banjo Paterson, The Banjo of the Bush. Other books from Semmler in this period included studies of Barcroft Boake (1965), Kenneth Slessor (1966) and Douglas Stewart (1974). 
He was a book reviewer for The Sydney Morning Herald for many years. He also wrote the "Semmler on Television" column for the same newspaper. 
The library of the University of New South Wales's College of Fine Arts was named the Clement Semmler Library in his honour. 
Disenchanted with the new direction the ABC was taking, Semmler retired in 1977. He moved to Bowral in the Southern Highlands of New South Wales, where he remained busy writing books, articles and letters to the editor and presenting a "regular jazz program on the local community FM station". 
Books written and edited in this period included The ABC: Aunt Sally and Sacred Cow (1981),  The War Diaries of Kenneth Slessor (1985), and his memoirs, Pictures on the Margin (1991). 
His final book review was published in Quadrant just after he died in August 2000. A note accompanying it says he "wrote more reviews for the magazine, over forty-three years, than anybody else". 
Semmler was married twice: firstly to Ella, with whom he had a son, barrister Peter, and a daughter Jacqueline, and secondly to Catherine, with whom he had a daughter, creative producer Imogen. 
In 1969 Semmler was awarded a D.Litt. by the University of New England "on the basis of his published works". For his contributions to Australian literature he received an Order of the British Empire in 1972 and was made a Member of the Order of Australia in 1989. 
James Asmus is a writer, actor and comedian known for his affiliation with such theaters as The Annoyance and the sketch group Hey You Millionaires, and for his work writing comic books such as Quantum and Woody, Thief of Thieves and Gambit. 
Asmus has written several plays for both the Annoyance Theater and The New Colony theater group in Chicago. The plays he has written include Love Is Dead (The Annoyance), Hearts Full of Blood (the New Colony) and Amelia Earhart Jungle Princes (The New Colony). Both Love is Dead and Hearts Full of Blood received remounts in the New York Fringe Fest, winning awards for Outstanding Music & Lyrics and Outstanding Achievement in Playwrighting respectively. 
Asmus is currently most prolific as a comic book writer, writing such comics as Gambit for Marvel Comics, Thief of Thieves for Image Comics, and Quantum & Woody for Valiant Entertainment. 
Baykalsk was founded in 1961 concomitant with the building of a paper mill there, called Baykalsk Paper and Pulp Mills. In 1966 the mill became operational, and the settlement received "city" status. At its peak, the mill employed about 3,500 people. 
In the late 2000s, Baykalsk faced a series of well-documented economic crises stemming from its status as a monotown entirely dependent on the declining and then closed paper mill. 
Within the framework of administrative divisions, Baykalsk is subordinated to Slyudyansky District. As a municipal division, the town of Baykalsk, together with two rural localities in Slyudyansky District, is incorporated within Slyudyansky Municipal District as Baykalskoye Urban Settlement. 
There are nine kindergartens, three theaters, and a new sports center in the town. The residential parts mostly consist of three- and five-story apartment blocks. 
This biographical article related to Cape Verdean association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Kingdom of Vientiane was formed in 1707 as a result of the split of the Kingdom of Lan Xang. The kingdom was a Burmese vassal from 1765 to 1824. It then became a Siamese vassal until 1828 when it was annexed by Siam. 
The Siamese installed Nanthasen, a son of Ong Bun, as ruler. In 1791, Nanthasen convinced King Rama I that Luang Prabang was secretly plotting a rebellion against Siam. He was permitted to attack Luang Prabang and captured the city in 1792. 
He had seven children with his wife, Khin May Hnin (aka) Khin Myint. One of his sons, former Brig-Gen of LID 22, Kyaw Thu (Retd.) held the post of Deputy Foreign Minister on the SPDC, from late 2004 to February 2009 and served as chairman of the Union Civil Service Board from February 2009 to March 2016. Prior to those positions, he served as Myanmar Ambassador to South Africa from 1999 to 2002 and Myanmar Ambassador to India from 2002 to 2004. 
The 2021 Tennessee State Tigers football team represents Tennessee State University during the 2021 NCAA Division I FCS football season as a member of the Ohio Valley Conference (OVC). They are led by first-year head coach Eddie George and play their games at Nissan Stadium in Nashville, Tennessee. 
The Government of Malta has embarked on a long-term strategy to address the accessibility between Malta and Gozo, addressing the everyday problems being experienced by Gozitans to travel to Malta to their place of work. 
Transport Malta, addressing the constant yearly increase of the number of vehicles crossing between Malta and Gozo, has stated that the introduction of a fixed link would: 
Transport Malta stated that the project works are expected to be divided in the following main phases and approximate durations: 
In March 1972 the Maltese government commissioned the Overseas Technical Cooperation Agency of the Government of Japan to carry out a preliminary survey report on a possible permanent link between the two islands. Since then no notable talks about a tunnel were discussed until 2011. 
On 2 June 2018, Prime Minister Joseph Muscat had said work on the tunnel linking Malta and Gozo should start before the end of this legislature and could be finalized as soon as 2024. 
On 29 November 2020, Nationalist Party leader, Bernard Grech, suggested that a referendum should take place among Gozitans regarding the decision on the tunnel. Gozo Business Chamber reacted negatively to the proposal, saying that "The feasibility of the Gozo-Malta tunnel should be determined through technical studies and not a referendum". 
Marvin Formosa also carried out another social impact assessment report. His report stated that the main reasons the respondents stated about why they support the tunnel project is that it would create more work for Gozitans, ease the accessibility between Malta and Gozo, decrease the traveling time between Gozo and Malta and increase levels of Gozitans socializing with the Maltese people and vice versa. 
From the political parties' side, 74.7% and 48.8% of Labour Party voters and Nationalist Party voters agree with the project respectively, while 37.9% disagreed with the project. 
The most notable organisation in favour of the tunnel project is Front Favur Il-Mina (FFM), a group founded by some university students in December 2015. 
In June 2018, a study was conducted about the environmental impact of the tunnel. The study stated that about one million cubic metres of rock will be dragged out during the excavation of the tunnel, adding that it's more than the entire amount of construction waste disposed in a single year in Malta. 
On 13 December 2018, Arnold Cassola, Democratic Alternative's party candidate for the MEP elections, and the former secretary general of the European Green Party, wrote an article for Times of Malta criticizing the development of the tunnel project, ending the article saying, "History, together with present and future Maltese and Gozitan generations, will damn you all for the wanton destruction of our country." 
On 19 December 2018, Keith Buhagiar, a Maltese archaeologist, stated, "The excavation of the tunnel entrance, on the Malta-side portal, in the hamlet of L-Imbordin will destroy troglodyte dwellings dating back to the late medieval period, fertile agricultural land and other archaeological culturally-relevant remains". 
On 6 January 2019, Carmel Cacopardo, referring to the National Transport Master Plan 2025 approved for Malta in 2015, said that the plan is the solution to most of Malta's sustainable mobility issues. Cacopardo also believes the solution to the problem requires alternatives to the use of private cars and that the development of a tunnel is not one of them. 
On 13 September 2016, Simon Busuttil, the former leader of the Nationalist Party, provided an alternative to the tunnel project by proposing the setting up of a modern train system for Malta and Gozo, saying that the way traffic congestion is increasing will soon make it difficult to go around the islands. 
On 3 September 2018, Alfred Sant, the former Prime Minister of Malta between 1996 and 1998 and current MEP, provided an alternative to the tunnel project by calling for a light railway system to be built to link Malta and Gozo. Sant said, "a metro network, similar to the London Underground, Glasgow Subway or Newcastle Metro could be a better option for Malta in the long run". 
An Outstanding Natural Area is a protected area designation in the United States. The designations are managed by the Bureau of Land Management within the National Landscape Conservation System. Three ONAs have been designated by Congress, Jupiter Inlet Lighthouse, Piedras Blancas Historic Light Station, and Yaquina Head, all of which protect lighthouses and the adjacent land. The others were named by the BLM and have a variety of resources. 
Suzuki is the second studio album by Austrian duo Tosca, released by Studio !K7 and G-Stone Recordings in 2000. Unlike many of Tosca's subsequent releases, Suzuki is essentially an instrumental album, with vocal samples integrated throughout, but in such a way that they "become a part of the instrumentation." 
The album is dedicated to the Zen master Shunryu Suzuki. The dedication can be found on the inside of the front cover. 
A dub remix album, Suzuki In Dub, was released in October of the same year, and the compilation of remixes of "Honey", Different Tastes of Honey, was released in 2002. 
It was awarded a gold certification from the Independent Music Companies Association which indicated sales of at least 100,000 copies throughout Europe. 
Bowser marketed his patented kerosene pump starting in 1885. The introduction of automobiles, mainly powered by gasoline, led him to develop it into the "Self-Measuring Gasoline Storage Pump", launched in 1905. 
Bowser's invention operated with a manual suction pump, which dispensed the gasoline into the car through a flexible hose. The 50-gallon metal storage tank, housed in a wooden cabinet, could be set up at the curbside in front of a store. 
Under the banner of his company, S. F. Bowser & Company, this activity expanded to the measurement and handling of many commercial liquids. Bowser opened branches around the world, and bowser became a generic term for fuel dispensers, then fuel tankers (especially on airfields), then finally for any kind of self-propelled liquid tanker with the ability to dispense direct to consumers. 
In New Zealand and Australia it is still a generic term for consumer fuel pumps, while in the United Kingdom it refers to wheeled water tankers (either automotive or towed) used to supply fresh water to areas where normal supplies have been interrupted. 
The Bowser company was acquired in 1960 by Keene Corporation in Greenville, Tennessee. The vacuum oil purification side of the business was divested by Keene in 1978, subsequently trading under the name Enervac.  Keene filed for bankruptcy in 1993 due to a large number of asbestos-related lawsuits. 
Florence Bishop Trader was born in Xenia, Ohio, the daughter of James Franklin Trader and Elizabeth Jane Duckworth Trader. Both of her parents were born in Ohio. She attended Miss Armstrong's School for Girls in Cincinnati, Ohio. 
Florence Bishop Trader died in 1964, aged 85 years. Before she died, in 1958, Clovernook became a nonprofit organization, and continues today as a center for educational, vocational, and recreational services for the blind community of greater Cincinnati. The publishing house at Clovernook continues to be one of the larger publishers for blind readers. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball figure born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Paralympic medalist of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball figure born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Paralympic medalist of the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to association football in the Czech Republic, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This was the first boxing match to generate over 1 million PPV buys that didn't include Mayweather, Pacquiao or De La Hoya since 2002, which saw Lennox Lewis retain his heavyweight world titles against Mike Tyson. Later sources confirmed the fight did close to 1.2 million buys, which means it would have generated around $80 million. 
The Muslim-majority Northern Cameroons saw a majority of 60% in favour of joining Nigeria, whilst the Christian-majority Southern Cameroons saw 70.5% in favour of integration with Cameroon. Northern Cameroon officially became part of Nigeria on 1 June, whilst Southern Cameroons became part of Cameroon on 1 October. 
Richard K. Vedder (born November 5, 1940) is an American economist, historian, author, and columnist. He is a professor emeritus of economics at Ohio University and senior fellow at The Independent Institute. 
Vedder was born on November 5, 1940. He earned his bachelor's in economics in 1962 from Northwestern University in 1962 and his Ph.D in economics from the University of Illinois in 1965. He has since studied U.S. economic history, particularly as it relates to public policy. Some of his research has involved American immigration, economic issues in American education, and the interrelationship between labor and capital markets. 
Vedder serves as an adjunct scholar at the American Enterprise Institute (AEI), a think tank known for mostly libertarian and conservative perspectives. He has served as an economist with Congress' Joint Economic Committee. In his role with the AEI, he later testified before the Committee on October 30, 2008. He is also director of the Center for College Affordability and Productivity in Washington, D.C. 
Vedder and writer Stephen Moore wrote in the Wall Street Journal editorial page in March 2011 that every new dollar of new taxes leads to more than one dollar of new spending according to their research. Thus, they found evidence in favor of the "Feed the Beast" theory: that increasing taxes for the purported purpose of balancing the budget leads only to the government spending such inflows. 
In the aftermath of the late-2000s financial crisis, Vedder stated that he "somewhat reluctantly" supported the $700 billion bailout package included in the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008. He attributed the crisis to governmental failure and "public policy miscues," saying the financial crisis of 2007 and 2008 "never would have happened" in "the absence of these governmental mistakes." 
Vedder wrote, along with Wendell Cox, the December 2006 book The Wal-Mart Revolution in which they asserted that criticisms of wage practices at WalMart are "unfounded." He argued that Walmart workers are "paid fairly" given their skill and experience, and he stated that they also receive side benefits such as health insurance that is fairly similar to competing firms. He further argued that communities with new Walmart stores have greater total employment and higher incomes. 
Vedder's scholarly writings have appeared in journals such as Explorations in Economic History, The Journal of Economic History, and Agricultural History. He has written over two hundred such scholarly articles.[citation needed] Vedder's writings have also appeared in The Wall Street Journal, USA Today, Investor's Business Daily, and the Christian Science Monitor. 
He has published the books The American Economy in Historical Perspective, Unemployment and Government in Twentieth-Century America (with Lowell Gallaway), Can Teachers Own Their Own Schools?, Going Broke by Degree: Why College Costs Too Much, and The Wal-Mart Revolution: How Big-Box Stores Benefit Consumers, Workers, and the Economy (with Wendell Cox). 
Sven Mende (born 18 January 1994) is a German professional footballer who plays as a midfielder for Schalke 04 II. 
On 28 July 2012, he made his debut for VfB Stuttgart II in the 3. Liga against Kickers Offenbach as a substitute for Erich Berko. 
Cyrus Tiffany, sometimes recorded as Silas Tiffany, was an African-American fifer and sailor who served in the War of 1812 under Oliver Hazard Perry. In the Battle of Lake Erie on September 10, 1813, Tiffany is said to have heroically shielded Perry as they transferred command from the damaged USS Lawrence to the USS Niagara. 
It is believed that Tiffany was born in 1738 to Nathan Tiffany and Sarah Harvey and later served in the American Revolutionary War. Tiffany was accomplished at the fife and he may have performed in the tent of George Washington. 
He then lived as a free black man in Taunton, Massachusetts with his wife and son. It is in Taunton that he met Oliver Hazard Perry. 
By the time of the War of 1812, Tiffany was an elderly man known as "Old Tiffany" and served as Commodore Perry's personal servant. During the tumultuous battle on Lake Erie, Perry commanded Tiffany to stand with a musket on the berth deck and make sure no soldiers avoided fighting by staying below deck. 
After staying by Perry's side for the full battle, Tiffany continued to serve with Perry. Some accounts say he stayed with Perry until Perry's death in 1819, while other records show that Tiffany died aboard the USS Java in 1818 and was buried at sea. 
Tiffany's actions are rarely mentioned in general tellings of the Battle of Lake Erie. Around 1943, a mural including Tiffany next to Perry was painted by Martyl Langsdorf in the Recorder of Deeds building in Washington, D.C.. More recently, scholars such as Henry Louis Gates Jr. and Gene Allen Smith have included him in their research. 
This article about a property in Nicholas County, Kentucky on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Those present included celebrated actor Sos Sargsyan, writer Zori Balayan, the Artsakh liberation war veteran officers (including two generals), MPs and other political figures. 
The center specializes in research on Armenia's geopolitics and military history and identity as well as other topics. Its website offers a variety of information, in-depth research and analysis on data from the Armenian-Turkish conflict, Artsakh (Nagorno-Karabakh), Javakhk, information warfare, national identity and other related fields.[citation needed] 
Pro-Patria is one of the most well known works published by the center. Released in 2006 and 2007, Pro-Patria is a two-volume publication containing a series of selected studies including facts and analysis on strategy and security. It was compiled and edited by the head of the center, Dr. Armen Ayvazyan.  
Most of the center's publications are available via its online library. Additionally, the center launched  several independent projects which were later discontinued., such as the Foreign Press Review and the Summer and Evening Schools 
This biographical article relating to a United Kingdom sportsperson is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
WMBL (740 AM) was a radio station in Morehead City, North Carolina. Its call letters stood for Where Morehead Beaufort Link. 
The station went on the air in 1947. The entry for WMBL in a booklet from August 1957 to commemorate Morehead City's centennial states: the "radio station is heard from Maine to Florida, and has been heard all the way to Nebraska. Particularly, this is true during hurricane season, when friends and relatives at distant points want information on conditions in this locale." 
WMBL was one of the few stations to play beach music in the 1950s and 1960s. A listener of the station noted that an afternoon deejay of that time, Bobbie Dennis, "was bold enough to play records by The Drifters, Clyde McPhatter and Big Joe Turner, to name a few." 
A sister FM station using the WMBL-FM callsign went on the air in October 1972 at 95.9MHz, later moving to 96.3). In 1986, the stations were acquired by Great American Media (now Curtis Media Group); they were part of the Great American Media group until the early 1990s. 
WMBL-FM changed its call letters to WMBJ on October 13, 1981, according to Federal Communications Commission (FCC) records. On June 4, 1986, the station adopted its current call sign, WRHT-FM. 
WMBL broadcast a popular standards format at "Unforgettable 740" in its last few years. The station was bought by a subsidiary of Clear Channel Worldwide and permanently taken silent in February 2000 to allow for WSCC, 730 in Charleston, South Carolina, to make an upgrade. 
Pseudo Interactive was a video game developer based in Toronto, Ontario, Canada and started in 1995 by David Wu, Rich Hilmer, and Daniel Posner. In 2006, the company had over fifty employees. After closing, several employees formed DrinkBox Studios. 
They released a launch title for the Xbox called Cel Damage, which also released on the GameCube and PlayStation 2. They made Full Auto for Xbox 360. Their final game was Full Auto 2: Battlelines, released for the PlayStation 3. 
As of April 6, 2008, it was announced that the company was shutting down. They were working on Crude Awakening for Eidos Interactive which was cancelled, leaving the company without the means to survive until securing another deal. It was widely believed to be an updated version of Carmageddon. 
This Canadian video game corporation or company article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Pontifical Catholic University of Puerto Rico School of Architecture is the third architecture school established in Puerto Rico. It is located in downtown Ponce, about half a mile from the main campus of the university at Las Americas Avenue. It was founded in August 2009. 
Students at the School of Architecture enjoy all of the resources of the Pontifical Catholic University of Puerto Rico. The University offers an array of physical activities including fitness classes; weight training; jogging track; basketball and outdoor pool. It also benefits from its location in the city of Ponce, home to various architectural styles dating back several centuries and including the likes of museums, churches, theaters, pompous homes - even a castle. 
The stated mission of the school is "to educate and forge a new architect, planner, thinker and entrepreneur in an interdisciplinary environment; one within which the understanding of the territorial and urban complexity , as well as the regional,  and global economic dynamics operate with advanced technologies and knowledge to guide sustainable investments and interventions." 
The 5-year architecture program at the school leads to a Bachelor of Architecture.  It is currently the only program the school offers. 
Oriel Square, formerly known as Canterbury Square, is a square in central Oxford, England, located south of the High Street. The name was changed after the Second World War at the request of Oriel College which maintained that the square had originally been known as Oriel Square. 
To the east at the southern end is the cobbled Merton Street and to the north are King Edward Street and Oriel Street. To the west at the northern end is Bear Lane. 
Oriel College, one of the older colleges of the University of Oxford, fronts onto the square to the east. Canterbury Gate of Christ Church also backs onto the square. 
The street is officially designated as part of the A420 due to the blockage of the High Street to normal traffic. To the north it continues as King Edward Street and to the east it continues as Merton Street. 
Oriel Square tennis court was a former real tennis court. The only active court left in Oxford is the Merton Street tennis court nearby. 
The television crime series Inspector Morse used the square as a location in the episodes "The Dead of Jericho", "Last Seen Wearing", "The Ghost in the Machine", "Infernal Serpent", "Absolute Conviction", "Deadly Slumber" and "The Daughters of Cain". 
Oriel Square is the setting for a poem by Sir John Betjeman titled "On an Old-Fashioned Water-Colour of Oxford". 
Katherine Samaras is the laboratory head at the Garvan Institute of Medical Research. She holds positions at St Vincent's Clinic, and University of New South Wales, as well as the University of Notre Dame. 
Samaras gave a TEDx talk on preventable conditions, and health, "our most valuable public resource, which we should do everything to protect" titled "Starve to Survive", with 70,000 views, on intermittent fasting. She describes obesity, diabetes, as based on the lifestyle, of reduced exercise, increased food consumption, and on genetic differences. 
Samaras described the weight and seasonal changes. Global studies show people putting on weight when seasons change, and Samaras urged people in NSW not to fall for the same trap in a NSW Health publication in 2018. Obesity is a serious public health issue with one in two adults in NSW being overweight or obese. 
The film was shot at the Emelka Studios in Munich. The film's sets were designed by the art director Willy Reiber. 
The Dewoitine D.15 was a single-engine, single-seat biplane fighter aircraft built in France in the 1920s.  Intended to offer structural simplifications when compared with monoplanes, it had a disappointing performance and was soon abandoned. 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in Cuba is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Starting in the 18th Century the village had a certain prosperity through viticulture and home production of linen and cotton.  However, starting in 1850, the population and economy decreased.  It wasn't until 1970 that the population started to grow, though this was mostly commuters into the region of Baden-Brugg. 
Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 4.6% and transportation infrastructure made up 3.1%.  44.0% of the total land area is heavily forested and 2.0% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 20.6% is used for growing crops and 22.9% is pastures, while 1.8% is used for orchards or vine crops. 
The blazon of the municipal coat of arms is Azure three piles inverted Or topped with as many Mullets of the same in chief. 
In the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SVP which received 45.1% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (13.8%), the CVP (11.1%) and the Green Party (10.3%). 
From the 2000 census[update], 107 or 26.9% were Roman Catholic, while 204 or 51.3% belonged to the Swiss Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 6 individuals (or about 1.51% of the population) who belonged to the Christian Catholic faith. 
Elinor Wonders Why is a flash-animated television series created by Jorge Cham and Daniel Whiteson. The show premiered on September 7, 2020 on PBS Kids. 
Hiding In Plain Sight: Elinor and her pals are playing Hide and Go-Seek, but they are always spotted by the Goat twins! They observe camouflaged animals, and figure out to stay hidden, they need to camouflage themselves. 
Backyard Soup: Elinor is visiting her Baba and Bibi in Desert Town, and wants to make Backyard Soup! But, she can't find the ingredients! She figures out that certain plants grow in certain places. 
The Amazing Expandable Clubhouse: Elinor, Ari, and Olive have new members for their club, but there's not enough room for everyone in the clubhouse! They look for help from their snail friends, Norma and Lulu. They figure out that they can expand the clubhouse. 
The House That Ants Built: Elinor, Ari, and Olive want to make a cushion castle, but they all try to make different things and take from each other! They look at an anthill, and discover that the ants are working together. They figure out that they should work together. 
The Tomato Drop: Animal Town is having its Tomato Festival, and Elinor, Ari, and Olive are participating in the Tomato Drop! But, they can't keep the tomato from smushing! They figure out that they can use something as a chute to keep the tomato from smushing. 
These Sneezes: When trying to carry flowers in the park, Olive suddenly sneezes. They wonder why they sneeze. The figure out that they sneeze to keep irritating things out of your nose. 
Burrowing Owl Girl: Elinor is spending the day with her Bibi, and she fins an owl that doesn't act like a normal owl. She and Bibi notices that things look different, but they're still the same thing. She figures out that it was a burrowing owl she saw, and that she doesn't know everything about owls. 
A Change of Art: Elinor, Olive, and Ari are at art class with Mr. Lion, but they're out of paint! They find that grass and berries can make paint-like items. They figure out that you can use things from nature to make art. 
The series premiered on PBS Kids in the United States on September 7, 2020, as a sneak peek by showing the first 2 episodes, before regularly airing new episodes on September 8. 
On April 2021, PBS International has licensed the series to Canada, Latin America, Finland, Israel, Sweden and the UAE via Knowledge Network, Discovery, YLE, Hop!, SVT and E-junior respectively. 
Lambs Lake National Wildlife Refuge is a National Wildlife Refuge in Nelson County, North Dakota.  It is managed under Devils Lake Wetland Management District. 
This article related to a protected area in North Dakota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The watershed between the lakes of Schliersee and Tegernsee crosses the mountains and forms the municipal boundary between the parishes of Rottach-Egern in the west and Schliersee in the east. The boundary summits from north to south as far as Valepp are: 
Babuvirus is a genus of viruses, in the family Nanoviridae. Musa species serve as natural hosts. There are three species in this genus. Diseases associated with this genus include: stunting, severe necrosis and early plant death. BBTV induces banana bunchy top disease (BBTD). 
Viral replication is nuclear. Entry into the host cell is achieved by penetration into the host cell. Replication follows the ssDNA rolling circle model.  DNA templated transcription is the method of transcription. The virus exits the host cell by nuclear pore export, and  tubule-guided viral movement. Musa species serve as the natural host. The virus is transmitted via a vector (aphids). Transmission routes are vector. 
Semkow was born in Radomsko, Poland, later took French citizenship and resided in Paris.  He studied in Cracow and Leningrad. His conducting mentors included Erich Kleiber, Bruno Walter, and Tullio Serafin.  He was an assistant conductor with Yevgeny Mravinsky with the Leningrad Philharmonic Orchestra. 
Semkow lectured on music at the University of Colorado and conducted master classes at Yale University and New York's Manhattan School of Music.  He recorded commercially with the St. Louis Symphony Orchestra for the Vox/Turnabout label. 
This article about a Polish conductor or bandleader is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
"Jealous Mind" is a song recorded by Alvin Stardust from 1974, written and produced by Peter Shelley. "Jealous Mind" was Stardust's only number-one single in the UK Singles Chart, spending a single week at the top of the chart in March 1974.  The single was released on Magnet Records. 
"Chimes at Midnight" is a 1970 Australian TV play by John Croyston which aired on the ABC. It was directed by Eric Tayler. It was the last in a series of TV plays on the ABC called Australian Plays and aired 26 July 1970. 
The Canberra Times said it "was not a bad play, but it could be analysed out of existence. It did have some excellent moments, however." 
The tower of the church remains from a 15th century building, however most of the rest of the church was rebuilt in 1868. The building work was for the Portman family of Orchard Portman. 
The stone building has a tiled roof. It consists of a four-bay nave and two-bay chancel with a porch to the south and vestry on the north side. The three-stage tower is supported by diagonal buttresses and has an embattled parapet. 
The font inside the church dates from the 11th century. Inside the church is a brass plaque commemorating the men of the village who died in the First and Second World Wars. 
The Harvard University graduate, in addition to directing thirty-two films, was also the mentor to future film director David Lean, some of whose work as a film editor early in his career was on Vorhaus pictures. 
He worked steadily as a screenwriter in Hollywood while in his 20s for such studios as Columbia Pictures and Fox Studios but wanted to direct movies. He eventually decided to move to England and began directing quota quickies, such as The Last Journey (1935). 
After attaining success in England, Vorhaus moved back to the U.S. and began working at Republic Pictures directing B-movies. He was blacklisted in 1951 at HUAC hearings. 
Vorhaus had already moved to Europe at that time and directed a few minor films while there. He finally returned to England and retired from the film business, unlike contemporaries Joseph Losey and Cy Endfield, who were also communist blacklisters, he founded a company Domar Industries a business specialising in house renovations. His films gained a resurgence in the 1980s. 
Vorhaus had two children, Gwyn and David, an bass player and electronic music pioneer who worked under the name White Noise.[citation needed] 
This article about a location in Troms og Finnmark is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Banya is situated in the Gubbi Gubbi (Kabi) traditional Aboriginal country.  The name Banya means bunya nut in the Gubbi Gubbi and Butchulla (Badtjala) languages. 
On 14 June 2019 parts of the localities of Bells Creek and Meridan Plains were excised to create the localities of Banya, Corbould Park, Gagalba and Nirimba to accommodate future suburban growth in the Caloundra South Priority Development Area. 
Night of the Living Shred is the second studio album by guitarist Joe Stump, released in 1994 through Leviathan Records. 
Robert Taylor at AllMusic gave Night of the Living Shred two stars out of five, calling it a "callow recording" and saying Stump's "self-indulgent playing lacks any sort of dynamics." Further criticism was directed at Stump for sounding "like a Malmsteen/Blackmore clone". 
In a post-industrial economy, service firms provide most of the GDP and employment.  As a result, management of service operations within these service firms is essential for the economy. 
The services sector treats services as intangible products, service as a customer experience and service as a package of facilitating goods and services.  Significant aspects of service as a product are a basis for guiding decisions made by service operations managers. The extent and variety of services industries in which operations managers make decisions provides the context for decision making. 
The six types of decisions made by operations managers in service organizations are: process, quality management, capacity & scheduling, inventory, service supply chain and information technology. 
These four comparisons indicate how management of service operations are quite different from manufacturing regarding such issues as capacity requirements (highly variable), quality assurance (hard to quantify), location of facilities (dispersed), and interaction with the customer during delivery of the service (product and process design). 
Industries have been defined by economists as consisting of four parts: Agriculture, Mining and Construction, Manufacturing, and Service.  Services have existed for centuries.  Early service was associated with servants.  Servants were hired to do tasks that the wealthy did not want to do for themselves (e.g. cleaning the house, cooking, and washing clothes).  Later, services became more organized and were provided to the general public. 
In 1900 the U.S. service industry (e.g., consisting of banks, professional services, schools and general stores) was fragmented, except for the railroads and communications.  Services were largely local in nature and owned by entrepreneurs and families. The U.S. in 1900 had 31% employment in services, 31% in manufacturing and 38% in agriculture. 
Services have now evolved to become the dominant form of employment in industrialized economies.  Much of the world has progressed, or is progressing, from agricultural to industrial and now post-industrial economies. The U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics provides a table of the employment of the 151 million people by industry in the U.S. for 2014. 
Service design begins with a business strategy and service strategy.  The business strategy defines what business the firm is in, for example, the Walt Disney Company defines its business strategy "as making people happy." A business strategy also defines the target market, competitors, financial goals, new products, how the company competes, and perhaps some aspects of operations. 
Managers can use the service concept to create organizational alignment and develop new services. It provides a means for describing the service business from an operations point of view. 
After defining the service concept, operations can proceed to define the service-product bundle (or service package) for the organization.  It consists of five parts: service facility, facilitating goods, information, explicit service and implicit services.  It is important to carefully define each of these elements so that operations can subsequently design and manage a service operation.  The service-product bundle must come first before operations decisions. 
Once the service package is specified, operations is ready to make decisions concerning the process, quality, capacity, inventory, supply chain and information systems.  These are the six decision responsibilities of service operations. Other decision responsibilities such as market choice, product positioning, pricing, advertising and channels belong to the  marketing function.  Finance takes care of financial reporting, investments, capitalization, and profitability. 
Self-service is in wide use.  For example, in the 1960s gas station attendants came out and pumped your gas, cleaned your windshield and even checked your oil.  Fast food is famous for self-service, since customers have been trained to order their own food, pay immediately, find a table, and clean up the trash. ATM's have replaced many traditional tellers and online banking provides even more self-service. 
Leite and Vieira (2015) state that service managers must realize that the customer will be happy if the service provided meets or exceeds expectations. Also the interaction between the customer and the people providing the service is essential to achieve satisfied customers.  Employee involvement is often emphasized as part of lean thinking to achieve high levels of commitment by service employees. 
Heskett,  Sasser and Schlensinger (1997) proposed the service-profit chain as a way to design service processes.  The service-profit chain links various aspects and tasks required to deliver superior service and profits.  It starts with a high level of internal quality leading to employee satisfaction and productivity to deliver superior external customer service leading to customer satisfaction, customer loyalty and finally high revenues and profits. 
Every link in this chain is important and the linkage between the service providers and the customer is essential in service operations. The service manager should not break any of the links in order to receive the results of high probability and growth. 
Using the customer experience approach, a questionnaire called SERVQUAL has been developed to measure the customer's perception of the service. The dimensions of SERVQUAL are designed to measure the customer experience in both explicit and implicit measures.  The dimensions are: 
A debate about SERVQUAL has ensued about whether customer service should be measured in absolute terms or relative to expectations. Some argue that if high levels on all SERVQUAL dimensions are provided then the service is high quality.  Others argue that ultimately the service result is judged by the customer relative to the customer's expectations and not by the service provider.  If customer expectations are low, even low levels on SERVQUAL dimensions provides high quality. 
Quality management practices for services have much in common with manufacturing, despite the fact that the product is intangible.  The following approaches are widely used for quality improvement in both manufacturing and services: 
These approaches have several things in common. They begin with defining and measuring the customer's needs (e.g. using SERVQUAL).  Any service that does not meet a customer's need is considered a defect.  Then these approaches seek to reduce defects through statistical methods, cause-and-effect analysis, problem solving teams, and involvement of employees.  They focus on improving the processes that underlie production of the service. 
In addition to intangibility, there are two approaches about quality that are unique to service operations management. 
A service guarantee is similar to a manufacturing guarantee, except the service product cannot be returned.  A service guarantee provides a specific monetary reward for failure of service delivery. Some examples are: 
Service guarantees serve to assure the customer of quality and they provide a way for the employees to know the cost of service failure. 
Forecasting demand is a prerequisite for managing capacity and scheduling.  Forecasting demand often uses big data to predict customer behavior. The data comes from scanners at retail locations or other service locations. In some cases traditional time series methods are also used to predict trends and seasonality. Future demand is forecasted based on past demand patterns. Many of the same time-series and statistical methods for forecasting are used for manufacturing or service operations. 
While some of these same mechanisms are used in manufacturing, they are much more crucial in service operations. 
Supply chains for service operations are critical to supply facilitating goods.  A typical hospital supply chain is an example. A hospital will use many goods from suppliers to construct and furnish the building. During day-to-day operation of the hospital, inventories of supplies will be held for the operating rooms and throughout the building. The pharmacy will hold drugs and the kitchen will need supplies of food. The supply chain of facilitating goods in hospitals is extensive. 
Service inputs are critical for manufacturing including capital from banks, energy, information systems and human resources.  Services are part of the manufacturing supply chain, just like the physical inputs of products from other manufacturing companies. 
The Internet and information technology has dramatically changed the delivery of services.  Some of the major changes are as follows: 
Analysis using MSOR methods has been extensive in services.  Areas where they have been heavily applied are in inventory, capacity, scheduling, queuing and forecasting. With the advent of the Internet, information systems, big data and analytics, there are many opportunities to make improvements in decision making for services. The analytic techniques include statistics, management science and operations research. 
Henslow's sparrow (Centronyx henslowii) is a passerine bird in the family Passerellidae. It was named by John James Audubon in honor of John Stevens Henslow. It was originally classified in the genus Emberiza and called Henslow's bunting. 
Adults have streaked brown upperparts with a light brown breast with streaks, a white belly and a white throat. They have a pale stripe on the crown with a dark stripe on each side, an olive face and neck, rust-coloured wings and a short dark forked tail. 
Their breeding habitat is shrubby fields, often wet, in southern Canada, the northeastern United States, and the midwestern United States. The nest is a well-concealed open cup on or close to the ground in a grassy location; these birds often nest in small colonies. They migrate to marshes and open pine woods in the southeastern United States. 
The range and numbers of this bird are decreasing, probably due to habitat loss of the grasslands that it depends on. However, it has heavily benefited from the Conservation Reserve Program formed by the United States Department of Agriculture, which has helped to stabilize its population. Following this, it was downlisted to Least Concern from Near Threatened in 2018. 
As a member of the Slovenian national basketball team he played at the 2010 FIBA World Championship. 
It is now possible to rent Haugjegla Lighthouse (Fyr) for a holiday in the spring and summer season, from May to September, for up to 10 persons. This is today a very popular place and regarded[by whom?] as one of the most spectacular holidays in Scandinavia, often in combination with eagle watching, fishing and a visit to the old fisher village Veiholmen.[citation needed] 
Hsieh Cheng-peng and Yang Tsung-hua were the defending champions but lost in the semifinals to Sanchai and Sonchat Ratiwatana. 
Architectural Histories is a peer-reviewed open access scholarly journal publishing historically grounded research into all aspects of architecture and the built environment, since 2013. It is published on behalf of the European Architectural History Network (EAHN), with Ubiquity Press. The current editor-in-chief is Petra Brouwer. 
US 12 then continues east along the south bank of the Clearwater past historical markers commemorating Indian houses and the ghost town of Slaterville, and, in a rest area at Lenore, a historical marker for the Lenore Tram. 
Entering Clearwater County, US 12 continues east along the south bank of the Clearwater through Orofino. Just after leaving Orofino, it briefly overlaps SH-7, then continues southeast along the south bank of the Clearwater, past a historical marker for the point where Lewis and Clark first found a western-flowing river. 
In Lewis County, US 12 continues southeast along the south bank of the Clearwater, intersecting SH-11 at Greer and passing a historical marker for a ferry operated in the original 1860 gold rush.  It then continues southeast into Kamiah, where it intersects SH-162.  It then crosses the Clearwater again and leaves Kamiah. 
US 12 was created in 1925 as part of the original system of United States highways, and its original western terminus was in Miles City, Montana.  In 1962, the highway was extended west to Lewiston, ending at the former US 410.  In 1967, it was extended to its current western terminus in Aberdeen, Washington, with the Idaho section taking its current route. 
The Port of Lewiston is the furthest inland seaport in the western United States. It ships wheat, barley, and legumes to Asia and the South Pacific as well as the Middle East and Africa. There are also inland seaports in Washington at the port of Clarkston and Port of Wilma in Whitman County. 
Melpers is a village and a former municipality in the Schmalkalden-Meiningen district of Thuringia, Germany. Since 1 January 2019, it is part of the town Kaltennordheim. 
The Orange Girl (Norwegian: Appelsinpiken) is a 2003 novel by Jostein Gaarder, the Norwegian author of the best-selling Sophie's World.   The novel was adapted into a film in 2009.  The original Norwegian title, appelsin, refers specifically to the fruit and not the colour. 
Georg realizes that the "orange girl" was his mother, whom he is still living with. The story turns out to be his father telling him how he and his mother met, and then explains how horrible it was to find out he was dying.  He ends the letter by asking Georg the question: if before you were born, you were given the choice to live and be very happy, but die young and have all of the happiness taken away, or to not live at all, what would you choose? 
See guidelines for writing about novels. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Herbert S. Jones and William L. Althouse, who went on to form Althouse & Jones, began their careers working for Redding. 
This article about a United States architect or architectural firm is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dagmar Renate Kirchner Henney (born May 6, 1931) is a German-born American mathematician and former professor of calculus, finite mathematics, and measure and integration at George Washington University in Washington, DC. She is also known for her contributions to the study of additive set-values and Banach spaces.[citation needed] 
As a Jewish child, Henney was not allowed to enroll in a formal school during the war years. Her father taught her chess and mathematics at home, rewarding her with a mathematical problem set if she won a game.[unreliable source?] 
At age 10, Henney took the admittance exam for admission to the Abitur High School in Hamburg, Germany, from which she would graduate. When recalling one of the questions given to her in the exam, Henney remembered that "there were questions about a frog climbing a flag pole...he'd climb up a few centimeters and then slip back", and that it was her job to "figure how long it would take him to climb the pole." 
Henney, according to her family tree, has two distant and prominent cousins, German composer Kurt Weill and German expressionist painter and printmaker Ernst Ludwig Kirchner.  A second Kurt Weill in her tree is also related but not the famous composer.  In addition, Henney's husband's (Alan Henney, Sr.) grandfather was General Amos Fries, an important commander in World War I. 
After completing her degree at the University of Maryland, Henney became a professor in the Department of Mathematics at George Washington University, where she taught classes in calculus, finite mathematics, and measure and integration. In addition to the work she performed as a professor, she also served as an adviser to the University's chapters of Pi Mu Epsilon (the National Mathematics Honorary Society), Sigma Xi (The Scientific Research Society), and Phi Beta Kappa.[citation needed] 
Henney is retired and widowed, and she remains a resident of the Washington, DC, metropolitan area.[unreliable source?] 
This biographical article relating to Canadian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Peter the Great chose the location  in 1715 for a naval base, and construction started in 1716. It was meant to be a sea fortress and in 1790, during the Russo-Swedish War, it was conquered by the Swedes through trickery, when a Swedish warship sailing under a Dutch flag was allowed to dock. On 23 June 1912 the Russian emperor Nikolai II and German kaiser Wilhelm II met for the last time before World War I in Paldiski. 
Since the 18th century, Leetse manor existed there. In the 1910s the manor ceased to exist and was formed the populated place called Leetse (Estonian: Leetse asundus). 
This followed the events of 1991, when the Soviet Union collapsed and Estonia regained independence. To house the stationing troops and those in training, many barracks buildings were built, which have since been left in disrepair. Russia relinquished control of reactor facilities in September 1995; the nuclear reactors were shut down, and nuclear material was transported back to Russia. The reactors were thereafter decommissioned. 
Until recently, the amenities were limited to a single, small hotel (Valge Laev, with six guest bedrooms and a restaurant/bar). Now there are also two grocery stores, an alcohol store, a bank, a tavern, and a bed & breakfast. The renovated train station also has a small cafe with hot food. 
The housing blocks in the town no longer appear dilapidated and abandoned, and have been refitted and re-painted in recent years.[when?] There are also several new apartment buildings, and the green areas along with children's parks have been restored. 
The Pakri Science and Industrial Park with its  60 hectare Pakri Smart Industrial City lies within the limits of the city. 
There are several churches in town. The Estonian Evangelical Lutheran Church is dedicated to St Nicholas. Although closed for some years, this church has now reopened, with services held every Sunday at lunchtime. There are also a Pentecostal church, a Methodist church, and an Orthodox church. 
Paldiski has a terminus station on the Elron rail line, providing a convenient link to the capital city. As part of the town's redevelopment, this once near-derelict station has been renovated and painted in bright yellow and white colours. 
The old Soviet 'Pentagon' building has been demolished at some point between 2006 and 2009 to make way for a large and modern logistics park. 
Since 2007 Pakri Smart Industrial City is developing a 75MW renewable power network, which combined with its own Pakri Smart Grid enables total control of energy prices. 
Estonia's long-term plans for nuclear power envisage the adjacent Pakri Islands as a potential site for the country's first power plant. 
The 2002 film Lilya 4-ever, set in an unnamed "former republic of the Soviet Union", was largely filmed in Paldiski. 
The 2015 music video for Alan Walker's popular song "Faded" was in part filmed in or around Paldiski. 
YouTuber Bald and Bankrupt visited Paldiski in 2021 as part of his series on his adventures in Estonia. 
The town and port feature prominently in Arthur Ransome's yacht cruising memoir Racundra's First Cruise 
The 1926 United States House of Representatives elections in South Carolina were held on November 2, 1926 to select seven Representatives for two-year terms from the state of South Carolina.  All seven incumbents were re-elected and the composition of the state delegation remained solely Democratic. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman Thomas S. McMillan of the 1st congressional district, in office since 1925, defeated I. Shep Hutto in the Democratic primary and was unopposed in the general election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman Butler B. Hare of the 2nd congressional district, in office since 1925, was unopposed in his bid for re-election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman Frederick H. Dominick of the 3rd congressional district, in office since 1917, was unopposed in his bid for re-election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman John J. McSwain of the 4th congressional district, in office since 1921, was unopposed in his bid for re-election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman William F. Stevenson of the 5th congressional district, in office since 1917, defeated Zeb V. Davidson in the Democratic primary and was unopposed in the general election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman Allard H. Gasque of the 6th congressional district, in office since 1923, was unopposed in his bid for re-election. 
Incumbent Democratic Congressman Hampton P. Fulmer of the 7th congressional district, in office since 1921, won the Democratic primary and was unopposed in the general election. 
When Jules Depaquit died in 1924, he succeeded him as mayor of the "free commune of Montmartre". He later became the boss of another cabaret, Le Caveau des oubliettes rouges, still in Montmartre. 
Burnsville is a town in Braxton County, West Virginia, United States, at the confluence of the Little Kanawha River and Saltlick Creek. The population was 510 at the 2010 census. Burnsville was incorporated in 1902 by the Circuit Court and named for Captain John Burns who operated the first sawmill in that section of the state and who established the town shortly after the close of the American Civil War. It was named "All West Virginia City" in 1976. 
As of the census of 2010, there were 510 people, 205 households, and 133 families living in the town. The population density was 481.1 inhabitants per square mile (185.8/km2). There were 253 housing units at an average density of 238.7 per square mile (92.2/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 97.3% White, 1.2% Native American, 0.2% Pacific Islander, and 1.4% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.2% of the population. 
There were 205 households, of which 32.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 42.9% were married couples living together, 16.1% had a female householder with no husband present, 5.9% had a male householder with no wife present, and 35.1% were non-families. 28.3% of all households were made up of individuals, and 14.6% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.49 and the average family size was 2.98. 
The median age in the town was 41.4 years. 22.5% of residents were under the age of 18; 12.5% were between the ages of 18 and 24; 20.3% were from 25 to 44; 26.6% were from 45 to 64; and 18% were 65 years of age or older. The gender makeup of the town was 48.2% male and 51.8% female. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 481 people, 208 households, and 133 families living in the town. The population density was 444.5 inhabitants per square mile (172.0/km2). There were 252 housing units at an average density of 232.9 per square mile (90.1/km2). The racial makeup of the town was 98.96% White, 0.42% African American and 0.62% Native American. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 0.21% of the population. 
There were 208 households, out of which 26.4% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.9% were married couples living together, 9.6% had a female householder with no husband present, and 35.6% were non-families. 30.8% of all households were made up of individuals, and 19.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.31 and the average family size was 2.92. 
Ellahy Amen Records is an American-French independent avant-garde record label, launched in 2002 by former Pigface member and experimental/avant-garde musician Leila Bela. The record label is based both in Paris, France and Austin, Texas, United States. Currently, the label has three artists signed to the roster. 
This article about a United States independent record label is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The squadron re-equipped with B.E.2s in 1916, which it used for both bombing and reconnaissance during the Battle of the Somme that year. The B.E.2s were replaced by R.E.8s in July 1917, continuing in the reconnaissance role for the rest of the war, operating in Ypres during the Battle of Passchendaele in the summer and autumn of 1917 and in support of Belgium forces in the closing months of the war. It disbanded at the end of 1919. 
In March 1938 it replaced its Heyford biplanes with monoplanes from Armstrong Whitworth Whitley . It re-equipped again in April 1939, with Handley Page Hampden bombers replacing the Whitleys. In June 1939 it became a training unit, preparing crews for the Hampden equipped 5 Group. 
The squadron reformed in the Support Helicopter role, receiving Chinooks HC.1s in September 1982. The Chinook HC.2, equivalent to the US Army CH-47D standard, began to enter RAF service in 1993. Following the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait, 7 Squadron took part in the UK's deployment to the Gulf in 1991. 
In March 2020, the squadron was awarded the right to emblazon battle honours on its squadron standard, recognising its role in the British military intervention in Sierra Leone in 2000 and the War in Afghanistan between 2001 and 2014. 
Levis was born in Madison, Wisconsin. He died on October 8, 1980, at Columbia Hospital in Milwaukee. 
A quantum heterostructure is a heterostructure in a substrate (usually a semiconductor material), where size restricts the movements of the charge carriers forcing them into a quantum confinement. This leads to the formation of a set of discrete energy levels at which the carriers can exist. Quantum heterostructures have sharper density of states than structures of more conventional sizes. 
Quantum heterostructures are important for fabrication of short-wavelength light-emitting diodes and diode lasers, and for other optoelectronic applications, e.g. high-efficiency photovoltaic cells. 
Examples of quantum heterostructures confining the carriers in quasi-two, -one and -zero dimensions are: 
The Royal Adelaide was an iron sailing ship of 1400 tons built by William Patterson at Bristol in 1865. 
She was wrecked on Chesil Beach on 25 November 1872, while on a passage from London to Sydney with 32 crew members and 35 passengers. In bad weather, the ship tried to reach the shelter of Portland Harbour, but was forced into Lyme Bay from which there was no exit in a storm. The anchors were lowered to try to prevent the ship being blown onto Chesil Beach. However, the anchors dragged and the ship began to break up on the beach. All but seven on board were saved. 
A large crowd gathered on the shore to help with the rescue and the salvage of the cargo, part of which was gin and brandy. By the end of the night four of the wreckers had died from exposure, having spent the night on the beach after becoming drunk on the cargo. 
This article about a specific civilian ship or boat is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Sean takes his bag and a large rock and submerges himself in the lake. A little later he emerges from the water and, initially ecstatic, exclaims that he has defeated the demon. His triumph is short lived, as he hears the whimper of his cat and the howl of the demon in the forest. 
The soundtrack is very diverse featuring opera music, music from Detroit based rapper Esham and punk pop band The Smoking Popes, as well as Beethoven. Potrykus uses the lyrics in the music in the opening scene to give the viewer an overview on Sean's background. 
The critical response to the film from critics was generally positive. On Rotten Tomatoes the film has an approval rating of 80% based on 20 reviews. 
Ty Hickson received widespread praise for his role in the film. Brooklyn magazine said "Hickson's largely silent performance is superb" and Variety commended Hickson for an "irresistible performance". Critics also commented on the elements of comedy in the film, especially by Amari Cheatom who was described as "hilarious". 
Not all reviews were positive, Todd Jorgenson from Cinemalogue.com commented that the films "ambiguity with regard to key details becomes frustrating" and Spanish magazine Cinelipsis described the film as a "complete waste of a horror movie" and that "nothing justifies whatever it was the director tried to do here". 
Bringing King to China is a 2011 documentary film by Kevin McKiernan. The cinematographers include three-time Oscar-winner Haskell Wexler. 
The documentary is "a father's 'love letter' to his adult daughter, a young American woman struggling to bring Martin Luther King, Jr.'s dream of nonviolence to China, and then back to the United States. Her life is thrown into turmoil when she learns, mistakenly, that her father, a journalist covering the war in Iraq, has been killed by a suicide bomber." 
The film premiered at the Santa Barbara International Film Festival and won best documentary at the Ventura International Film Festival and the Tulsa International Film Festival. In 2011, it was scheduled to screen at film festivals across the US, including DOCNYC and the St. Louis International Film Festival. Commentators called the film timely,  noting it premiered in the lead-up to the unveiling of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Memorial in Washington, D.C. 
Perdomo, is a Canary Islander noble family name originally from Normandy, France. The surname Perdomo is a Spanish version of the French surname Prudhomme, and is closely associated with the Bethencourt family of France. "Prudhomme" was a French term meaning a good or wise man used in the Middle Ages to designate local magistrates. 
Hope Air was founded in 1986 by Joan Rogers and Jinnie Bradshaw under the name Mission Air Transportation Network. In the early years, corporations signed up with Mission Air to use their planes. However, soon after launching Mission Air attracted commercial airlines, with over 90 per cent of flights taking place through airline partners currently. 
In 1995, Romeo Leblanc, then-Governor General of Canada, became Hope Air's first Viceregal patron. Every Governor General of Canada since has been the charity's patron. 
In 1996, WestJet was founded and immediately donated its first flights to Hope Air. Its donations increased and WestJet is Hope Air's largest airline partner. 
In 1999, Mission Air changed its name to Hope Air. Also in 1999, Hope Air began to partner with private pilots who began flying Hope Air clients on their aircraft, as part of the charity's Volunteer Pilot Program. 
In 2001, Marc Garneau became a National Honorary Patron of Hope Air. He served in this role until 2015, when he resigned after being appointed Minister of Transport. 
In 2010, British Columbia struck a partnership with Hope Air to provide flights to residents of the province who need to travel for healthcare. The province solidified its partnership with the charity by investing $1.5 million in 2015. 
That same year, the organization arranged over 10,000 flights, the most ever in a single calendar year. On December 3, 2015, Hope Air celebrated its 100,000th flight. 
In 2016, Hope Air celebrated its 30th anniversary. In the same year, Hope Air partnered with PEI's provincial government to provide Confederation Bridge Passes to Islanders who must travel off the Island to healthcare. This marks the first time in its history that Hope Air provided ground travel to patients. 
Hope Air provides flights under four main flight programs: Commercial Airline Donation Program, Flight Purchase Program, Volunteer Pilot Program and the Volunteer Program. The charity has a mixed donor base made up of individuals, foundations and corporations. A number of Canadian airlines provide in-kind donations of seats on scheduled flights. 
The Commercial Airline Donation Program is based on partnerships with various Canadian airlines that donate seats on flights to Hope Air clients. In these cases the charity covers the cost of taxes and regular fees associated with airline tickets, while commercial airlines provide flight tickets. 
The Flight Purchase Program entails Hope Air purchasing seats on commercial flights for Hope Air clients. 
The Volunteer Pilot Program partners with private pilots who use their aircraft to fly Hope Air clients to medical appointments. 
The Volunteer Program comprises over 160 volunteers across Canada who assist in Hope Air's office and contribute remotely. In 2018, volunteers donated over 5000 hours to sustaining Hope Air's mission in the areas of Client Care, Fund Development, Marketing & Communications, and Ambassadorship. 
A graduate of Fordham University, Liberatore made his New York City stage debut in the 1982 Circle Repertory Company production of Richard II. As a permanent member of the company he appeared in The Great Grandson of Jebediah Kohler, Black Angel, and As Is and Burn This, both of which transferred to Broadway. The latter earned him both Tony and Drama Desk Award nominations for Best Featured Actor in a Play. He also appeared off-Broadway in Sight Unseen. 
Liberatore's television credits include Tales of the City, Who's the Boss?, Sex and the City, Law & Order, and the made-for-TV movies If It's Tuesday, It Still Must Be Belgium, Original Sin, Baby Brokers, and Tom Clancy's Op Center. He also appeared in the film It's My Party. He was involved in productions that was released in 2013. 
This article relating to the law of Europe or of a European country is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1750s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Evening Standard Theatre Awards were announced on November 24, 2008. The longlist was revealed on November 4, 2008  and the shortlist on November 7, 2008. 
Shoal Lake is a locality in the southwest of Manitoba, Canada. Originally incorporated as a town, Shoal Lake amalgamated with the Rural Municipality of Shoal Lake on January 1, 2011 to form the Municipality of Shoal Lake, which became the Rural Municipality of Yellowhead on January 1, 2015. 
The community has a nine-hole golf course and hosts facilities for baseball, ice hockey, and curling. It is home to the province's official museum to the North-West Mounted Police, which was built in 1984 to replicate barracks established at the south end of the lake in 1875. 
Shoal Lake is located at the junction of highways 16, 21, and 42. It is serviced by the Shoal Lake Airport and Shoal Lake Water Aerodrome and by the Greyhound bus service (freight only). 
Retief, his son, men, and servants, about 100 people in all were taken to a nearby hillside, Kwa-Matiwane below the Hlomo Amabuto, which means, "mustering of the soldiers". The Zulus killed the entire party by clubbing them and killed Retief last so as to witness the deaths of his comrades. Their bodies were left on the Kwa-Matiwane hillside to be eaten by vultures and scavengers, as was Dingane's custom with his enemies. 
The attack is thought to have been premeditated, and it was unlikely that Dingane was going to concede the land through treaty in the first place since he believed that the land was divinely inherited, despite the agreement. As for the rationale behind his attack, there is no single reason, but a multitude of reasons. 
One of the most popular reasons given by historians is that Dingane felt threatened because he had gotten news that Voortrekkers that had recently ousted Mzilikazi from the Transvaal region through conquest. The fact that Retief had sent Dingane letters alluding to the expulsion of Mzilikazi which could easily be interpreted as a veiled threat did not help Dingane as seeing the Voortrekkers as being genuine. 
It is likely that he saw Retief and the settlers with him coming into the land as an invasion. He feared that he could possibly share the same fate if he did not take a pre-emptive strike against the Voortrekkers. There was also reports that the Voortrekkers were encircling around the settlement of Mgungundlovu, which was interpreted as being a reconnaissance. 
Another reason given is that Dingane's sending Retief and his band out to retrieve the stolen cattle was actually a strategic move to see whether or not Retief could be trusted. According to Dingane's intelligence officers, he did not give back all the cattle that he had gotten from Sekonyela. 
A reason cited by a few scholars is that is Dingane was also promised horses and guns, along with the return of his cattle. When Retief returned to give Dingane his cattle, he did not give him any guns or horses. Regardless of which event influenced Dingane to take this action, it is very clear that he grew to distrust the Voortrekkers and the other settlers. 
After the Retief massacre, Dingane directed attacks against several unsuspecting Voortrekker encampments including the one at Bloukrans. This plunged the Great Trek into temporary disarray. In total 534 men, women and children were killed in the Weenen massacre. 
Retief's death and the Weenen massacre eventually led to the decisive Voortrekker victory at Blood River, after which Andries Pretorius and his "victory commando" recovered the remains of the Retief party. They buried them on 21 December 1838. The twenty-one year old Jan Gerritze Bantjes (1817-1887), Retief's former secretary and now Pretorious' secretary, recorded the battle and the entire December campaign in the "Bantjes Journal". 
Since September 26, 1923, the first sample of the Azerbaijani emigrant press - the magazine "Yeni Kafkasya" was published in Istanbul. The main objective of this magazine, published by the founder of the Azerbaijan Democratic Republic (ADR), Mammad Amin Rasulzadeh, was to support the struggle for national independence. 
In the first twenty issues of "Yeni Kafkasya" the text was written in Arabic, in the next 10 - in Latin. The majority of works in the compilation was written in the journalistic genre. 
In 1927, the publication of the magazine was suspended. However, the compilations "Azeri Turk" (1928-1930), "Yashil Yarpag" (1928), "Odlu Yurd" (1929-1931) and the newspaper "Bildirish" (1930-1931) continued to be published in Istanbul. The publication of these collections was also supervised by Mammad Amin Rasulzadeh. 
In addition to articles, Azerbaijani emigrants published a number of works: "The national movement of Azerbaijan" (M. Mammadzade, 1938), "Renewal movement in Azerbaijan in the XIX century" (H. Baykara, 1966), "The Iranian Revolution and the liberation movement" (H. Baykara, 1975), etc. 
The Notorious Benedict Arnold: A True Story of Adventure, Heroism & Treachery is a non-fiction biographical adolescent book about Benedict Arnold. Written in 2010 by Steve Sheinkin, the book encompasses the whole life of Benedict Arnold, from his freezing cold date of birth in Connecticut to his death in England in 1801. It has won the Boston Globe-Horn Book Award for Nonfiction, the Margaret Edwards Award, and the YALSA-ALA Award for Excellence in Young Adult Nonfiction. 
Sheinkin writes in the book that he was long fascinated by Arnold. Over the years, he compiled an "absurdly large collection" of books, plays, and anything to do with Arnold. He even followed Arnold's route to Canada that he took in 1775. 
The book begins with the hanging of John Andre, before backtracking and telling the story of Arnold's life. The book also occasionally tells the reader what's happening to John Andre. Eventually, the two stories merge into one, when Andre and Arnold begin working together to hand West Point over to the British. 
Flying Boat Training Squadron RAF is a former Squadron of the Royal Air Force which was operational between 1931 and 1956 through various names. 
The squadron was formed on 2 January 1939 at RAF Calshot flying Supermarine Stranraers and Supermarine Scapas before being disbanded and merged with the Seaplane Training Squadron to make No. 4 (Coastal) Operational Training Unit on 16 March 1941. 
The squadron was formed on 1 October 1931 at Calshot by redesignating the Seaplane Training Flight operating a variety of aircraft including Fairey IIID, Southamptons and Swordfishs until it was disbanded at RAF Wig Bay. 
No. 4 (Coastal) OTU was formed on 16 March 1941 at RAF Stranraer and operating a large number of aircraft including Saro Londons, Short Singapores and Consolidated PBY Catalinas. It was disbanded on 31 July 1947 at RAF Pembroke Dock to become No. 235 Operational Conversion Unit RAF. 
The Conversion unit was formed at RAF Calshot and operated Short Sunderlands and Short Seafords until 17 October 1953 when it was disbanded at Calshot. 
The squadron was reformed at RAF Pembroke Dock on 17 October 1953 flying Sunderlands before being disbanded less than 3 years later on 5 October 1956 still at Pembroke Dock. 
Southwest High School is a 5A public high school in the Southwest Independent School District of San Antonio, Texas, USA. In 2015, the school was rated "Met Standard" by the Texas Education Agency. 
Southwest High School has been serving southwestern Bexar County for over 68 years. Established in 1951, it has grown from a small rural high school with a graduating class of 11 students to a major 6A high school with over 3000 students. 
The Dragons participate in UIL District 28 6A competitions for Academic Team, Athletics, Band, Drama, Choir, Color Guard, and Dance. Other co-curricular and extra-curricular opportunities include NJROTC, National Honor Society, Best Buddies, Student Council, FFA, TAFE, DECA, Skills USA, FCCLA, and Academic Decathlon along with a FIRST Robotics program. 
Southwest High School offers a complete academic program including 18 dual credit classes, in association with Palo Alto College, as well as Advanced Placement classes in Science and English. 
Pomaderris is a genus of 70 species of shrub to small tree in the family Rhamnaceae. Sixty-five of the species are native to Australia and the other five are from New Zealand. There is some overlap. A distinctive feature of the leaves, branches, and twigs of this genus, is that they are hairy. 
A few of species in this genus are known to horticulture; the most commonly cultivated species is P. aspera, the hazel pomaderris. 
Pomaderris species are used as food plants by the larvae of some Lepidoptera species including Aenetus ligniveren. 
Sandra Fitzpatrick and Maria R. Goodwin, The Guide to Black Washington, rev. ed. (New York: Hippocrene Books, 1999), 193-194. 
Hillclimbing is a problem faced by railway systems when a load must be carried up an incline. While railways have a great ability to haul very heavy loads, this advantage is only significant when the tracks are fairly level. As soon as the gradients increase, the tonnage that can be hauled is greatly diminished. 
Early tramways and railways were laid out with very gentle grades because locomotive and horse haulage were so low in tractive effort. The only exception would be with a line that was downhill all the way for loaded traffic. Brakes were very primitive at this early stage. 
Where a railway has to cross a range of mountains, it is important to lower the summit as much as possible, as this reduces the steepness of the gradients on either side. This can be done with a summit tunnel or a deep summit cutting. 
A summit tunnel can lower the summit even more, and steeper hills result in shorter tunnels. Also, tunnels cost the same no matter how much overburden there is, while cuttings tend to increase in cost with the square of the overburden. 
Care had to be taken with summit tunnels in the early days of steam with designs that suffered from problems with smoke and slippery rail. 
The ruling gradient of a section of railway line between two major stations is the gradient of the steepest stretch. The ruling gradient governs the tonnage of the load that the locomotive can haul reliably. 
The U.S. Post Office in Schenectady, New York, is located at Jay and Liberty streets just north of City Hall. It serves the 12305, 12307 and 12308 ZIP codes, which covers the city. It is a brick Classical Revival building erected in 1912 and added onto extensively in 1933. At that point in time its main entrance was moved to Jay Street. 
Its detailing, particularly the arched windows, inspired a similar design for the neighboring city hall in 1931. The two buildings were later listed together on the National Register of Historic Places in 1978; in 1989 the post office was listed in its own right. 
The post office occupies most of the block. The neighborhood is densely developed and commercial, with city and county government buildings as well. The terrain is flat. 
It is a rectangular building faced limestone on the south and west and yellow brick elsewhere. A central pavilion is flanked by north and south wings, the latter of which is the main entrance. Both wings have round-arched windows divided by partially engaged Ionic columns. The former main entrance, on the Liberty Street side, has free-standing Corinthian columns. At the cornice is a balustrade. 
Inside, the lobby has green marble baseboards, white marble wainscoting and a white marble stair with iron railing. The high plaster ceiling's molded cornice has dentils and modillions, with an eagle on each pilaster. Bronze mailboxes and oak woodwork round out the interior decoration. 
The first post office in Schenectady was established in 1793. It handled mail deliveries via stagecoach lines that passed through the city from Albany on their way west. Residents went to the post office to get their mail until home delivery began in 1887. 
The post office had been in several locations until the current site was chosen in 1912, for a large post office for a growing industrial city. The use of the Classical Revival architectural style by Treasury Department supervising architect James Knox Taylor, while common for new post offices in cities Schenectady's size at the time, was unusual for the city. Only the county courthouse and a few small bank buildings used it. 
In 1933 the Post Office decided to expand the structure, a move that expressed confidence in Schenectady's growth since postal receipts were declining at the time due to the Great Depression. John Ryder reconfigured the building with as little disruption to the original style as possible. The interior was renovated in the 1960s, the only significant change to the building since its construction. 
This biographical article related to a football midfielder from Mexico is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The German Handball Association (German: Deutscher Handballbund) (DHB) is the national Handball association of Germany. DHB organizes team handball within Germany and represents German handball internationally. The association has been a member of the International Handball Federation (IHF) since 1950, and also of the European Handball Federation (EHF) since 1991 just after the unification of the country. The DHB headquarters are in Dortmund. 
Martin James Smith (born October 1963) is a British political activist. He is a former National Secretary of the Socialist Workers Party (SWP), a position he held from 2004 until January 2011. He is reported to have left the SWP in 2013 following accusations of the rape of a much younger female member of the party. 
Smith is a former Director of Sherborne Publications Limited, the company that publishes the Socialist Worker, and of Love Music Hate Racism. At the National Conference in January 2011, he left the post of National Secretary of the SWP in favour of Charlie Kimber, who remains in this position. 
Smith has been named as "Comrade Delta", accused of sexual assault and rape of women who were members of the SWP. According to Alex Callinicos and Dave Renton, disagreement within the party following this incident led to the resignation of 700 SWP members. 
Adelina Chilica is an Angolan politician for the MPLA and a member of the National Assembly of Angola. 
Calamity Anne's Dream is a 1913 American silent short Western film directed by Allan Dwan and starring Louise Lester as Calamity Anne. The film also stars Harry von Meter, Dorothy Eliason Jacques Jaccard, Charles Morrison, Jack Richardson and Vivian Rich. 
The ship was built at Admiralty Shipyard in Leningrad and was launched on 29 June 1952 and commissioned on 30 December 1953. 
On 26 March 1963, she was decommissioned from the navy, mothballed and put on hold in Sovetskaya Gavan. 
In the 1570s, Captain Juan de Salcedo first explored what was the province of Tayabas. The Franciscan priests Juan de Plasencia and Diego de Oropesa between 1580 and 1583 founded its town, also named Tayabas. Tayabas was organized by the Spaniards through the Franciscan missionaries and Lucena was just one of its barrios. 
Finally on November 5, 1879, the Orden Superior Civil officially adopted the name "Lucena" in honor of a Spanish friar by the name of Father Mariano Granja in Andalucia, Spain. Fr. Granja was responsible for the development of the barrio that became a Parish in 1881. Lucena became an independent municipality on June 1, 1882. 
After Aguinaldo proclaimed the nation's independence on June 12, 1898, in Kawit, Cavite, Gen. Miguel Malvar, as Commanding General for Southern Luzon, took over Tayabas Province on August 15, 1898. Don Crisanto Marquez became Lucena's first elected Municipal president during the first Philippine Republic. 
Lucena's fertile soil became soaked with the blood of many Filipinos and Americans[tone] at the outbreak of the Filipino-American War in 1899. The foreigners established a civil government in the country, and on March 12, 1901, the provincial capital was transferred from Tayabas to Lucena. 
On June 17, 1961, by virtue of Republic Act No. 3271, Lucena was made into a chartered city through the efforts of then Congressman Manuel S. Enverga. It was officially inaugurated on August 19, 1962, during the 84th anniversary of Manuel L. Quezon. On July 1, 1991, Lucena became a highly urbanized city, thereby making the city independent from the province. 
There exists a Lucena Airport (known locally as 'Landing') located 300 meters west of AMA College Lucena Campus but is no longer usable. Light aircraft can no longer make use of it as a road was built as an intersection during the presidency of Gloria Macapagal Arroyo. 
Being the provincial capital, Lucena is host to most of the branches of governmental agencies, businesses, banks and service facilities in the Southern Tagalog region. 
Economic activities in Lucena are heavily concentrated in the poblacion (bayan) and other suburban barangays where the highly dense and constricted central business district (CBD) is home to a large cluster of different business enterprises. As population grows in tandem with new and promising business prospects, business activities spill over adjoining barangays, thus forming mini satellite commercial areas. 
Other commercial strips are located in the poblacion and suburban barangays where both retail and wholesale trade, including other essential services, are being engaged in. SM City Lucena is the biggest mall in the city located in Ibabang Dupay, which is one of the first SM Malls in Luzon. Other Shopping Centers Include: SM Savemore Agora, Super Metro Lucena, Pacific Mall Lucena and many more. 
Of the total 8,316.90 hectare land area of Lucena City, 19 percent or 1,651.77 hectares cover the existing built up area. Almost 3% of this or 46.62 hectares cover the industrial section, located in different barangays of the city. These areas are home to significant industrial and manufacturing activities. 
Industry in Lucena produces a sustainable amount of agro-industrial-based products, dried and smoked fish, distilled liquors, bamboo and rattan furniture, ornamental flowers/plants, vegetable as well as meat products. 
Lucena is also known as the "Cocopalm City of the South". Nestled midst a wide expanse of coconut lands, Lucena has coconut oil mills which produce oil-based household products like cooking oil, soap, lard, margarine, and oil-based medicines. Exora Cooking Oil and Vegetable Lard, and Miyami Cooking Oil are proudly made in this city. Tantuco Industries, JnJ Oil Industries, Inc., and Monaco Oil Company are some of the well-known coconut oil companies in the city. 
Car assembly and manufacturing plants have also established in the city, while Manila-based car shops are starting to put up some branches like Isuzu-Lucena, SFM-Lucena, and Foton Motor. 
Road network provides access from all key cities and towns in the island of Luzon to this highly urbanized city. Well-paved radial and by-pass routes criss-crossing in and out of the city facilitate the transport of unlimited assortment of merchandise, supplies, and raw materials to and from the city on a round-the-clock basis. 
Pursuant to Chapter II, Title II, Book III of Republic Act No. 7160 or the Local Government Code of 1991, the city government is to be composed of a mayor (alkalde), a vice mayor (bise alkalde) and members (kagawad) of the legislative branch Sangguniang Panlungsod alongside a secretary to the said legislature, all of which are elected to a three-year term and are eligible to run for three consecutive terms. 
There is an expressway project to Bicol were planned to extend the South Luzon Expressway to Matnog, Sorsogon as SLEX Toll Road 5. 
There exists a Lucena Airport, but no commercial flights come to the city. Even light aircraft can not make use of the facilities. 
The Philippine National Railways (PNR) is on the process of rehabilitating the existing Manila-Bicol and Baguio-Bicol Railway Line, which includes stops in Quezon province, including PNR Lucena station, which traditionally then is a major loading & pick-up point for passengers and cargoes alike when the railway system was once the primary transportation mode going to Manila. Modern air-conditioned coaches will ply this route. 
The Passenger Ferry Terminal in Lucena has RORO vessels that transport passengers across Tayabas Bay to Marinduque, Romblon and Masbate. 
Lucena City is served by landline and mobile phone companies like the Philippine Long Distance Telephone Company (PLDT) and Digitel Telecommunications (PLDT-Digitel). Major mobile phone providers in the area include Globe, Smart, and Sun Cellular. 
Lucena has private and public hospitals that are capable of providing most common and advanced medical services, as well as in handling medical emergencies. Both types of institutions are considered to provide the same standard of healthcare and services, differing mainly with the medical and diagnostic facilities at hand. 
These are staffed with qualified medical practitioners that are well-versed in English. The doctors are graduates of the many top reputable medical schools in the Philippines; most have pursued further studies and training in the United States. Likewise, the nurses are the products of the many credible nursing schools in the country. These same institutions have produced the many Filipino nurses working in the United States, Europe, Middle East, and other parts of the world. 
Richard B. Wells (born 1953) is a Professor Emeritus at the University of Idaho in Moscow, Idaho.  From 2006 until his retirement in 2013, he held concurrent appointments as Professor of Electrical and Computer Engineering, Professor of Neuroscience, Adjunct Professor of Philosophy, and Adjunct Professor of Materials Science & Engineering.  He was named as Senior Member of the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers in 2001. 
Wells holds a B.S. degree in Electrical Engineering from Iowa State University in Ames, Iowa where he graduated with distinction in May 1975. He received his M.S. in Electrical Engineering in May 1979 from Stanford University and his Ph.D. in Electrical Engineering in May 1985 from the University of Idaho. 
Andreas Mihavecz is an Austrian from Bregenz who holds the record of surviving the longest without any food or liquids. His ordeal is documented in the Guinness World Records. 
On 1 April 1979, the then 18-year-old bricklayer's apprentice was mistakenly put into custody in a holding cell for being a passenger in a crashed car and completely forgotten about by the three policemen responsible for him. Each of them thought that the two others had already freed Mihavecz. They also ignored the pleas of his worried mother, who was concerned for what might have happened to her son. 
Mihavecz's case was later included in the first edition of a German book on urban legends, as the updated form of a medieval German folk tale of the forgotten peasant in the debtors' prison. 
She had a modest talent as a geisha, having an academic goal. She learned the kanji by reading many books and later became a writer. 
After this, she traveled back to the U.S. She went to London, and on her friend Sessue Hayakawa's advice, she moved to Paris where, it is said, she gave birth to a child. 
After returning home, she worked as a geisha. In 1923, under the name of Teruha Oda, she starred in the film "Ai no tobira" (The Gate of Love) directed by Shiro Nakagawa. She then remarried to a medical doctor and ran a bar in Osaka. 
This biographical article relating to a Polish sport wrestler or wrestling coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Today the museum contains Fabre's collections of fossils, minerals, 594 watercolors of mushrooms, manuscripts, a private herbarium of more than 20,000 specimens including plants harvested by Fabre during his stay in Corsica (1849-1852), and the small table on which his manuscripts were written, most notably the Souvenirs Entomologiques. The gardens contain 20 historic trees and over 500 plant species, as well as trails and a pool, and a small cold greenhouse built in 1880. 
This French biannual multidisciplinary journal brought together specialists of different generations and targeted young people. The editorial board included: Nicolas Werth, Marc Lazar, Philippe Buton, Michel Hastings, Karel Bartosek and Denis Peschanski. Published works include both the teleological (political and doctrinal side) and social (relationships with society, social settlements) dimensions of communism. 
The historian Denis Peschanski, who was among the first contributors to the journal "motivated by a desire to make communism a scientific subject" left because he did not feel in tune with the editorial line. He explained that "the collapse of the team began when a renewed police-related history appeared of the PCF which was a "scoop". 
This biographical article relating to Finnish tennis is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Greek association football goalkeeper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Thoracibidion lineatocolle is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Thomson in 1865. 
Ephedra fasciculata is a species of plant in the Ephedraceae family. Common names are Arizona ephedra, Arizona jointfir, and desert Mormon-tea. 
Merlo was founded in 1911 in Cuneo. In the beginning the company managers worked in a small workshop. In 1964 the company took new direction of production and improved the state of the company into that of big machine manufacturer. In 1966 the company built their first concrete mixers and in 1970 their first off-road fork lift truck. In 1981 Merlo produced their first telescopic handler, the SM 30. The company continues to specialize in handlers. 
Yohan Alexandre Mady Boli born 17 November 1993) is a professional footballer who plays as a forward for Qatar Stars League side Al-Rayyan. Born in France, Boli represents Ivory Coast internationally. 
Terry Ray (born April 10, 1963) is an American former professional boxer who competed from 1986 to 2001. He held the WBF cruiserweight title from 1999 to 2000 and challenged once for the WBA cruiserweight title in 1998. As an amateur, he defeated 95 of 104 opponents, winning several state and national championships, and earning himself a spot on Team USA to compete against Scandinavia 
In 2012, Ray was convicted of sexual battery involving a 14 year old girl, receiving an 18 month suspended prison sentence. 
Hunter continued playing guitar throughout high school as a member of a group called the Weejuns, which took their name from G.H. Bass & Co.'s perennially-popular penny loafers. He subsequently joined the Light Brigade, a rock and soul group that played in the Decatur area. 
In 1967, during the Vietnam War, Hunter was drafted into the U.S. Army. There he trained as an x-ray technician, ultimately serving at an air evacuation hospital in Okinawa, Japan where Vietnam combat casualties were being treated. He considered becoming a doctor but he enjoyed music so much he knew he would follow a career in music. 
Upon completion of his service in the Army, he returned to Decatur where he built a reputation as an outstanding guitar player. 
One day he got a telephone call from his Decatur friend, John "Polar Bear" Sauter, that changed his life. 
Hunter has had an illustrious 40-year career as a session musician, band member and as a solo performer. 
His first collaboration with Lou Reed was for the Berlin album. He also played with Dick Wagner in the band captured on Reed's live albums, Rock 'n' Roll Animal and Lou Reed Live, including the "Intro" to "Sweet Jane", which was composed by Hunter, who plays the solo up to Lou walking on stage. In 2006, Reed and Hunter presented a new live version of Berlin, released in 2008 as a DVD and CD Berlin: Live at St. Ann's Warehouse. 
In 1974, shortly after his work with the band on the live Reed albums, Hunter played guitar on former Cream bassist Jack Bruce's solo album Out of the Storm. 
He played on Peter Gabriel's self-titled first solo album (1977) that included the classic single "Solsbury Hill" which was likewise produced by Ezrin. He also played on tour with Gabriel for the North American leg and a few shows in the UK during March / April 1977, sharing guitar duties with Robert Fripp.  
His fifth solo album The Manhattan Blues Project was released on April 30, 2013, and features contributions from Joe Satriani, Tony Levin, Johnny Depp, Joe Perry, Marty Friedman, Michael Lee Firkins, Phil Aaberg, 2Cellos and Tommy Henriksen, with background vocals provided by Karen Ann Hunter. 
Hunter lives in Altea, Spain, with his wife, Cornish singer/songwriter, Karen Ann Hunter.  He suffers from pigmentary glaucoma, which has rendered him legally blind. 
The Skeleton mixed team competition at the IBSF World Championships 2021 was held on 13 February 2021. 
He killed his grandfather and his grandfather's companion before going to the reservation high school, where he murdered seven more people and wounded five others. He committed suicide before he could be captured by the police. Weise struggled in school due to frequent relocations, bullying, disruptions in his personal life and truancy. 
In 1992, Joanne Weise began dating a man who allegedly also abused Jeff. After having two children, the couple married on June 27, 1998. 
On July 21, 1997, when Jeff was eight, his father committed suicide by shooting himself. He had been in a standoff with the Red Lake Police Department for some days in Red Lake. His grandfather, Daryl "Dash" Lussier Sr. (September 3, 1946 - March 21, 2005), a sergeant in the tribal police force since 1965, had tried to intervene but was unable to bring about a peaceful end. 
On March 5, 1999, when Jeff was ten, his mother was in a car accident, in which a tractor-trailer crashed into the car that her cousin was driving. The women had been drinking. The cousin died in the accident and Joanne suffered severe brain damage. In 2000, she and her husband separated; they completed the divorce in May 2004. Their custody arrangements covered only the children they had together and not Jeff. 
Following his mother's accident, Jeff was placed in the custody and care of his paternal grandmother, on the Red Lake reservation. The boy had to leave Minneapolis, where he had lived for nearly eleven years. Two of his paternal aunts said they were also involved in his care; one lived with her child at their mother's during this period. 
Jeff's grandmother and her husband were separated. He shared a house with his companion and their son. According to the family, Jeff became close to both of his grandparents. By 2003, his mother had moved to an assisted-living facility; she had recovered enough from her accident to work part-time, and had regained speech. Weise chose to stay with his grandmother rather than rejoin his mother and move again. 
Weise became close to his paternal grandfather, Daryl "Dash" Lussier Sr., and his younger companion, Michele Sigana, who had given him his own room with them. The family said Weise had a good relationship with both. 
In September 2003, Weise enrolled at Red Lake Senior High School in Red Lake. Teachers and fellow students remembered him as withdrawn, and he reportedly had a history of troublesome behavior. At times he was referred to be homeschooled. His grandmother said he had not been in school for five weeks before the shooting. 
His social studies teacher Wanda Baxter recalled, "[Weise] was a good listener like any other ordinary student. He was quiet but never a troublemaker." Another teacher described Weise as "a pretty bright kid, but ... lazy when it came to school." 
A close friend of Weise described him as "the only one I talked to about my problems. He was trustworthy, and he was always capable of understanding what I was going through". Other girls also said they could talk to him. Although Weise was sometimes described as a loner, several students said he had numerous friends. He had a notebook in which he drew what a close friend described as "dark stuff". 
Later Weise was found to have posted numerous online comments expressing his frustration with living in Red Lake, and feelings that his life was beyond his control. He described the reservation "as a place where people 'choose alcohol over friendship', where women neglect 'their own flesh and blood' for relationships with men, where he could not escape 'the grave I'm continually digging for myself'". 
His depression led him to attempt suicide in May 2004, when he cut his wrist. He changed his mind, deciding "this was not the path", and posted his thoughts on the website Above Top Secret: 
After he attempted suicide again the following month in June 2004, his aunts arranged with the Red Lake Medical Center for him to be hospitalized at a facility away from the reservation. His continuing treatment included counseling and a prescription for Prozac, an anti-depressant. 
Weise's murders and suicide reopened the public debate about Prozac use among children and adolescents. In October 2004, the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) had issued a warning about its use because of its association with more thoughts and acts of suicide and violence. But, it was at the time the only antidepressant approved for use with children. 
The extended Lussier family had been involved for years in trying to help him, and arranged for Weise to have care and psychiatric treatment for depression. Dr. Leslie Lundt, a psychiatrist, has commented that a parent's suicide put individuals at high risk for psychological problems, as does alcohol abuse in the family. 
Weise also created violent Flash animations and posted them on the Internet (including the website Newgrounds). He uploaded these animations under the alias "Regret". One animation entitled Target Practice depicts an individual who shoots three people with an assault rifle, blows up a police car with a grenade, then shoots a Ku Klux Klan member. It ends when the character uses a handgun to shoot himself in the head. The animation is accompanied by the sounds of gunfire. 
Dylan John Riley (born 1971) is Professor of Sociology at the University of California, Berkeley, and is on the editorial committee of the New Left Review (NLR). He writes for the NLR and Jacobin. 
Kerala SIDCO operates Industrial Parks, Industrial Estates, and Mini Industrial Estates in all the 14 districts of Kerala. 
The bill caps the federal government's overall discretionary spending for Fiscal Year 2014 at $1.012 trillion and for Fiscal Year 2015 at $1.014. 
Two months later, the bill became the vehicle for the compromise budget proposal of Representative Paul Ryan and Senator Patty Murray, known as the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2013. The bill was amended to completely replace the existing text of H.J.Res. 59 with the text of the "Bipartisan Budget Act of 2013". 
The deal was proposed by negotiators Senator Patty Murray and Representative Paul Ryan on December 10, 2013. 
The House approved the budget act 332-94 on December 12, with 163 Democrats joining 169 Republican to vote in favor, while 62 Republicans and 32 Democrats voted against the bill. 
Some Republicans opposed the deal because they wanted the budget to focus on reducing government spending, not increasing government revenue through increased fees. Some Republicans opposed the increased airline ticket fees as a tax increase. 
Republicans who planned to vote in favor of the bill or were leaning towards doing so cited the bill as being practical for the divided Congress. Representative Steve Womack said that "it achieves most of the things we would like to see when we have divided government." 
Some people believed House Democrats would pass the deal as a way to reduce the sequester cuts. However, the ranking Democrat on the House Budget Committee Chris Van Hollen (D-MD) told a morning news show on December 12, 2013, that "members of his party are outraged that House Republicans are planning to adjourn without addressing unemployment benefits." 
President Barack Obama announced his support for the deal on December 10, 2013, calling the deal "balanced". 
Advocacy groups Heritage Action, the Club for Growth, and FreedomWorks all opposed the budget deal. Speaker Boehner criticized those groups for their opposition to the compromise. 
Senator Mark Pryor introduced the bill "To repeal section 403 of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2013 (S. 1963; 113th Congress)" on January 27, 2014. The bill would repeal the provision of the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2013 that makes changes to the cost of living allowance to military veterans. The Congressional Budget Office estimated that enacting S. 1963 would increase direct spending by $6.813 billion. 
Impletosphaeridium elegans is an extinct species of dinoflagellates in the order Gonyaulacales. It is from the Early Tertiary. 
With financing from his brothers, he went to Yale College in Connecticut in 1802. For the first time in his life, Calhoun encountered serious, advanced, well-organized intellectual dialogue that could shape his mind. Yale was dominated by President Timothy Dwight, a Federalist who became his mentor. Dwight's brilliance entranced (and sometimes repelled) Calhoun. 
Calhoun admired Dwight's extemporaneous sermons, his seemingly encyclopedic knowledge, and his awesome mastery of the classics, of the tenets of Calvinism, and of metaphysics. No one, he thought, could explicate the language of John Locke with such clarity.
Calhoun made friends easily, read widely, and was a noted member of the debating society of Brothers in Unity. He graduated as valedictorian in 1804. He studied law at the nation's first independent law school, Tapping Reeve Law School in Litchfield, Connecticut, where he worked with Tapping Reeve and James Gould. He was admitted to the South Carolina bar in 1807. 
The couple had 10 children over 18 years: Andrew Pickens Calhoun, Floride Pure, Jane, Anna Maria, Elizabeth, Patrick, John Caldwell Jr., Martha Cornelia, James Edward, and William Lowndes Calhoun. Three girls: Floride Pure, Jane, and Elizabeth, died in infancy. Calhoun's fourth child, Anna Maria, married Thomas Green Clemson, who later founded Clemson University in South Carolina. 
In his three-volume biography of Jackson, James Parton summed up Calhoun's role in the Nullification crisis: "Calhoun began it. Calhoun continued it. Calhoun stopped it." 
It is admitted that the former gentleman [Hayne] is injudiciously pitted against Clay and Webster and, nullification out of the question, Mr. Calhoun's place should be in front with these formidable politicians.
When Harrison died in 1841 after a month in office, Vice President John Tyler succeeded him. Tyler, a former Democrat, was expelled from the Whig Party after vetoing bills passed by the Whig congressional majority to reestablish a national bank and raise tariffs. He named Calhoun Secretary of State on April 10, 1844, following the death of Abel P. Upshur in the USS Princeton disaster. 
Calhoun, though as avid a proponent for Texas acquisition as Upshur, posed a political liability to Tyler's aims. As secretary of state, Calhoun's political objective was to see that the presidency was placed in the hands of a southern extremist, who would put the expansion of slavery at the center of national policy. 
By identifying Texas with slavery, Calhoun made sure that Van Buren, being a northerner, would have to oppose Texas. This, Calhoun correctly foresaw, would hurt the New Yorker's chances for the Democratic nomination. Nor did the Carolinian's ingenious strategy ultimately wreck the cause for Texas annexation. Indeed, in that respect it would turn out a brilliant success.
If you who represent the stronger portion, cannot agree to settle them on the broad principle of justice and duty, say so; and let the States we both represent agree to separate and part in peace. If you are unwilling we should part in peace, tell us so; and we shall know what to do, when you reduce the question to submission or resistance.
Calhoun died soon afterward, and although the Compromise measures did eventually pass, Calhoun's ideas about states' rights attracted increasing attention across the South. Historian William Barney argues that Calhoun's ideas proved "appealing to Southerners concerned with preserving slavery. ...Southern radicals known as 'Fire-Eaters' pushed the doctrine of states' rights to its logical extreme by upholding the constitutional right of the state to secede". 
Calhoun died at the Old Brick Capitol boarding house in Washington, D.C., on March 31, 1850, of tuberculosis, at the age of 68. The last words attributed to him were "The South, the poor South!" 
He was interred at St. Philip's Churchyard in Charleston, South Carolina. During the Civil War, a group of Calhoun's friends were concerned about the possible desecration of his grave by Federal troops and, during the night, removed his coffin to a hiding place under the stairs of the church. The next night, his coffin was buried in an unmarked grave near the church, where it remained until 1871 when it was again exhumed and returned to its original place. 
The Clemson University campus in South Carolina occupies the site of Calhoun's Fort Hill plantation, which he bequeathed to his wife and daughter. They sold it and its 50 slaves to a relative. When that owner died, Thomas Green Clemson foreclosed the mortgage. He later bequeathed the property to the state for use as an agricultural college to be named after him. 
Calhoun's widow, Floride, died on July 25, 1866, and was buried in St. Paul's Episcopal Church Cemetery in Pendleton, South Carolina, near their children, but apart from her husband. 
Calhoun led the pro-slavery faction in the Senate, opposing both total abolitionism and attempts such as the Wilmot Proviso to limit the expansion of slavery into the western territories. 
Calhoun's treatment of his own slaves includes an incident in 1831, when his slave Alick ran away when threatened with a severe whipping. Calhoun wrote to his second cousin and brother-in-law, asking him to keep a lookout for Alick, and if he was taken, to have him "severely whipped" and sent back.  When Alick was captured, Calhoun wrote to the captor: 
Calhoun rejected the belief of Southern leaders such as Henry Clay that all Americans could agree on the "opinion and feeling" that slavery was wrong, although they might disagree on the most practicable way to respond to that great wrong. Calhoun's constitutional ideas acted as a viable conservative alternative to Northern appeals to democracy, majority rule, and natural rights. 
As well as providing the intellectual justification of slavery, Calhoun played a central role in devising the South's overall political strategy. According to Phillips: 
Shortly after delivering his speech against the Compromise of 1850, Calhoun predicted the destruction of the Union over the slavery issue. Speaking to Senator Mason, he said: 
I fix its probable occurrence within twelve years or three presidential terms. You and others of your age will probably live to see it; I shall not. The mode by which it will be done is not so clear; it may be brought about in a manner that no one now foresees. But the probability is, it will explode in a presidential election.
Many Southerners believed his warnings and read every political news story from the North as further evidence of the planned destruction of the white southern way of life. The climax came a decade after Calhoun's death with the election of Republican Abraham Lincoln in 1860, which led to the secession of South Carolina, followed by six other Southern states. They formed the new Confederate States, which, in accordance with Calhoun's theory, did not have any organized political parties. 
Historian Richard Hofstadter (1948) emphasizes that Calhoun's conception of minority was very different from the minorities of a century later: 
Many different places, streets, and schools were named after Calhoun, as may be seen on the list linked above.  Some, such as Springfield, Illinois (1832) and Jackson County, Kansas (1859), were subsequently renamed.  The "Immortal Trio" (Calhoun, Daniel Webster, and Henry Clay) were memorialized with streets in Uptown New Orleans. 
In 1910, the state of South Carolina gave a statue of John C. Calhoun to the National Statuary Hall Collection. 
Calhoun was portrayed by actor Arliss Howard in the 1997 film Amistad. The film depicts the controversy and legal battle surrounding the status of slaves who in 1839 rebelled against their transporters on the La Amistad slave ship. 
Writing more than thirty years after Calhoun's death, James G. Blaine portrayed him as a mix of personal integrity and wrongheaded ideology: 
Calhoun is often remembered for his defense of minority rights, in the context of defending white Southern interests from perceived Northern threats, by use of the "concurrent majority". He is also noted and criticized for his strong defense of slavery. These positions played an enormous role in influencing Southern secessionist leaders by strengthening the trend of sectionalism, thus contributing to the Civil War. 
Calhoun has been held in regard by some Lost Cause of the Confederacy historians, who hold a romanticized view of the antebellum Southern way of life and its cause during the Civil War. Historians such as Charles M. Wiltse and Margaret Coit have, in their writings, portrayed Calhoun as a sympathetic or heroic figure. 
In 1957, a five-member "special" committee, led by Senator John F. Kennedy, selected Calhoun as one of the five senators to enter the newly created senatorial pantheon "hall of fame". This "hall of fame" was established to fill five vacant portrait spaces in the Senate Reception Room. 
In response to decades of requests, Yale President Peter Salovey announced in 2017 that the university's Calhoun College would be renamed to honor Grace Murray Hopper, a pioneering computer programmer, mathematician and Navy rear admiral who graduated from Yale. Calhoun is commemorated elsewhere on the campus, including the exterior of Harkness Tower, a prominent campus landmark, as one of Yale's "Eight Worthies". 
Howard was born in Fort Smith, Arkansas. He attended Tulsa Central High School in Tulsa, Oklahoma, where he played football, and basketball under Eddie Sutton. He attended the University of Arkansas and played offensive line and linebacker under Frank Broyles from 1960 to 1963. 
Howard began his coaching career in 1964 as the offensive line coach at Arkansas. During that season the team won a share of the National Championship. In 1965 and 1966 Howard was an assistant at Del City High School in Del City, Oklahoma. He was an assistant coach at Northeastern Oklahoma A&M College in Miami, Oklahoma. While at NEO the Norsemen won the 1967 NJCAA National Football Championship. Prior to the 1968 season, Howard accepted a position at Central State College in Edmond, Oklahoma. 
Quicksand is a colloid consisting of fine granular material (such as sand, silt or clay) and water. It forms in saturated loose sand when the sand is suddenly agitated. When water in the sand cannot escape, it creates a liquefied soil that loses strength and cannot support weight. Quicksand can form in standing water or in upward flowing water (as from an artesian spring). In the case of upward flowing water,  forces oppose the force of gravity and suspend the soil particles. 
The saturated sediment may appear quite solid until a sudden change in pressure or shock initiates liquefaction. This causes the sand to form a suspension and lose strength. The cushioning of water gives quicksand, and other liquefied sediments, a spongy, fluid-like texture. Objects in liquefied sand sink to the level at which the weight of the object is equal to the weight of the displaced soil/water mix and the submerged object floats due to its buoyancy. 
Soil liquefaction may occur in partially saturated soil when it is shaken by an earthquake or similar forces. The movement combined with an increase in pore pressure (of groundwater) leads to the loss of particle cohesion, causing buildings or other objects on that surface to sink. 
Continued or panicked movement, however, may cause a person to sink further in the quicksand. Since this increasingly impairs movement, it can lead to a situation where other factors such as weather exposure (i.e. sun stroke), dehydration, hypothermia, drowning in a rising tide or predatory animals may harm a trapped person. 
Quicksand may be escaped by slow movement of the legs in order to increase viscosity of the fluid, and rotation of the body so as to float in the supine position (lying horizontally with the face and torso facing up). 
Lowther was educated at Harrow and entered the diplomatic service in 1879. He served in Tokyo, Budapest, and Washington. De Bunsen was trained in the diplomatic service by Richard Lyons, 1st Viscount Lyons, and was a member of the Tory-sympathetic 'Lyons School' of British diplomacy. In August 1901, Lowther was appointed Envoy Extraordinary and Minister Plenipotentiary in Santiago, Chile. He arrived at Santiago to take up his position in March 1902. 
Lowther later served in Tangier and finally as ambassador in Constantinople. During his diplomatic career in Constantinople, Lowther translated and distributed anti-Semitic texts. 
He was made a Companion of the Order of the Bath in 1904, a Knight Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George and a Privy Counsellor in 1908 and a baronet in 1914 and promoted to Knight Grand Cross of the Order of St Michael and St George in 1911. 
Lowther was the second son of William Lowther and his wife Charlotte Alice, daughter of James Parke, 1st Baron Wensleydale. James Lowther, 1st Viscount Ullswater, was his elder brother and Sir Cecil Lowther his younger brother. 
During the First World War his American-born wife, Alice, Lady Lowther, was the joint hon. secretary of the American Women's War Relief Fund and chair of the Belgian Prisoners in Germany Relief Fund 
Lowther died in April 1916, aged 58, when the baronetcy became extinct. Lady Lowther died in November 1939. 
This article about a children's author from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Agness is served by one of only two rural mail boat routes still operating in the U.S. The other is along the Snake River in eastern Oregon. The mail boat runs on the Rogue River between Gold Beach and Agness. 
Rogue River Ranch, east of Agness, is on the National Register of Historic Places, and it and Lucas Lodge in Agness are in the Oregon State Historic Preservation Office historic sites database. The Agness-Illahe Museum is open from May through September. 
Much of Agness's economy is based on tourism, with several lodges, hotels, restaurants, and camping sites scattered throughout the community.  Many cater to the large jet boats from Jerry's Rogue Jets which carry up to 50 passengers from Gold Beach to various locations in the Rogue Valley.  Such stops include the historic Lucas Lodge, Singing Springs Resort, Cougar Lane Restaurant, and Agness RV Park. 
This article about a member of the Pennsylvania House of Representatives is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Hindol witnesses five festivals every year, of which three are major. The most important of these is the Rath Yatra. 
The Oldest Carnival of Hindol. Harihat Mela is converted as Harihat Mahotsav in the year of 2016. But Harihat Mela was an ancient traditional carnival of Hindol which was started many years ago before the Twentieth hYatra. 
Hindol is an Odisha Legislative Assembly (Vidhan Sabha) constituency within the Dhenkanal parliamentary (Lok Sabha) constituency. 
After the independence of India in 1947 Hindol merged into the Republic of India on 1 January 1948. Thereafter in 1948, once all the princely states including Dhenkanal, Talcher, Athmallik, Pal Lahara and Hindol formally merged with the province of Odisha, the present Dhenkanal district was created. 
This first plays develop popular characters and humorous situations, rescuing oral traditions and aesthetically re-elaborating mechanisms and themes used in the early 20th century. 
Currently, Jorge Arroyo has been appointed as Costa Rica's ambassador to UNESCO and will be heading to Paris 2015 to assume this important office. 
Yerravaripalem or Erravaripalem is a village in Chittoor district of the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh. It is the mandal headquarters of Yerravaripalem mandal. 
This article about a location in Chittoor district, Andhra Pradesh is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dartmoor represents one of the largest areas of exposed granite in the United Kingdom, covering an area of 368 square miles (954 square kilometres). It is part of a chain of granite stretching through Cornwall, as far as the Isles of Scilly. 
Some of the more durable granite survived to form the rocky crowns of Dartmoor tors. One of the best known is at Haytor, on the eastern part of the moor, whose granite is of unusually fine quality and was quarried from the hillside below the tor during the 19th and early 20th centuries. Its stone was used to construct the pillars outside the British Museum in London, and to build London Bridge. The last granite to be quarried there was used to build Exeter War Memorial in 1919. 
 In addition there are hills which incorporate 'tor' in their name but yet do not feature the geomorphological feature described in this article. Examples include Mam Tor and Shining Tor. 
Tor Bay, one of the sandy beaches near Oxwich Bay on the Gower Peninsula in south Wales, is so-called because the beach is framed by a huge outcrop of Carboniferous Limestone. 
This biographical article relating to an American archery figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Heavysege was born in Huddersfield, Yorkshire, England. Heavysege emigrated to Montreal in 1853 where he worked as a wood carver. In 1860 he became a reporter for the Montreal Transcript, and later for the Montreal Daily Witness, where he eventually became city editor. 
As a poet, Heavysege was mainly influenced by "Milton, Shakespeare, and the Bible." His first published work was The revolt of Tartarus, a poem in six parts, published in two editions: one under his own name in London in 1852, and a second, heavily edited and published anonymously in Montreal, in 1855. 
He published Sonnets in 1855, Saul: a drama in three parts in 1857, Count Filippo; or, the unequal marriage in 1860, The Owl (an imitation of Poe's "The Raven") and The Huntsman in 1864, The Advocate (a prose work) and Jephthah's daughter in 1865, and Jezebel in 1867. 
Heavysege was internationally known by the 1860s and 1870s, paving the way for later Anglo-Canadian poets, including Charles Sangster and Charles G.D. Roberts. 
W.D. Lighthall, who included Heavysege's work in his 1889 anthology Songs of the Great Dominion, wrote that Heavysege's poetry was not particularly Canadian, and that he didn't have a large readership in Canada. Nonetheless, he declared that Canadian critics "claim him as perhaps their greatest, most original writer." He believed that Heavysege's poetry was worth appreciating and would continue to be popular. 
However, his reputation declined in later decades; as national pride grew in the 1920s, he was criticized for not really being a "Canadian writer". He continued to be supported by poets W.W.E. Ross, Ralph Gustafson, and A.J.M. Smith. 
Solly Bridgetower, a character in Robertson Davies' The Salterton Trilogy, is an associate professor of English at the fictional Waverley University, and is urged by his department chair, Dr. Sengreen, to stake out a claim in the emerging field of "Amcan" (American-Canadian literature) by editing a scholarly edition of Heavysege's collected works, in order to earn tenure and make a name for himself (Leaven of Malice, 1954). 
Ulmer is an unincorporated community in Sac County, in the U.S. state of Iowa. The community is located near the junction of U.S. Route 71 and County Road D-59. 
A post office was established at Ulmer in 1901, alongside the Chicago Central and Pacific Railroad. Ulmer's population was 127 in 1925. 
This article about the geography of Sac County, Iowa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 1998 the creek was identified as containing high levels of mercury in excess of water quality standards. 
This San Benito County, California-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Nanjing CK-1 (exported under the name Chang Kong-1 or CK-1) is a radio-controlled target drone developed by the Nanjing Institute of Aeronautics in the People's Republic of China. It is based on the reverse engineering of Lavochkin La-17C drones supplied to the PRC by the Soviet Union in the early 1960s before all such Soviet technical aid to the nation was withdrawn. Its chief designer was General Zhao Xu and the first example flew on December 6, 1966. 
The CK-1 was powered by a WP-6 engine, which was a Chinese copy of the Soviet Mikulin RD-9B turbojet and featured some system changes from the original La-17s used as a pattern. WP-6 turbojet's thrust was massive comparing engine on board La-17, for this reason take-off control and procedure was optimized for CK-1. CK-1 relied on a take-off assistance vehicle before a rocket launching system was developed later. 
It also featured a parachute recovery system. Entering service with the People's Liberation Army Air Force (PLAAF) in the late 1970s, its main mission as a target drone was soon supplemented by a variant to the reconnaissance role, the CK-1A, which had underwing pods for additional equipment used in collecting air samples from Chinese nuclear tests, replacing crewed aircraft in this role. 
A CK-1B was introduced into service in 1983 that was optimized for low-level flight and had non-jettisonable underwing fuel tanks. It was followed by the CK-1C, with a much improved control system to provide much more maneuverability, as well as reinforcement to withstand maneuvering stresses, which were further improved in the CK-1E. 
XHENO-FM is a radio station in Toluca, State of Mexico. Broadcasting on 90.1 FM, XHENO is owned by Grupo ACIR and carries its Mix adult contemporary format. 
This article about a radio station in the State of Mexico is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He is sometimes referred to as "'Petit", alluding to the intricate detail Salomon works into his designs at small scale. 
"Addicted to a Dollar" is a song co-written and recorded by American country music singer Doug Stone, who wrote it along with Ray Hood, Kim Tribble and Ray Maddox.  It was released in February 1994 as the second single from his album More Love.  The song was a number four country hit in the US, and number one in Canada. 
"Addicted to a Dollar" centralizes on the male narrator, a blue collar worker struggling to maintain financial stability. 
The music video was directed by Marius Penczner, and features Doug Stone singing the song at a concert in at The Pyramid in Memphis, Tennessee. 
Dan Cooper of Allmusic cited "Addicted to a Dollar" as a standout track on More Love, saying that with the song, "Stone stakes his claim for 'hot country' status alongside all his Nashville peers." Tom Roland also described the song favorably in his review for New Country magazine, where he wrote that the song "captures the stalwart traditional voice behind the balladeer." 
Live Islington Assembly Hall is KT Tunstall's fifth live album, recorded on 20 June 2013. It features some tracks from her previous albums, but mostly, new tracks from her 2013 release Invisible Empire // Crescent Moon, and a cover of Don Henley's "The Boys of Summer". Tunstall interacts with the audience, having conversations and making jokes, making the gig feel intimate and personal. 
The album was recorded on 20 June 2013 by instant delivery company Abbey Road Studios Live Here Now. Fans were able to purchase the CD at the show and pick it up directly after the show finished. The CD was available through KT Tunstall's online store, the Abbey Road Live Here Now online store and at her live shows. 
Dorcadion bangi is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Heyden in 1894. 
Nammun is a village in Homalin Township, Hkamti District, which is in the Sagaing Region of northwestern Burma. 
Ken Banks, (born Marjoribanks) came from a sporting family from Georgetown, New South Wales.  He played one season of first grade with St. George Dragons in 1946 in the NSWRFL. His position was hooker and he played in 15 games that year including the 1946 Grand Final. He later played in the Newcastle competition for many years at the Central Newcastle Club.  
This rugby league football biography relating to an Australian born in the 1910s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The corpus is meant to be a resource for linguistic research into French phonology and a source for the development of tools for teaching French as a foreign language. The project also plays an important cultural role in the documentation of endangered regional varieties of French. 
Researchers from the following institutions have contributed to the development of the PFC database. 
The Robert Morris Colonials women represent Robert Morris University in CHA women's ice hockey during the 2020-21 NCAA Division I women's ice hockey season, the 16th overall in program history. Qualifying for the 2021 NCAA National Collegiate Women's Ice Hockey Tournament, the program ranked as the #8 seed. 
The Colonials' five-girl senior class featured Emily Curlett, named an assistant captain, and Emilie Harley as well as forwards Anjelica Diffendal, Lexi Templeman, who served in the role of team captain, and goaltender Molly Singewald. 
During the first period of a January 30, 2021 tilt versus the Rochester Institute of Technology Tigers, team captain Lexi Templeman recorded the first natural hat trick of her career, part of a four-point offensive outburst in a 7-0 shutout win. It marked the first natural hat trick scored by a Colonials skater since Michaela Boyle achieved the feat on November 24, 2019.  
On Senior Night, celebrated on February 20, 2021, goaltender Molly Singewald made her first career start. A member of the Colonials Class of 2021, she recorded a shutout victory.  
Anil Balliram (born 27 February 1974) is a Trinidadian cricketer. He played in 25 first-class and 3 List A matches for Trinidad and Tobago from 1993 to 2000. 
This biographical article relating to Trinidad and Tobago cricket is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Note: Companies I and K were composed primarily of suspected members of the so-called Arkansas Peace Society, who were arrested and sent to Little Rock by members of the 45th Arkansas Militia Regiment, where they were given the choice of Confederate service or imprisonment. Most of the men were from Searcy County. The officers were non-Peace Society men appointed by the Governor. 
In the reorganization of Confederate forces before the start of the Kentucky Campaign, the 3rd Confederate, now under the command of Lieutenant Colonel Henry Virtner Keep was assigned to Brigadier General Sterling A. M. Wood's 4th Brigade of Major General Simon Bolivar Buckner's 3rd Division of Major General William Joseph Hardee's Corps of the Army of Mississippi. The regiment participated in Battle of Perryville, Kentucky, in October 1862. 
SIR: I have the honor to make the following report of killed, wounded, missing, and prisoners belonging to the Third Confederate Regiment, together with the part taken by my command, in action at Murfreesborough December 31, 1862: 
My command took position on the left of the brigade on Tuesday, [December] 30, and remained on the field until the army fell back. 
My command being much reduced, Gen. Wood honored me with a position on his staff during the fight of Thursday, Friday, and Saturday. 
The conduct of both officers and men of my command, without exception, was worthy of all praise. I would call the attention of the general to the conduct of Lieut. Frank Foster, jr., of the Forty-fifth Mississippi Regt. Ever by my side, he displayed great gallantry and coolness. Seizing the standard, he rallied hundreds of panic-stricken men, thereby reforming our then thin ranks. 
Lieut. [H. H.] Davis, Company E, was badly wounded and left at hospital at Murfreesborough. All the remainder of my wounded are within our lines. 
By the time of the Battle of Chickamauga, the 3rd Confederate had been field consolidated with the 5th Confederate Infantry due to battle losses and placed under the command of Colonel James A. Smith. The consolidated 3rd/5th Confederate Infantry was assigned to the brigade of Brigadier General Lucius E. Polk in Cleburn's Division of the Army of Tennessee. 
SIR: I have the honor to submit the following report of the part taken by my regiment in the battle of September 19 and 20, on Chickamauga Creek: 
I was here directed by Lieut.-Gen. Hill to halt my regiment, as it had, by directing itself on Wood's brigade, become somewhat detached from the remainder of the brigade. This ended the contest for to night, most of the fighting having been done since dark.  My loss in this affair was about 25 men, most of them [receiving] slight wounds. 
We remained in line during the night of the 19th, replenished our supply of ammunition, and were ready to move again at daylight. We were not, however, engaged until about 10 o'clock on the 20th, having received our rations from the rear in the meantime. 
In this last engagement the loss of the regiment was heavier than in either of those that preceded it. It was here that Capt. George Moore, of Company H, was instantly killed by a cannon ball. Capt. James [H.] Beard, the best and bravest soldier I ever saw, was mortally wounded. Many other true and gallant men likewise fell here. 
Among the survivors conspicuous for their gallantry and good conduct I would mention Maj. R. J. Person, Capt. M. H. Dixon, Adjt. M. M. Smith, and Liuet. O. H. Smith. A list of the killed, wounded, and missing has already been furnished. 
Report of Capt. M. H. Dixon, Third Confederate Infantry, commanding Third and Fifth Confederate Infantry. 
Our loss, 2 killed and 17 wounded. Among the latter, Lieut. Col. J. C. Cole, who was shot-and believed mortally-while directing and encouraging his men. Upon the fall of Lieut.-Col. Cole, the command devolved upon Capt. W. A. Brown, senior officer present, until my arrival with a detachment of the regiment ordered to guard Shallow Ford Bridge. 
The officers distinguished for gallant bearing are Capt. Brown, Lieut.'s R. H. Hayes, E. H. Fite, and Sergt. Maj. W. B. Clark. 
When General Joseph E. Johnston assumed command of the Army of Tennessee to oppose General Sherman's Atlanta Campaign, the 3rd Confederate was assigned to Govan's Brigade. The 3rd Confederate participated in the battles of Dalton, Resaca, New Hope Church, Kennesaw Mountain, Atlanta, and the Siege of Atlanta. During the Battle of Atlanta on July 22, 1864, the 3rd Confederate had only 62 effectives and reported 9 casualties. 
The regiment and it colors were captured, along with much of Govan's Brigade at the Battle of Jonesboro, Georgia, on Sept. 1, 1864. Due to a special cartel between Union General Sherman and Confederate General John B. Hood, the unit was quickly paroled and exchanged for Union prisoner held at Andersonville Prison. The regiment re-entered service approximately a month later. 
Cyclaxyra jelineki is a species of cucujoid beetle in the family Cyclaxyridae. It is endemic to New Zealand, found on the North Island, South Island, and Stewart Island. 
Live2D is the technique of generating 2D animations, usually anime-style characters, using layered, continuous parts based on an illustration, without the need of frame-by-frame animation or a 3D model. Live2D is also the name of the eponymous animation software series employing the technique, created by  Japanese programmer Tetsuya Nakajo. 
Live2D characters consist of layered parts, such as eyes, mouths, and arms, that are rigged to a skeleton to form a whole animated character. Live2D can be used with motion capture to track movements and perform lip syncing for real-time applications such as vtubing. 
Some software programs are able to create animated avatars by combining the Live2D system with real-time motion capture and computer-generated imagery, including: 
Eacles canaima is a moth in the family Saturniidae. It is found in Venezuela. It is light yellow with some slight orange. 
Lo was born in Taiwan on 20 July 1954 to an upper-class family. He complied with his family's wishes to finish medical school by graduating from the China Medical University in Taichung, but decided to abandon a career as a physician to pursue a singing and songwriting career. 
In 2004, Lo formally relinquished his US citizenship to protest the introduction to the US House of Representatives of a resolution regarding the deployment of Taiwanese marines to Iraq. "[W]hen US representatives introduced a resolution requesting that Taiwan send marines to Iraq, I realized that while the US often stresses peaceful negotiations across the Taiwan Strait, the US government is the third party that stands in the way of truly peaceful negotiation," Lo said. 
The Pullur Kodavalam inscription (dated to 1020 AD) is an early 11th century stone inscription from Pullur, near Kanhangad in Kerala, south India. The old Malayalam inscription in Vattezhuthu script (with some Grantha characters) is engraved on a single stone slab in the courtyard of the Pullur Kodavalam Vishnu Temple. 
It was released on PC and sixth generation platforms and a Nintendo DS version on November 21, 2005, while it was released on November 22, 2005, on the Xbox 360 as a launch title, as well as a Game Boy Advance version titled Kong: The 8th Wonder of the World; also, a PlayStation Portable version was released December 20, 2005. The film's cast members reprise their roles. 
In the game, the player assumes the roles of both New York scriptwriter Jack Driscoll and the giant gorilla, King Kong, as they struggle to survive the threats of Skull Island in 1933. 
Human levels are controlled from a first person perspective. The game de-emphasizes the role of a heads-up display: it lacks a life bar, aiming reticle, and ammunition readout (the ammo readout and aiming reticule can be turned on and off at the player's will, but is disabled by default), further adding to the challenge and encouraging the player to find alternate weapons and techniques. 
The game features an alternate ending where Kong can be saved during the Empire State Building shootout and safely returned to Skull Island. The ending was approved by Peter Jackson. To unlock the alternate ending, players must complete the entire game and then go back and play through various maps and earn a total of 250,000 points. It can also be accessed by using the cheat codes. 
The Xbox 360 release features improved graphics and audio over the sixth generation console releases. The second PC version, known as the "Gamer's Edition", (originally only available with select graphics cards and later offered on game download services) also includes these improved features. 
Symptomatic of early seventh generation console games, the Xbox 360 version is only set up for HDTV, leaving the image on standard-definition TVs very dark and unsatisfactory for gameplay. As a result, Ubisoft recommended fans buy the Xbox version until a fix for the problem was produced. The patch was eventually released. The Xbox version is not backwards compatible with the Xbox 360. In June 2019, Microsoft added the Xbox 360 version to the Xbox One backwards compatible library. 
The retail PC version utilizes the StarForce copy protection system, which may cause unforeseen difficulties for players, especially those using Microsoft Windows 7. No patch has been released by the publisher to remedy this problem. The Gamer's Edition of the game is playable on Windows 7 and in Windows 10 with no issues. 
The Xbox 360 version of the game has poorly coded shaders, allowing homebrew and unsigned code to run on the Xbox 360 through modified disc images of the game, which exploited the aforementioned shader engine. 
Peter Jackson's King Kong was a commercial success, selling more than 4.5 million copies by the end of March 2006. The PlayStation 2 version received a "Platinum" sales award from the Entertainment and Leisure Software Publishers Association (ELSPA), indicating sales of at least 300,000 copies in the United Kingdom. 
In PKIs there are three other primary methods for clients to obtain pointers to PKI data: adopting specific certificate extensions; looking at easily accessible repositories (e.g. DNS, local database, etc.); and adapting existing protocols (e.g. Web Services). 
Although encouraged, usage of the AIA and SIA extension is still not widely deployed. There are two main reasons for this. The first is the lack of support for such extensions in available clients. The second reason is that extensions are static, i.e. not modifiable. Indeed, to modify or add new extensions, in order to have users and applications to be aware of new services or their dismissal, the certificate must be re-issued. 
The SRV record or DNS Service record technique is thought to provide pointers to servers directly in the DNS (RFC 1035). As defined in RFC 2782, the introduction of this type of record allows administrators to perform operations rather similar to the ones needed to solve the problem PRQP addresses, i.e. an easily configurable PKI discovery service. 
The basic idea is to have the client query the DNS for a specific SRV record. For example, if an SRV-aware LDAP client wants to discover an LDAP server for a certain domain, it performs a DNS lookup for _ldap._tcp.example.com (the _tcp means the client requesting a TCP enabled LDAP server). The returned record contains information on the priority, the weight, the port and the target for the service in that domain. 
The problem in the adoption of this mechanism is that in PKIs (unlike DNS) there is usually no fixed requirement for the name space used. Most of the time, there is no correspondence 